District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0834.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
22 act may be cited as the "Reeves Center Surplus Declaration and Disposition Approval Act of
23 2026".
24 Sec. 2. Definitions.
25 For the purposes of this act, the term:
26 (1) "Act" means An Act Authorizing the sale of certain real estate in the District
27 of Columbia no longer required for public purposes, approved August 5, 1939 (53 Stat. 1211;
28 D.C. Official Code§ 10-801 et seq.).
29 (2) "CBE Act" means the Small and Certified Business Enterprise Development
30 and Assistance Act of 2005, effective October 20, 2005 (D.C. Law 16-33; D.C. Official Code§
31 2-218.01 et seq.).
32 (3) "Certified Business Enterprise" means a business enterprise or joint venture
33 certified pursuant to the Small and Certified Business Enterprise Development and Assistance

34 Act of 2005, effective October 20, 2005 (D.C. Law 16-33; D.C. Official Code § 2-218.01 et
35 seq.).
36 (4) “Developer” means Reeves CMC Venture, LLC, a District of Columbia
37 limited liability company, with a business address of 1328 Florida Avenue, NW, Washington,
38 DC 20009, and any of its designees, successors, or assigns as may be permitted under the terms
39 of the LDDA.
40 (5) “First Source Agreement” means an agreement with the District governing
41 certain obligations of the Developer pursuant to section 4 of the First Source Employment
42 Agreement Act of 1984, effective June 29, 1984 (D.C. Law 5-93; D.C. Official Code § 2-
43 219.03), and Mayor’s Order 83-265, dated November 9, 1983, regarding job creation and
44 employment generated as a result of the construction on the Property.
45 (6) “LDDA” means the draft Land Disposition and Development Agreement
46 submitted with this act.
47 (7) “Property” means the real property located at 2000 14th Street, NW, and
48 known for taxation and assessment purposes as Lot 844 in Square 204 and 1414 V Street, NW,
49 and known for taxation and assessment purposes as Lot 7000 in Square 204.
50 Sec. 3. Findings.
51 (a) The District of Columbia is the owner of the Property.
52 (b) The Property consists of approximately 97,600 square feet of land.
53 (c) The Property is no longer required for public purposes.
54 (d) The District government and the public will benefit substantially from the disposition
55 of the Property for private development.
2

56 (e) The Mayor, through the Office of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic
57 Development, satisfied the public hearing requirement of section 1(a-1)(4) of the Act by holding
58 a public hearing on Tuesday, September 1, 2020, and in lieu of an in-person public meeting due
59 to the Public Health Emergency the meeting was held online via WebEx to obtain community
60 input on potential public uses of the real property to inform the Mayor’s determination whether
61 the real property is no longer required for public purposes.
62 (f) The Mayor, through the Office of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic
63 Development, satisfied the public hearing requirement of section 1(b-2) of the Act by holding a
64 public hearing on Thursday, January 26, 2023, in the Todd A. Lee Auditorium at the District of
65 Columbia Housing Finance Agency building located at 815 Florida Avenue, NW, and online
66 simultaneously via WebEx to obtain community comment and suggestions on the proposed use
67 of the property.
68 (g) The Mayor, through the Office of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic
69 Development, has selected the Developer to develop the Property.
70 (h) The intended development of the Property is mixed-use buildings with multiple uses,
71 including office space anchored by a new headquarters for the National Association for the
72 Advancement of Colored People (NAACP), a hotel, residential units, retail or commercial space,
73 arts and entertainment space, an outdoor plaza, a parking garage, and any other uses as further
74 described in the term sheet submitted with this act (“Project”).
75 (i) The Mayor has proposed that the terms of the disposition of the Property include the
76 following:
77 (1) The Developer shall comply with the requirements of section 1(b-3) of the
78 Act, by dedicating at least 30% of the residential units in the Project as affordable housing units.
3

79 (2) The Developer shall enter into an agreement that shall require the Developer
80 to, at a minimum, contract with Certified Business Enterprises for at least 35% of the contract
81 dollar volume of the Project and shall require at least 20% equity and 20% development
82 participation of Certified Business Enterprises in the Project, in accordance with section 2349a of
83 the CBE Act and section 1(b)(6) of the Act.
84 (3) The Developer shall enter into a First Source Agreement.
85 (j) The method of disposition shall be a fee simple sale of a portion of the Property, and a
86 ground lease for up to 99 years for the remainder of the Property, which may include an
87 assignment and assumption of the air rights lease of Lot 7000 in Square 204, as described in the
88 executed term sheet and LDDA documents submitted with this act.
89 (k) The LDDA for the disposition of the Property shall not be inconsistent with the
90 substantive business terms of the transaction submitted by the Mayor with this act in accordance
91 with section 1(b-1)(2) of the Act, unless revisions to those substantive business terms are
92 approved by the Council.
93 Sec. 4. Surplus declaration and disposition approval.
94 (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including the Act, the Council
95 determines that the Property is no longer required for public purposes and authorizes the Mayor
96 to dispose of the Property.
97 (b) The authority of the Mayor to dispose of the Property pursuant to this act shall expire
98 3 years after the effective date of this act; provided that the Mayor’s authority to dispose of Lot
99 7000 in Square 204 to Developer shall expire in accordance with the terms of the LDDA.
100 Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
4

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
BRIAN L. SCHWALB
ATTORNEY GENERAL
Legal Counsel Division
MEMORANDUM
TO: Tomás Talamante
Director
Office of Policy and Legislative Affairs
FROM: Adele El-Khouri
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
DATE: August 28, 2026
SUBJECT: Legal Sufficiency Review of the “Reeves Surplus Declaration and Disposition
Approval Act of 2026”
(AE-26-441)
_____________________________________________________________________________________
This is to Certify that
the Office of the Attorney General has reviewed the
above-referenced legislation and found it to be legally sufficient. If you have any questions in this
regard, please do not hesitate to call me at (202) 262-6402.
_________________________________
Adele El-Khouri
3

Government of the District of Columbia
Office of the Chief Financial Officer
Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
MEMORANDUM
TO: The Honorable Phil Mendelson
Chairman, Council of the District of Columbia
FROM: Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
DATE: September 10, 2026
SUBJECT: Fiscal Impact Statement – Reeves Surplus Declaration and Disposition
Approval Act of 2026
REFERENCE: Draft Bill as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on August 14,
2026
Conclusion
Funds are sufficient in the revised fiscal year 2026 budget and the fiscal year 2027 through fiscal year
2030 budget and financial plan to implement the bill. The developer will purchase a portion of the
property in a fee simple transaction for $1 and will lease the remainder of the property under a 99-
year ground lease.
Background
The Reeves Center1 is a District-owned building located at the corner of 14th Street N.W. and U Street,
N.W. Since the building’s opening, it has housed several District government agencies and community
organizations. The bill declares the Reeves Center as surplus property and approves the building for
disposition for private development. The District has moved all government activities to other
locations and the building is no longer needed for government purposes. A private entity operates
the building’s garage as a public parking amenity through a contract with the District government.
The District will dispose of the Reeves Center to a private developer, Reeves CMC Venture, LLC, who
will subdivide the lot into an office parcel and a residential parcel. The developer will construct a
mixed-use commercial building with a hotel, art space, and office space. The NAACP will occupy
approximately half of the office space for its national headquarters. The District government or
1 The Reeves Center is located on the lot known for assessment and tax purposes as Square 204, Lot 844.
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Suite 203, Washington, DC 20004 (202)727-2476
www.cfo.dc.gov

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “Reeves Surplus Declaration and Disposition Approval Act of 2026,” Draft Bill as provided to the Office of
Revenue Analysis on August 14, 2026
related agencies will also lease office space in the building. The District will dispose of the office
parcel to the developer through a fee simple transaction for $1, due at closing.
On the residential parcel, the developer will construct 285 or 322 residential units,2 40,000 square
feet of retail space, outdoor space, and other related uses. The Geno Baroni apartment building
currently sits on a portion of the residential parcel on an air lot3 the District leases to the apartment
building. The development agreements contemplate the developer assuming that lease arrangement
and negotiating with the apartment building to include that air rights lot in its residential
development or to maintain the current arrangement. If the current arrangement is maintained, then
the developer will construct fewer residential units on the remainder of the residential parcel. The
developer will lease the residential parcel from the District under a 99-year ground lease for $1
annually, paid in full at closing.
The developer must enter into a Certified Business Enterprise Utilization and Participation
Agreement with the Department of Small and Local Business Development and a First Source
Agreement with the Department of Employment Services.
Financial Plan Impact
Funds are sufficient in the proposed revised fiscal year 2026 budget and proposed fiscal year 2027
through fiscal year 2030 budget and financial plan to implement the bill. There are no costs
associated with declaring the Reeves Center as surplus property. The developer will pay the District
$1 at closing for the fee-simple sale of the office parcel and $990 for the 99-year ground lease of the
residential parcel. The developer has also been approved to receive up to $32 million in Tax
Increment Financing from the District to support the development.4 The District and the developer
must close on the transaction within three years of the bill’s effective date.
The District’s contract with the public parking operator expires at the end of fiscal year 2026. If the
contract is extended prior to the closing of the transaction, the District will be able terminate it with
thirty days’ notice at no cost to the District.
2 Either 86 or 97 of the units will be affordable residential units depending on the number of total units
constructed.
3 The Geno Baroni apartments are located on an air lot known for assessment and tax purposes as Square
204, Lot 7000.
4 Frank D. Reeves Municipal Center Tax Increment Financing Act of 2026, enacted August 14, 2026 (D.C. Act
26-418; 73 DCR 11725).
Page 2 of 2

Council Draft
LAND DISPOSITION AND DEVELOPMENT AGREEMENT
by and between the
DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
and
REEVES CMC VENTURE, LLC
for the
DISPOSITION AND DEVELOPMENT OF
THAT CERTAIN PARCEL OF LAND LOCATED AT
2000 14th Street, NW
Lot 844 in Square 204
(including Assessment and Taxation Lot 7000 in Square 204)
[Date]

TABLE OF CONTENTS
ARTICLE I DEFINITIONS ............................................................................................................................ 2
1.1 DEFINITIONS. ................................................................................................................................................. 2
1.2 RULES OF CONSTRUCTION.. ...................................................................................................................... 15
1.3 OTHER DEFINITIONS.. ................................................................................................................................ 15
ARTICLE II CONVEYANCE OF PROPERTY; PROJECT DEPOSIT; CONDITION OF
PROPERTY ..................................................................................................................................................... 15
2.1 CONVEYANCE OF THE PROPERTY; PURCHASE PRICE; RENT ......... ERROR! BOOKMARK NOT DEFINED.
2.2 PROJECT DEPOSIT; LETTERS OF CREDIT. ................................................................................................ 15
2.2.1 Project Deposit. ..................................................................................................................................... 15
2.2.2 Acceptable Letters of Credit. ............................................................................................................... 16
2.3 CONDITION OF PROPERTY. ........................................................................................................................ 17
2.3.1 Feasibility Studies; Access to Property.............................................................................................. 17
2.3.2 Soil Characteristics.. ............................................................................................................................. 18
2.3.3 Underground Storage Tanks. ............................................................................................................... 19
2.3.4 Heritage and Special Tree Requirements.. ........................................................................................ 19
2.3.5 AS-IS.. .................................................................................................................................................... 19
2.4 TITLE. ........................................................................................................................................................... 20
2.5 RISK OF LOSS. ............................................................................................................................................. 22
2.6 CONDEMNATION. ........................................................................................................................................ 22
2.6.1 Notice. ..................................................................................................................................................... 22
2.6.2 Total Taking.. ........................................................................................................................................ 22
2.6.3 Partial Taking. ....................................................................................................................................... 22
2.7 SERVICE CONTRACTS AND LEASES; TEMPORARY LICENSEES. . .......................................................... 22
2.8 AIR RIGHTS PARCEL AND AIR RIGHTS LEASE. . ............................................................................................. 22
ARTICLE III REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES.................................................................. 24
3.1 REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES OF DISTRICT. ........................................................................... 24
3.2 REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES OF DEVELOPER. ...................................................................... 25
ARTICLE IV APPROVAL OF CONSTRUCTION PLANS AND SPECIFICATIONS AND
OTHER SUBMISSIONS ................................................................................................................................ 26
4.1 CONSTRUCTION PLANS AND SPECIFICATIONS. ...................................................................................... 26
4.1.1 Developer’s Submissions for the Project........................................................................................... 26
4.1.2 Requirements for Construction Plans and Specifications. .............................................................. 26
4.1.3 Progress Meetings. ................................................................................................................................ 27
4.2 DISTRICT REVIEW AND APPROVAL OF CONSTRUCTION PLANS AND SPECIFICATIONS. ................... 27
4.2.1 Generally.. .............................................................................................................................................. 27
4.2.2 Time Period for District Review and Approval. ............................................................................... 27
4.2.3 Disapproval Notices.. ........................................................................................................................... 27
4.2.4 No Representation; No Liability. ........................................................................................................ 28
4.3 CHANGES IN CONSTRUCTION PLANS AND SPECIFICATIONS; GOVERNMENT REQUIRED CHANGES.
28
4.3.1 No Material Changes. ........................................................................................................................... 28
-ii-

4.3.2 Government Required Changes. ......................................................................................................... 28
4.4 PROJECT PROFESSIONALS.......................................................................................................................... 29
4.4.1 Approval of Project Professionals. ..................................................................................................... 29
4.4.2 Copies of Contracts.. ............................................................................................................................ 29
4.4.3 No Prohibited Persons. ......................................................................................................................... 29
4.5 RETAIL PLAN. .............................................................................................................................................. 29
4.6 COMMUNITY PARTICIPATION PROGRAM. . ............................................................................................. 30
4.7 CONSTRUCTION CONSULTANT. ................................................................................................................ 30
4.8 PROJECT FUNDING PLAN; PROJECT BUDGET. ........................................................................................ 30
4.8.1 Project Funding Plan. ........................................................................................................................... 30
4.8.2 Project Budget. ...................................................................................................................................... 31
4.8.3 Final Project Budget and Funding Plan. ............................................................................................ 31
4.9 ZONING COMMISSION. .............................................................................................................................. 31
4.10 ZONING APPLICATION APPEALS AND REVISED DEVELOPMENT PLAN. ........................................................... 32
4.11 NAMING OF PROJECT. ................................................................................................................................ 32
4.12 SUBMISSION DEADLINE EXTENSIONS. ..................................................................................................... 32
4.13 OUTDOOR ACTIVATION PLAN AND BUDGET. ......................................................................................... 32
4.14 SUBDIVISION. .............................................................................................................................................. 32
4.15 NAACP ENTERPRISES ACQUISITION OF NAACP UNIT. ................................................................................ 32
4.16 RECIPROCAL EASEMENT AGREEMENT. .......................................................................................................... 32
4.17 HOTEL FRANCHISE AGREEMENT. ................................................................................................................... 32
4.18 HOTEL MANAGEMENT AGREEMENT. ............................................................................................................. 32
4.19 ALVIN AILEY LEASE. ..................................................................................................................................... 32
4.20 LABOR PEACE AGREEMENT. .......................................................................................................................... 32
ARTICLE V CONDITIONS TO CLOSING .............................................................................................. 34
5.1 CONDITIONS PRECEDENT TO DEVELOPER’S OBLIGATION TO CLOSE. ................................................ 34
5.2 CONDITIONS PRECEDENT TO DISTRICT’S OBLIGATION TO CLOSE. ..................................................... 36
ARTICLE VI CLOSING ............................................................................................................................... 39
6.1 CLOSING DATE AND OUTSIDE CLOSING DATE. ..................................................................................... 39
6.2 DELIVERIES AT CLOSING. .......................................................................................................................... 39
6.2.1 District’s Deliveries. ............................................................................................................................. 39
6.2.2 Developer’s Deliveries ......................................................................................................................... 40
6.3 RECORDATION OF CLOSING DOCUMENTS; CLOSING COSTS. ............................................................... 42
ARTICLE VII DEVELOPMENT OF PROPERTY AND CONSTRUCTION OF
IMPROVEMENTS[; AFFORDABLE HOUSING REQUIREMENT] .................................................. 42
7.1 OBLIGATION TO CONSTRUCT IMPROVEMENTS. ..................................................................................... 43
7.2 GOVERNMENTAL APPROVALS. ................................................................................................................. 43
7.3 ISSUANCE OF PERMITS. .............................................................................................................................. 43
7.4 SITE PREPARATION. .................................................................................................................................... 43
7.5 AFFORDABLE HOUSING REQUIREMENT. ................................................................................................ 44
7.6 OPPORTUNITY FOR CBES. . ....................................................................................................................... 44
7.7 EMPLOYMENT OF DISTRICT RESIDENTS; FIRST SOURCE AGREEMENT............................................... 44
7.8 DAVIS BACON ACT; LIVING WAGE ACT ................................................................................................. 44
7.9 GREEN BUILDING ACT AND CLEAN ENERGY. ...................................................................................... 44
7.9 LIVING BUILDING CHALLENGE. ............................................................................................................. 44
-iii-

ARTICLE VIII POST-CLOSING GUARANTIES OF PERFORMANCE .......................................... 45
8.1 DEVELOPMENT AND COMPLETION GUARANTY. .................................................................................... 45
8.1.1 Delivery at Closing. ............................................................................................................................. 45
8.1.2 Approval of Guarantor. ........................................................................................................................ 45
8.1.3 Guarantor Submissions.. ...................................................................................................................... 45
8.1.4 Material Adverse Change in Financial Condition of Guarantor. ................................................... 46
8.2 PERFORMANCE LETTER OF CREDIT ......................................................................................................... 46
8.3 PAYMENT AND PERFORMANCE BONDS ................................................................................................... 46
ARTICLE IX DEFAULTS AND REMEDIES ........................................................................................... 46
9.1 DEFAULT. ..................................................................................................................................................... 46
9.1.1 Default by Developer. ......................................................................................................................... 46
9.1.2 Default by District. ............................................................................................................................. 47
9.2 DISTRICT REMEDIES IN THE EVENT OF A DEVELOPER DEFAULT. ....................................................... 47
9.3 DEVELOPER REMEDIES IN THE EVENT OF A DISTRICT DEFAULT. ....................................................... 47
9.4 LIMITATION ON REMEDIES; CURE PERIODS. .......................................................................................... 48
9.5 NO WAIVER BY DELAY; WAIVER. ......................................................................................................... 48
9.6 ASSIGNMENT OF DEVELOPMENT WORK PRODUCT.. ............................................................................. 48
9.7 ATTORNEYS’ FEES ...................................................................................................................................... 48
9.8 RIGHTS AND REMEDIES CUMULATIVE. . ................................................................................................. 49
ARTICLE X CONSTRUCTION FINANCING ......................................................................................... 49
10.1 LIMITATIONS ON ENCUMBRANCES. ......................................................................................................... 49
10.1.1 Debt Financing; Mortgages.. ............................................................................................................... 49
10.1.2 Bona Fide Indebtedness. ...................................................................................................................... 49
10.2 SUBMISSIONS............................................................................................................................................... 49
ARTICLE XI ASSIGNMENT AND TRANSFER ..................................................................................... 50
11.1 ASSIGNMENT. .............................................................................................................................................. 50
11.2 TRANSFER OF MEMBERSHIP INTERESTS.................................................................................................. 51
11.3 NO UNREASONABLE RESTRAINT.............................................................................................................. 51
ARTICLE XII INSURANCE OBLIGATIONS; INDEMNIFICATION ............................................... 51
12.1 INSURANCE OBLIGATIONS. ....................................................................................................................... 51
12.2 Indemnification. .................................................................................................................................... 51
ARTICLE XIII NOTICES ............................................................................................................................. 52
13.1 TO DISTRICT. ............................................................................................................................................. 52
13.2 TO DEVELOPER. .......................................................................................................................................... 52
ARTICLE XIV MISCELLANEOUS ........................................................................................................... 53
14.1 PARTY IN POSITION OF SURETY WITH RESPECT TO OBLIGATIONS. .................................................... 54
14.2 CONFLICT OF INTERESTS; REPRESENTATIVES NOT INDIVIDUALLY LIABLE. ..................................... 54
14.3 SURVIVAL; MERGER .................................................................................................................................. 54
14.4 TITLES OF ARTICLES AND SECTIONS. ...................................................................................................... 54
14.5 GOVERNING LAW; FORUM FOR DISPUTES .............................................................................................. 54
14.6 ENTIRE AGREEMENT; RECITALS; EXHIBITS. .......................................................................................... 54
14.7 COUNTERPARTS.. ........................................................................................................................................ 55
14.8 TIME OF PERFORMANCE. ......................................................................................................................... 55
14.9 SUCCESSORS AND ASSIGNS. .................................................................................................................... 55
-iv-

14.10 THIRD PARTY BENEFICIARY. ................................................................................................................. 55
14.11 WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL. .......................................................................................................................... 55
14.12 FURTHER ASSURANCES. ........................................................................................................................... 55
14.13 MODIFICATIONS AND AMENDMENTS. .................................................................................................... 55
14.14 SEVERABILITY. .......................................................................................................................................... 55
14.15 ANTI-DEFICIENCY LIMITATION; AUTHORITY. ...................................................................................... 56
14.16 TIME OF THE ESSENCE; STANDARD OF PERFORMANCE. ...................................................................... 56
14.17 NO PARTNERSHIP. ..................................................................................................................................... 56
14.18 EACH PARTY TO BEAR ITS OWN COSTS. ............................................................................................... 56
14.19 DISCRETION. ............................................................................................................................................... 56
14.20 FORCE MAJEURE. ...................................................................................................................................... 56
14.21 JOINT PREPARATION.. ............................................................................................................................... 57
14.22 ESTOPPEL CERTIFICATES. ........................................................................................................................ 57
14.23 D.C. HUMAN RIGHTS ACT. ..................................................................................................................... 57
14.24 PROJECT SIGNAGE. ................................................................................................................................... 57
14.25 PROJECT PRESS RELEASES AND PROMOTIONAL MATERIALS. ............................................................ 57
14.26 PROJECT PUBLIC EVENTS. . ...................................................................................................................... 57
EXHIBITS
Exhibit A Legal Description of Property
Exhibit A-1 Parcel Description
Exhibit A-2 Depiction of Garage
Exhibit B Form of Affordable Housing Covenant
Exhibit C Affordable Housing Plan
Exhibit D CBE Agreement
Exhibit E Form of Construction Covenant
Exhibit F Form of Guaranty
Exhibit G First Source Agreement
Exhibit H Concept Plans
Exhibit H-1 Development Plan
Exhibit I-1 Form of Deed
Exhibit I-2 Form of Ground Lease
Exhibit J Form of Letter of Credit
Exhibit K Schedule of Performance
Exhibit L Council Term Sheet
Exhibit M Right of Entry
Exhibit N Project Funding Plan
Exhibit O Project Budget
Exhibit P Underground Storage Tank Disclosure Form
Exhibit Q Developer’s Organizational Chart
Exhibit R Assignment and Assumption of Air Rights Lease
Exhibit S Insurance Requirements
Exhibit T Equitable Inclusion Forms
Exhibit U REA for Garage
Exhibit V Outdoor Activation Framework
-v-

LAND DISPOSITION AND DEVELOPMENT AGREEMENT
THIS LAND DISPOSITION AND DEVELOPMENT AGREEMENT (this
“Agreement”), is made effective for all purposes as of the _____ day of ___________________
20__ between (i) DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, a municipal corporation, acting by and through
the Office of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development (“District”), and (ii)
REEVES CMC VENTURE, LLC, a District of Columbia limited liability company
(“Developer”) (individually a “Party” and collectively, the “Parties”).
RECITALS:
R-1. District owns the real property located at 2000 14th Street, NW in the District of
Columbia and known for taxation and assessment purposes as Lot 844 in Square 204 and including
the Air Rights Parcel (hereinafter defined) (the “Property”), as further described on Exhibit A.
R-2. The Property is improved with a Garage, the Franklin D. Reeves Municipal Center
building, and on the Air Rights Parcel, an apartment building referred to as the Geno Baroni
Apartments.
R-3. Developer will cause the Property to be legally subdivided into the Parcels
(hereinafter defined), as depicted on Exhibit A-1.
R-4. In accordance with the terms of this Agreement (1) District intends to sell the Office
Parcel and lease the Residential Parcel, including, if applicable, the Air Rights Parcel, to
Developer, and (2) Developer intends to purchase the Office Parcel and lease the Residential
Parcel, including, if applicable the Air Rights Parcel, from District, on which the Project (defined
below) will be developed and constructed.
R-5. District and Developer acknowledge that the National Association for the
Advancement of Colored People, a Section 501(c)(4) nonprofit advocacy organization
(“NAACP”), as the sole member/on behalf of NAACP Investments (hereinafter defined) and
NAACP Enterprises (hereinafter defined), is an integral strategic partner in the ownership and
development of the Property and has elected to relocate its national corporate headquarters to the
Project, which is located in a neighborhood that is historically and culturally significant to the
African American experience.
R-6. The Office Parcel shall be made up of multiple Assessment and Taxation lots or
condominium units and one such lot shall be known as the NAACP Unit (hereinafter defined) for
the purpose specified above. Developer has agreed to convey the NAACP Unit to NAACP
Enterprises for the relocation its national corporate headquarters at such time and in such condition
as shall be required by the terms of the NAACP Purchase Agreement (hereinafter defined) with
respect thereto.
R-7. Developer has agreed to admit NAACP Investments as a member in a joint venture
of which Developer will also be a member, which joint venture shall act as managing member of
each of the entity that will develop, construct and own or lease various Components of the Project
1

(including the NAACP Unit) pursuant with the terms of the RUSH JV Agreement and subsequent
amendments (hereinafter defined).
R-8. The disposition of the Property to Developer was approved on _______________
by the Council of the District of Columbia (the “Council”) pursuant to the
__________________________________________ Approval Act of _____, (“Act”), subject to
certain terms and conditions incorporated herein.
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the mutual covenants contained herein and other
good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged
by the Parties hereto, District and Developer do hereby agree as follows, to wit:
ARTICLE I
DEFINITIONS
1.1 Definitions. For the purposes of this Agreement, the following capitalized terms shall
have the meanings ascribed to them below:
“Acceptable Letter of Credit” is defined in Section 2.2.2.
“Additional Funding Sources” means with respect to each Component, one or
more sources of funding to be obtained by Developer to fund the costs set forth in the Final Project
Budget for the applicable Component, other than the Debt Financing and Equity Investment.
“Affiliate” means with respect to any Person (“first Person”) (a) any other Person
directly or indirectly Controlling, Controlled by, or under common Control with such first Person,
(b) any officer, director, partner, shareholder, manager, member, or trustee of such first Person, or
(c) any officer, director, general partner, manager, member, or trustee of any Person described in
clauses (a) or (b) of this sentence.
“Affordable Housing Covenant” is that certain Affordable Housing Covenant
between District and Developer in the form attached hereto as Exhibit B, to be recorded in the
Land Records against the Residential Component on the Residential Parcel at the First Closing
pursuant to Applicable Law and this Agreement.
“Affordable Housing Plan” is attached hereto as Exhibit C.
“Affordable Unit” means an affordable dwelling unit constructed as part of the
Improvements.
“Agreement” means this Land Disposition and Development Agreement.
“Air Rights Lease” means that Lease Agreement for Rent of Airspace, dated as of
October 8, 1986, by and between the District of Columbia, acting by and through the Department
of Housing and Community Development and Air Rights Lessee pursuant to which the District
leased the Air Rights Parcel to Air Rights Lessee, subject to the terms and conditions set forth
therein.
2

“Air Rights Lessee” shall mean Parcel 13 Associates Limited Partnership, a
District of Columbia limited partnership, or any successor in interest.
“Air Rights Parcel” means that certain Assessment and Taxation Lot 7000 in
Square 204 and includes the Geno Baroni Apartments.
“Applicable Law” means all applicable District of Columbia and federal laws,
codes, regulations, and orders, including, without limitation, Environmental Laws, laws relating
to historic preservation and zoning, laws relating to accessibility for persons with disabilities, and,
if applicable, the Davis-Bacon Act.
“Approved Hotel Brand" means (i) any hotel brand or hotel chain within the
Marriott International, Hilton Worldwide, IHG Hotels & Resorts, or Hyatt Hotels Corporation
families1 of brands, (ii) any other national or regional hotel brand, 3-star or above, approved by
District, or (iii) any non-flagged independent hotel, in each case that is classified as "Upper
Midscale," "Upscale," "Upper Upscale," or "Luxury" under the chain scale segmentation published
by STR (Smith Travel Research), or a comparable classification by a nationally recognized
hospitality research or ratings firm, approved by the District, if STR's segmentation is
discontinued or unavailable.
“Approved Plans and Specifications” is defined in Section 4.2.1.
“Architect” means the architect of record for the Project, who shall be licensed to
practice architecture in the District of Columbia.
“Arts and Cultural Leases” is defined in Section 4.19.
“Assignment and Assumption of Air Rights Lease” means that certain
Assignment and Assumption of Air Rights Lease, subject to Air Rights Lessee approval, in the
form attached hereto as Exhibit R, to be recorded in the Land Records against the Air Rights
Parcel in connection with the First Closing.
“Bonds” is defined in Section 8.3.
“Business Day” means Monday through Friday, inclusive, other than holidays
recognized by the District of Columbia government, or days on which the District of Columbia
government is officially closed.
“CBE Agreement” is that certain Certified Business Enterprise Utilization and
Participation Agreement, by and between Developer and DSLBD, governing certain obligations
of Developer under the Small and Certified Business Enterprise Development and Assistance Act
of 2005, as amended (D.C. Law 16-33; D.C. Official Code §§2-218.01, et seq.) with respect to the
Project, attached hereto as Exhibit D.
1 Brand/flags subject to OCFO approval in connection with the TIF.
3

“Closing” means, as the context requires, the First Closing or the Second Closing,
as contemplated by this Agreement.
“Closing Date” is defined in Section 6.1.
“Commencement of Construction” means, as to each Parcel, the time at which
Developer has (a) executed a Construction Contract with its Contractor; (b) given the Contractor
a notice to proceed under said Construction Contract; (c) caused the Contractor to mobilize on the
Property equipment necessary for demolition, if any, and/or excavation; (d) obtained the required
Permits for demolition, excavation, and sheeting and shoring; and (e) commenced remediation
and/or removal, as applicable, of Hazardous Materials in order to permit the commencement of
demolition, if any, and/or excavation upon the Property pursuant to the Approved Plans and
Specifications. For purposes of this Agreement, the term “Commencement of Construction” does
not mean site exploration, borings to determine foundation conditions, or other pre-construction
monitoring or testing to conduct due diligence activities or to establish background information
related to the suitability of the Property for the Project or the investigations of environmental
conditions.
“Community Participation Program” is defined in Section 4.6.
“Component” means any or all, as the context may require, of the portion of the
Project to be developed and constructed on the Office Parcel and the Residential Parcel, as each is
further described in the Development Plan.
“Concept Plans” are the design plans that serve the purpose of establishing the
major direction of the design and the delineation of each Component, which are attached as
Exhibit H.
“Construction Covenant” means either, as the context requires, those certain (i)
Construction and Use Covenant (with regard to the Office Parcel fee simple title to which will be
acquired by Developer from District); or (ii) Construction Covenant (with regard to the Residential
Parcel to be acquired by Developer from District pursuant to a Ground Lease) between District
and Developer, in the form attached hereto as Exhibit E, to be recorded in the Land Records
against the applicable Parcel in connection with the First Closing.
“Construction Consultant” is defined in Section 4.7.
“Construction Contract” means, as to each Component, a contract with the
applicable Contractor for the construction of the Improvements in accordance with the
Development Plan, the Approved Plans and Specifications, this Agreement, the CBE Agreement,
and the First Source Agreement.
“Construction Drawings” mean, as to each Component, the detailed architectural
drawings and specifications for all aspects of the Improvements within that Component in
accordance with the approved Permit Set Drawings and that are used to obtain detailed cost
estimates, to solicit and receive construction bids, referenced in the Construction Contract, and to
direct the actual construction of the Improvements.
4

“Construction Plans and Specifications” mean, as to each Component, the
Schematic Drawings, the Design Development Plans, the Permit Set Drawings, and the
Construction Drawings, individually or collectively, as the context shall appear, which shall be
delivered by Developer to District, and approved by District, to the extent required by, and in
accordance with the standards set forth in, Article IV of this Agreement. As used in this
Agreement, the term “Construction Plans and Specifications” shall include any changes to such
Construction Plans and Specifications that are made in accordance with the terms of this
Agreement.
“Contractor” means the general contractor for each Component of the Project.
“Control” means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct, or
cause the direction of, the management and policies of a Person, whether through ownership of
voting securities, membership interests or partnership interests, by contract or otherwise, or the
power to elect at least fifty percent (50%) of, as applicable, the directors, managers, managing
partners, or Persons exercising similar authority with respect to the subject Person. The terms
“Control,” “Controlling,” “Controlled by” or “under common Control with” shall have meanings
correlative thereto.
“Council” is defined in the Recitals.
“Council Term Sheet” means the term sheet attached as Exhibit L executed as
required by D.C. Official Code § 10-801(b-1)(2).
“Debt Financing” shall mean, with respect to each Component, the financing to be
obtained by Developer from one or more Institutional Lenders to fund the costs set forth in the
Final Project Budget for the applicable Component, other than any Equity Investment and
Additional Funding Sources.
“Deed” means that quitclaim deed conveying the Office Parcel to Developer in the
form attached hereto as Exhibit I-1.
“Design Development Plans” are, as to each Component, the design plans
produced after review and approval of the Schematic Drawings that reflect refinement of the
approved Schematic Drawings, showing all aspects of the Improvements at their proposed size
and shape. The Design Development Plans shall include details of materials and design, including
size and scale of façade elements, which are presented in detailed illustrations.
“Developer” is defined in the Preamble.
“Developer Default” is defined in Section 9.1.1.
“Developer’s Agents” means Developer’s agents, officers, directors, employees,
consultants, contractors, subcontractors, and representatives.
“Development Plan” means the plan identifying the uses to be constructed on each
Parcel and attached hereto as Exhibit H-1.
5

“Development Work Product” is defined in Section 9.6.
“Disapproval Notice” is defined in Section 4.2.3.
“District” is defined in the Preamble.
“District Certificate of Final Completion” shall have the meaning given in the
Construction Covenant.
“District Default” is defined in Section 9.1.2.
“DOEE” is the District of Columbia Department of Energy and Environment.
“DOES” is the District of Columbia Department of Employment Services.
“DSLBD” is the District of Columbia Department of Small and Local Business
Development.
“Effective Date” is the date first written above, provided that all Parties shall have
executed and delivered this Agreement to one another by that date.
“Environmental Laws” means any present and future federal, state, or local law
and any amendments (whether common law, statute, rule, order, regulation, or otherwise), permits,
and other requirements or guidelines of Governmental Authorities and relating to (a) the protection
of health, safety, and the indoor or outdoor environment; (b) the conservation, management, or use
of natural resources and wildlife; (c) the protection or use of surface water and groundwater; (d)
the management, manufacture, possession, presence, use, generation, transportation, treatment,
storage, disposal, release, threatened release, abatement, removal, remediation, or handling of or
exposure to Hazardous Materials; or (e) pollution (including any release to air, land, surface water,
and groundwater); including, without limitation, the Comprehensive Environmental Response,
Compensation and Liability Act of 1980, as amended, 42 U.S.C. § 9601 et seq.; the Solid Waste
Disposal Act, as amended by the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, and
subsequently amended, 42 U.S.C. § 6901 et seq.; the Hazardous Materials Transportation Act, 49
U.S.C. § 5101 et seq.; the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended by the Clean Water
Act of 1977, 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq.; the Oil Pollution Act of 1990, 33 U.S.C. § 32701 et seq.;
the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, as amended, 7 U.S.C. § 136-136y, the
Clean Air Act, as amended, 42 U.S.C. § 7401 et seq.; the Toxic Substances Control Act of 1976,
as amended, 15 U.S.C. § 2601 et seq.; the Safe Drinking Water Act of 1974, as amended, 42 U.S.C.
§ 300f et seq.; the Emergency Planning and Community Right-To-Know Act of 1986, 42 U.S.C.
§ 11001 et seq.; the Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970, 29 U.S.C. § 651 et seq.; the
National Environmental Policy Act of 1969, 42 U.S.C. § 4321 et seq.; and any similar,
implementing, or successor law, and any amendment, rule, regulatory order, or directive issued
thereunder.
“Equitable Inclusion Forms” is defined in Section 3.2.1(i)
“Equity Investment” shall mean the funding for a Component that is provided by
any Person with a direct or indirect ownership interest in Developer, which funding shall cover the
6

difference between (i) the proceeds of all Debt Financing and Additional Funding Sources,
subsidies and grants and (ii) the costs set forth in the applicable Final Project Budget.
“Final Project Budget” is defined in Section 4.8.3.
“Final Project Funding Plan” is defined in Section 4.8.3.
“Financing Commitments” shall mean bona fide commitment(s) for the Debt
Financing, Equity Investment, and Additional Funding Sources, as applicable for each Component.
“Financing Documents” means, as to each Component, (a) the final loan
documents for the Debt Financing, (b) the agreements evidencing the Equity Investment, (c) the
applicable agreements evidencing the Additional Funding Sources, and (d) a statement detailing
the disbursement of the proceeds of the Debt Financing and Equity Investment.
“First Closing” is the consummation of transactions involving the sale and/or lease
of the Parcels from District to Developer pursuant to the terms of this Agreement.
“First Closing Date” is defined in Section 6.1.1.
“First Outside Closing Date” is defined in Section 6.1.2.
“First Source Agreement” is that agreement between Developer and DOES,
attached hereto as Exhibit G, governing certain obligations of Developer regarding job creation
and employment generated as a result of the Project.
“Force Majeure” is an act or event, including, as applicable, an act of God; fire;
earthquake; flood; explosion; war; invasion; insurrection; riot; mob violence; sabotage; terrorism;
inability to procure or a general shortage of labor, equipment, facilities, materials, or supplies in
the open market; failure or unavailability of transportation; strike, lockout, or other actions of labor
unions; a taking by eminent domain or requisition; and laws or orders of government or of civil,
military, or naval authorities enacted or adopted after the Effective Date; so long as such act or
event: (a) is not within the reasonable control of Developer, Developer’s Agents, or its Members,
or by District in the event District’s claim of delay is based on a Force Majeure event; (b) is not
due to the fault or negligence of Developer, Developer’s Agents, or its Members, or by District in
the event District’s claim of delay is based on a Force Majeure event; (c) is not reasonably
avoidable by Developer, Developer’s Agents, or its Members or by District in the event District’s
claim is based on a Force Majeure event; and (d) directly results in a delay in performance by
Developer or District, as applicable; but specifically excluding: (i) shortage or unavailability of
funds or Developer’s financial condition or (ii) changes in market conditions such that the Project
is no longer practicable under the circumstances.
“Garage” means the subterranean garage structure located on the Property and
depicted on Exhibit A-2.
“Governmental Approvals” means all applicable governmental approvals that are
required under Applicable Law to construct the Improvements, including those that pertain to any
subdivision, tax lot designations, street closing(s), and other regulatory approvals, including,
7

without limitation, approval by the District of Columbia Board of Zoning Adjustment or Zoning
Commission, but expressly excluding the Permits.
“Governmental Authority” means the United States of America, the District of
Columbia, and any agency, department, commission, board, bureau, instrumentality or political
subdivision of the foregoing, now existing or hereafter created, having jurisdiction over Developer
or the Project or portion thereof, or any street, road, avenue, or sidewalk comprising a part of, or
in front of, the Property, or any vault in or under the Property, or airspace within or over the
Property.
“Ground Lease” means the ground lease agreement by which District will lease to
Developer the Residential Parcel on which Developer shall construct the Residential Component
in the form attached hereto as Exhibit I-2.
“Guarantor” means such Person(s) selected by Developer for each Component,
and approved by District pursuant to Section 8.1, who will enter into a Guaranty at the applicable
Closing.
“Guarantor Submissions” shall mean the (a) audited financial statements (or
unaudited and reviewed by an independent third-party certified public accountant if the proposed
guarantor is a Person that does not do audits in the ordinary course of its business) and audited
balance sheets (or unaudited and reviewed by an independent third-party certified public
accountant if the proposed guarantor is a Person that does not do audits in the ordinary course of
its business) for the preceding three (3) consecutive fiscal years of the proposed guarantor,
including such proposed guarantor’s profit and loss statements, cash flow statements, and other
financial reports; (b) bank statements to support the most recent fiscal year’s financial statements;
(c) schedule of real estate owned by the proposed guarantor, including the then-current outstanding
debt and debt service; and (d) and other financial information of a proposed guarantor as District
may reasonably request, together with a summary of such proposed guarantor’s other guaranty
obligations and the other contingent obligations of such proposed guarantor (such financial
statements, balance sheets, and other financial statements and information also must be certified
by such proposed guarantor or an officer of such proposed guarantor as being true, complete, and
correct). Additionally, for any proposed guarantor that is not a natural person, the following
documents evidencing the due organization and authority of such guarantor to enter into, join, and
consummate the actions required under the Guaranty: (i) the organizational documents and a
current certificate of good standing issued by its state of formation and the District of Columbia
for the proposed guarantor; (ii) authorizing resolutions, in form and content satisfactory to District,
demonstrating the authority of the proposed guarantor and of the Person executing the Guaranty
on behalf of such proposed guarantor; and (iii) a customary opinion of counsel that such proposed
guarantor is validly organized, existing and in good standing in its state of formation, and is
authorized to do business in the District of Columbia, that such proposed guarantor has the full
authority and legal right to carry out the terms of the Guaranty, that such proposed guarantor has
taken all actions to authorize the execution, delivery, and performance of the Guaranty, that none
of the aforesaid actions, undertakings, or agreements violate any restriction, term, condition, or
provision of the organizational documents of such proposed guarantor, or, to counsel’s actual
knowledge, any contract or agreement to which such proposed guarantor is a party or by which it
is bound.
8

“Guaranty” means, as to each Component, a development and completion
guaranty to be executed by Guarantor in the form attached hereto as Exhibit F, which shall, among
other things, obligate the Guarantor to develop and otherwise construct the Improvements in the
manner and within the time frames required by the terms of the applicable Construction Covenant.
“Hazardous Materials” means (a) asbestos and any asbestos containing material;
(b) any substance that is then defined or listed in, or otherwise classified pursuant to, any
Environmental Law or any other Applicable Law as a “hazardous substance,” “hazardous
material,” “hazardous waste,” “infectious waste,” “toxic substance,” or “toxic pollutant” or any
other formulation intended to define, list, or classify substances by reason of deleterious properties,
such as ignitability, corrosivity, reactivity, carcinogenicity, toxicity, reproductive toxicity, or
Toxicity Characteristic Leaching Procedure (TCLP) toxicity; (c) any petroleum and drilling fluids,
produced waters, and other wastes associated with the exploration, development, or production of
crude oil, natural gas, or geothermal resources; and (d) any petroleum product, polychlorinated
biphenyls, urea formaldehyde, radon gas, radioactive material (including any source, special
nuclear, or by-product material), medical waste, chlorofluorocarbon, lead or lead-based product,
and any other substance the presence of which could be detrimental to the Property or hazardous
to health or the environment.
“Hotel” means the hotel to be constructed on the Office Parcel and operated by an
Approved Hotel Brand.
“Hotel Franchise Agreement” is defined in Section 4.17.
“Hotel Management Agreement” is defined in Section 4.18
“Improvements” means the buildings, landscaping, hardscape, and other
improvements to be constructed or placed on a Parcel in accordance with the Development Plan
and Approved Plans and Specifications; provided, however, that in no event shall trade fixtures,
furniture, operating equipment (in contrast to building equipment), stock in trade, inventory, or
other personal property used in connection with the conduct of any business within the
Improvements be deemed included in the term “Improvements” as used in this Agreement.
“Institutional Lender” shall mean a Person that is not an Affiliate of Developer or
a Prohibited Person and is, at the time it first makes a loan to Developer, or acquires an interest in
any such loan, or issues an Acceptable Letter of Credit (a) a commercial bank, investment bank,
investment company, savings and loan association, trust company, or national banking association,
acting for its own accord; (b) a finance company principally engaged in the origination of
commercial mortgage loans or any financing related subsidiary of a Fortune 500 company; (c) an
insurance company acting for its own account or for special accounts maintained by it or as agent
or manager or advisor for other entities covered by any of clauses (a) – (j) hereof; (d) a public
employees’ pension or retirement system; (e) a pension, retirement, or profit sharing, or
commingled trust or fund for which any bank, trust company, national banking association, or
investment adviser registered under the Investment Advisors Act of 1940, as amended, is acting
as trustee or agent; (f) a real estate investment trust (or umbrella partnership or other entity of
which a real estate investment trust is the majority owner), a real estate mortgage investment
conduit, hedge fund, private equity fund, or securitization trust or similar investment entity; (g)
9

any federal, state, or District of Columbia government agency regularly making, purchasing, or
guaranteeing mortgage loans, or any governmental agency supervising the investment of public
funds; (h) a profit-sharing or commingled trust or fund, the majority of equity investors in which
are pension funds having in the aggregate no less than $1 billion in assets; (i) any entity of any
kind actively engaged in commercial real estate financing and having total assets in the aggregate
of no less than $1 billion; or (j) such other lender, subject to approval by District, in its sole and
absolute discretion, provided that such other lender is at the time of making the loan of a type
which is then customarily used as a lender on projects like the Project.
“Labor Peace Agreement” is defined in Section 4.20.
“Land Records” means the property records maintained by the Recorder of Deeds
for the District of Columbia.
“Letter of Credit” means a stand-by letter of credit from an Institutional Lender in
the form attached hereto as Exhibit J.
“LOI” is defined in Section 2.8.2(b).
“Managing Member” means 2Capri Reeves SPE, LLC.
“Material Change” means (a) any change in size or design from the Approved
Plans and Specifications that substantially affects the general appearance of the Improvements, or
the building bulk or the number of floors of the Improvements or any change or series of changes
that result in a diminution or increase of square footage of the Improvements in excess of five
percent (5%); (b) any change to the structural integrity of exterior walls or elevations; (c) any
change in exterior finishing materials that substantially affects the architectural appearance from
those shown and specified in the Approved Plans and Specifications; (d) any change in the
functional use and operation of the Improvements from those shown and specified in the Approved
Plans and Specifications; (e) any change in design or construction of the Improvements requiring
approval of, or any changes required by, any Governmental Authority; (f) any change in the
number of parking spaces in the Improvements by five percent (5%) or more from the Approved
Plans and Specifications; (g) any significant change that affects the appearance of landscape design
or plantings from the Approved Plans and Specifications; (h) any significant change that affects
the general appearance or structural integrity of exterior pavement, exterior lighting, and other
exterior site features from the Approved Plans and Specifications; or (i) any change in design or
construction of the Improvements that is inconsistent with the Development Plan.
“Member” means any Person with an ownership interest in Developer.
“Mortgage” means a mortgage, deed of trust, mortgage deed, or such other classes
of legal documents that secures Debt Financing.
2 Developer to provide the entity operating agreement prior to Effective Date.
10

“NAACP” means National Association for the Advancement of Colored People, a
501(c)(4) nonprofit advocacy organization as the sole member/on behalf of NAACP Investments
and NAACP Enterprises.
“NAACP Enterprises” means NAACP 14th Street Enterprises, LLC, a Delaware
limited liability company wholly owned by NAACP that is treated as a C corporation for federal
income tax purposes.
“NAACP Governing Agreements” means, collectively, the NAACP Purchase
Agreement and the RUSH JV Agreement.
“NAACP Investments” means NAACP 14 Street Investments, LLC, a Delaware
th
limited liability company wholly owned by NAACP that is treated as a C corporation for federal
income tax purposes.
“NAACP Purchase Agreement” means that certain Purchase, Sale, and
Development Agreement, dated as of __________ between Developer and NAACP Enterprises
which sets forth the terms and conditions of NAACP Enterprises’ acquisition of the NAACP Unit.
“NAACP Unit” is approximately 50,000 square foot condominium unit located in
the Office Component to be acquired by NAACP Enterprises in accordance with the NAACP
Purchase Agreement.
“Offers” is defined in Section 2.8.2(b).
“Office Component” means the design, development, and construction of the
NAACP Unit and the Office Lease Unit, arts, Hotel, retail and entertainment, parking, outdoor
space and other ancillary uses on the Office Parcel in accordance with the Governmental
Approvals, the Development Plan, this Agreement, and the Approved Plans and Specifications.
“Office Lease Unit” means the approximately [___________sq ft] condominium
unit located in the Office Component.
“Office Parcel” means the assessment and taxation lot(s) or record lot on which
the Office Component will be constructed.
“Outdoor Activation Plan and Budget” is defined in Section 4.12.
“Outdoor Plaza” is the outdoor open space, open to the public, to be constructed
on the Residential Parcel and the Office Parcel, and to be programmed in accordance with the
Outdoor Activation Plan and Budget.
“Parcel” or “Parcels” when used in the singular, shall mean either the Office
Parcel, the Air Rights Parcel, or the Residential Parcel; when used in the plural, shall be
collectively, the Office Parcel, the Air Rights Parcel, and the Residential Parcel.
“Party” or “Parties” means, when used in the singular, either District or
Developer; when used in the plural, both District and Developer.
11

“Performance Letter of Credit” is defined in Section 8.2.
“Permit Set Drawings” mean, as to each Component, the detailed architectural
drawings and specifications for all aspects of the Improvements in accordance with the approved
Design Development Drawings and that are used to apply for Permits.
“Permits” means all demolition, site, building, construction, excavation, and other
permits, licenses, and rights required to be obtained from any Governmental Authority having
jurisdiction over a Parcel necessary to commence and complete construction of the Improvements
in accordance with the Development Plan, the Approved Plans and Specifications, the
Construction Covenant, and this Agreement.
“Permitted Assignee” is defined in Section 11.1.
“Permitted Assignment” is defined in Section 11.1.
“Permitted Exceptions” is defined in Section 2.4.2.
“Person” means any individual, corporation, limited liability company, trust,
partnership, association, or other entity.
“Progress Meetings” is defined in Section 4.1.3.
“Prohibited Person” shall mean any of the following Persons: (a) any Person (or
any Person whose operations are directed or controlled by such Person) who has been convicted
of, has pleaded guilty in a criminal proceeding for, or is an on-going target of a grand jury
investigation concerning, a felony for one or more of the following: (i) fraud, (ii) intentional
misappropriation of funds, (iii) bribery, (iv) making false statements to a governmental agency,
(v) improperly influencing a governmental official, (vi) extortion, (vii) crimes committed against
minors, (viii) kidnapping, (ix) sexual assault, (x) human trafficking, (xi) murder, (xii) gambling,
(xiii) arson, and (xiv) conspiracy to commit any of the foregoing (i) through (xiii); or (b) any
Person organized in or controlled from a country, the effects of the activities with respect to which
are regulated or controlled pursuant to the following United States laws and the regulations or
executive orders promulgated thereunder: (x) the Trading with the Enemy Act of 1917, 50 U.S.C.
§ 4301 et seq., as amended; (y) the International Emergency Economic Powers Act of 1977, 50
U.S.C. § 1701 et seq., as amended; and (z) the Antiterrorism and Arms Export Amendments Act
of 1989, codified at Section 6(j) of the Export Administration Act of 1979, 50 U.S.C. § 4605, as
amended; or (c) any Person who has engaged in any dealings or transactions (i) in contravention
of the applicable money laundering laws or regulations or conventions or (ii) in contravention of
Executive Order No. 13224 dated September 24, 2001 issued by the President of the United States
(Executive Order Blocking Property and Prohibiting Transactions with Persons Who Commit,
Threaten to Commit, or Support Terrorism), as may be amended or supplemented from time-to-
time or any published terrorist or watch list that may exist from time to time; or (d) any Person
who appears on or conducts any business or engages in any transaction with any person appearing
on the list maintained by the U.S. Treasury Department’s Office of Foreign Assets Control located
at 31 C.F.R., Chapter V, Appendix A or is a person described in Section 1 of the Anti-Terrorism
Order described above; or (e) any Person who could be debarred if the standards applied in Title
27, Section 2213 of the D.C. Municipal Regulations were applied to such Person’s failure to satisfy
12

a contractual obligation to the District of Columbia; or (f) any Person who is on the District of
Columbia’s list of debarred, suspended or ineligible Persons; or (g) any Affiliate of any of the
Persons described in any one or more of clauses (a) through (f) above.
“Project” means the design, development, and construction of the Improvements
on the Parcels in accordance with the Governmental Approvals, the Development Plan, this
Agreement, and the Approved Plans and Specifications.
“Project Budget” has the meaning given in Section 4.8.2.
“Project Deposit” has the meaning given it in Section 2.2.1(a).
“Project Funding Plan” has the meaning given it in Section 4.8.1.
“Property” is defined in the Recitals.
“Purchase and Sale Agreement” is defined in Section 2.8.3.
“Purchase Price” is defined in Section 2.1.1.
“Reciprocal Easement Agreement” or “REA” is defined in Section 4.14.
“Remediation Plan” is defined in Section 2.3.1(b).
“Residential Component” means the design, development, and construction of
residential mixed income rental units, parking, outdoor space, arts, retail and entertainment, and
other ancillary uses on the Residential Parcel in accordance with the Governmental Approvals, the
Development Plan, this Agreement, and the Approved Plans and Specifications.
“Residential Parcel” means the assessment and taxation lot(s) or record lot on
which the Residential Component, will be constructed, and shall include, as the context requires,
the Air Rights Parcel.
“Residential Units” means the residential dwelling units to be constructed on the
Residential Parcel in accordance with the Development Plan and this Agreement, including the
Affordable Units.
“Resubmission Period” is a period of thirty (30) days commencing on the day after
Developer receives a Disapproval Notice from District, or such other period of time as District and
Developer may agree in writing. In the event either Developer or District reasonably believes that
the Resubmission Period should be longer or shorter than such thirty (30) day period, such Party
shall promptly notify the other in writing of the period of time that such Party reasonably believes
should apply and the reasons therefor.
“Retail Plan” is defined in Section 4.5.
“Review Period” is defined in Section 4.2.2.
“ROE” is defined in Section 2.3.1(a).
13

“RUSH JV” means Reeves U Street Historic Partners, LLC, a District of Columbia
limited liability company.
“RUSH JV Agreement” means that certain definitive agreement of RUSH JV,
between NAACP and Reeves CMC Venture, LLC, dated as of ______________.
“Second Closing” is defined in Section 6.1.2.
“Second Closing Date” is defined in Section 6.1.2.
“Second Outside Closing Date” is defined in Section 6.1.2.
“Schedule of Performance” means that schedule of performance, attached hereto
as Exhibit K and incorporated herein, setting forth the timeline for design, development,
construction, and completion of each Component (including a construction timeline in customary
form) together with the dates for submission of documentation required under this Agreement,
which Schedule of Performance shall be further delineated prior to Closing on each Parcel with
additional interim milestones and attached to the applicable Construction Covenant.
“Schematic Drawings” means, as to each Component, drawings and plans for the
Improvements that include and show, at a minimum, the following: (a) site survey; (b) site plan;
(c) ground level plan; (d) preliminary building elevations; (e) a landscape plan (1”=30’) showing
the proposed location of plantings, including trees and shrubs on the Parcel; (f) the approximate
gross square footage of each building to be developed as part of the Improvements; (g) the location
of parking facilities and approximate number of spaces; (h) schematic building plans, inclusive of
any underground garage facility (1/20”=1’); (i) typical floors plans, inclusive of any underground
garage facilities (1/20”=1’); (j) a chart showing expected floor areas, expected floor area ratio,
expected building coverage of the Parcel, expected building height, areas dedicated to pedestrian
and recreational uses, and expected location of loading docks; (k) a topographic survey for the
Parcel; (l) expected open spaces (including outdoor spaces), driveways, access roads, private
streets, sidewalks, loading, and curb cuts on the Parcel; and (m) as to the Residential Component,
the intended Affordable Unit count, unit type and proposed unit location, which shall be consistent
with the requirements of the Affordable Housing Covenant.
“Second Notice” means that notice given by Developer to District in accordance
with Section 4.2.2 and/or Section 4.2.3 herein. Any Second Notice shall (a) be labeled, in bold, 18
point font, as a “SECOND AND FINAL NOTICE”; (b) contain the following statement: “A
FAILURE TO RESPOND TO THIS NOTICE WITHIN FIFTEEN (15) BUSINESS DAYS
SHALL CONSTITUTE APPROVAL OF THE [NAME OF SUBMISSION] ORIGINALLY
SUBMITTED ON [DATE OF DELIVERY OF SUCH SUBMISSION]”; and (c) be delivered in
the manner prescribed in Section 13.1, in an envelope conspicuously labeled “SECOND AND
FINAL NOTICE”.
“Settlement Agent” means Fidelity National Insurance Company, the title agent
selected by Developer and mutually acceptable to Developer and District.
“Settlement Statement” is the settlement statement prepared by Settlement Agent
setting forth the sources and uses of all funds associated with Closing.
14

“Submissions” means those certain plans, specifications, documents, items, and
other matters to be submitted by Developer to District pursuant to the terms of this Agreement.
“Studies” is defined in Section 2.3.1.
“Transfer of Membership Interests” is defined in Section 11.2.
“UST Act” is defined in Section 2.3.3.
“UST Regulations” is defined in Section 2.3.3.
“Zoning Application” is defined in Section 4.9.
“Zoning Commission” means the District of Columbia Zoning Commission.
1.2 Rules of Construction. Unless the context clearly indicates to the contrary, for all
purposes of this Agreement, (a) words importing the singular number include the plural number and
words importing the plural number include the singular number; (b) words of the masculine gender
include correlative words of the feminine and neuter genders; (c) words importing persons include
any Person; (d) any reference to a particular Section shall be to such Section of this Agreement; and
(e) any reference to a particular Exhibit shall be to such Exhibit to this Agreement; and to all sub-
exhibits related thereto (e.g., references to Exhibit A shall include Exhibit A-1, Exhibit A-2, etc.).
1.3 Other Definitions. When used with its initial letter(s) capitalized, any term which is
not defined in this Article I shall have the definition assigned to it elsewhere in this Agreement.
ARTICLE II
CONVEYANCE OF PROPERTY; PROJECT DEPOSIT; CONDITION OF PROPERTY
2.1 Conveyance of the Property; Purchase Price; Rent
2.1.1 Sale of the Office Parcel. Subject to and in accordance with the terms of
this Agreement and the Deed, District shall sell to Developer, and Developer shall purchase from
District, all of District’s right, title, and interest in and to the Office Parcel. The purchase price for
the Office Parcel is One Dollar and no cents ($1.00) (the “Purchase Price”), which shall be paid
by Developer at the First Closing in immediately available funds.
2.1.2 Lease of the Residential Parcel. Subject to and in accordance with the terms
of this Agreement and the Ground Lease, District shall ground lease the Residential Parcel to
Developer at First Closing for a period of ninety-nine (99) years. The annual rent under the Ground
Lease shall be One Dollar and no cents ($1.00) per year, payable in one lump sum of $99.00 at the
First Closing.
2.2 Project Deposit; Letters of Credit.
2.2.1 Project Deposit.
15

(a) As of the Effective Date, Developer has delivered to District an
Acceptable Letter of Credit in the amount of One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) (the
“Project Deposit”).
(b) The Project Deposit is not a payment on account of and shall not be
credited against the Purchase Price or any payment of rent required under the terms of the Ground
Lease; rather, the Project Deposit shall be held by District to be used as security to ensure
Developer’s compliance with this Agreement and may be drawn on by District in accordance with
the terms of this Agreement. The Project Deposit and any replacement Letters of Credit provided
under this Agreement is, or shall be, an Acceptable Letter of Credit. Notwithstanding any provision
herein to the contrary, District shall return the Project Deposit to Developer at the Second Closing.
2.2.2 Acceptable Letters of Credit.
(a) Each letter of credit delivered by Developer to District pursuant to
this Agreement shall be in the form attached hereto as Exhibit J and otherwise in form and
substance reasonably satisfactory to District, provided that such letter of credit shall be: (i) issued
by a commercial bank with an office located in the Washington, D.C. metropolitan area; (ii) made
payable to District; (iii) payable at sight upon presentment to a Washington, D.C. metropolitan
area branch or office of the issuer (or such other branch or office of the issuer as may be reasonably
acceptable to District) of a simple sight draft stating only that District is permitted to make such
draw on the letter of credit under the terms of this Agreement and setting forth the amount that
District is drawing; and (iv) of a term not less than one (1) year and shall on its face state that same
shall be renewed automatically, without the need for any further notice or amendment, for
successive minimum one-year periods, unless the issuer notifies District in writing, at least thirty
(30) days prior to the expiration date thereof, that such issuer has elected not to renew the letter of
credit. A letter of credit satisfying all of the requirements set forth above shall be an “Acceptable
Letter of Credit”.
(b) Developer shall ensure that the Acceptable Letter of Credit shall be
renewed (or automatically or unconditionally extended) from time to time until, (x) with respect
to the Project Deposit, thirty (30) days following the scheduled Second Closing Date, or (y) with
respect to the Performance Letter of Credit, the ninetieth (90th) day after the issuance of the District
Certificate of Final Completion for the Residential Component.
(c) Developer shall deliver to District a replacement Acceptable Letter
of Credit in the event of either (i) the Project Deposit will expire prior to the Closing Date or (ii)
if the issuer of the Acceptable Letter of Credit notifies District in writing that it will not renew the
same. Any such replacement Letter of Credit shall be delivered to District at least ten (10) days
prior to the expiration date of the expiring Acceptable Letter of Credit.
(d) In the event the issuer of any Acceptable Letter of Credit is insolvent
or is placed into receivership or conservatorship by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or
any successor or similar entity, or if a trustee, receiver, or liquidator is appointed for the insurer,
then, effective as of the date of such occurrence, said letter of credit shall no longer meet the
requirements of an Acceptable Letter of Credit, and, within ten (10) days thereof, Developer shall
deliver to District a replacement Acceptable Letter of Credit.
16

(e) If District draws any part of the Project Deposit without also
terminating this Agreement, Developer shall replenish the Project Deposit to its full amount within
ten (10) days following District’s draw on the Project Deposit.
(f) In the event Developer fails to deliver a replacement Acceptable
Letter of Credit pursuant to Section 2.2.2(c) or Section 2.2.2(d) or fails to replenish the Project
Deposit pursuant to Section 2.2.2(e), the same shall be a Developer Default hereunder, whereupon
District shall be entitled to draw on the Project Deposit in its full amount and terminate this
Agreement in accordance with Section 9.2(a).
2.3 Condition of Property.
2.3.1 Feasibility Studies; Access to Property.
(a) Developer hereby acknowledges that, prior to the Effective Date, it
has had the right to perform, or caused to be performed, Studies (as hereinafter defined) on the
Property using experts of its own choosing and to access the Property for the purposes of
performing Studies pursuant to the terms of that certain Right-of-Entry Agreement (the “ROE”)
by and between Developer and District, attached hereto as Exhibit M and incorporated herein.
From time to time prior to First Closing, provided this Agreement is in full force and effect and no
uncured Developer Default has occurred, Developer and Developer’s Agents shall continue to
have the right to enter the Property for purposes of conducting surveys, soil tests, environmental
studies, engineering tests, and such other tests, studies, and investigations (hereinafter “Studies”)
as Developer deems necessary or desirable to conduct due diligence and to evaluate the Property
pursuant to the terms of this Agreement and the terms and conditions of the ROE, as if such terms,
conditions, and agreements were expressly set forth herein. In the event of any conflict between
the terms of the ROE or the terms of this Agreement, the terms of this Agreement shall control and
be paramount.
(b) In the event that Developer or Developer’s Agents disturbs,
discovers, or removes any materials or waste on the Property while conducting the Studies, or
otherwise during its entry on the Property, which are determined to be Hazardous Materials,
Developer shall notify District and DOEE immediately after its discovery of such Hazardous
Materials. In the event such materials or waste are generated by or produced from the Property
while conducting the Studies or otherwise as a result of other activities of the Developer or
Developer’s Agents on the Property related to the Studies which are determined to be Hazardous
Materials (“Regulated Materials”), Developer shall submit a notice of a proposed plan
(“Remediation Plan”) to District and DOEE no later than fifteen (15) days after such Regulated
Materials are generated or produced. The Remediation Plan shall contain all identifying
information as to the type and condition of the Regulated Materials discovered, disturbed, or
intended to be removed, and a detailed account of the proposed remediation of the Regulated
Materials, including the name and location of the hazardous waste disposal site if the Regulated
Materials are being removed. DOEE may conduct an independent investigation of the Property,
including but not limited to, soil sampling and other environmental testing as may be deemed
necessary. Upon completion of DOEE’s investigation, District and/or DOEE shall notify
Developer of its findings and shall notify Developer by notice of its approval or disapproval of the
proposed Remediation Plan. In the event DOEE disapproves the proposed Remediation Plan,
17

Developer shall resubmit a revised Remediation Plan to District and DOEE. Developer shall seek
the advice and counsel of DOEE prior to any resubmission of a proposed Remediation Plan. Upon
review of the revised Remediation Plan, District or DOEE shall notify Developer of its decision.
Upon approval of the Remediation Plan, Developer shall undertake the remediation to address all
Regulated Materials in accordance with the approved Remediation Plan and all Applicable Law;
provided, however, Developer shall not be required to undertake the remediation of any Hazardous
Materials, other than the Regulated Materials, until after Closing. Within seven (7) Business Days
after the disposal of any Hazardous Materials, Developer shall provide District such written
evidence and receipts confirming the proper disposal of all Hazardous Materials removed from the
Property.
(c) Developer shall not have the right to object to any condition that
may be discovered, offset any amounts from the Purchase Price or rent payments, or terminate this
Agreement as a result of any Studies conducted after the Effective Date.
(d) In the event of a termination of this Agreement prior to Closing,
neither Developer nor any of Developer’s Agents shall have any continuing liability or obligations
regarding the Remediation Plan or the removal or remediation of any Hazardous Materials on the
Property, except for any Hazardous Materials introduced by Developer or Developer’s Agents or
Regulated Materials.
(e) Developer covenants and agrees that Developer shall keep
confidential all information obtained by Developer as to the condition of the Property; provided,
however, that (i) Developer may disclose such information to its Members, officers, directors,
attorneys, consultants, Settlement Agent, contractors and subcontractors, and potential lenders and
investors so long as Developer directs such parties to maintain such information as confidential;
and (ii) Developer may disclose such information as it may be legally compelled so to do. The
foregoing obligation of confidentiality shall not be applicable to any information which is a matter
of public record or, by its nature, necessarily available to the general public. This provision shall
survive Closing or the earlier termination of this Agreement.
(f) Developer shall indemnify and hold harmless District, its officials,
officers, employees, and agents from all liabilities, obligations, damages, penalties, claims, costs,
charges, and expenses (including reasonable attorneys’ fees), of whatsoever kind and nature for
injury, including personal injury or death of any person or persons, and for loss or damage to any
property occurring in connection with, or in any way arising out of the Developer or Developer’s
Agents use and occupancy of the Property during, and in the performance of, the Studies; provided,
however, the foregoing indemnity shall exclude any claims or liabilities caused by the gross
negligence or willful misconduct of District or its officials, officers, agents, employees, or
contractor, (ii) any damage, loss, claims or liabilities resulting from the mere discovery by
Developer or Developer’s Agents of any pre-existing condition on the Property extant as of the
Effective Date. This provision shall survive Closing or earlier termination of this Agreement.
2.3.2 Soil Characteristics. District hereby states that the soil on the Property has
been described by the Soil Conservation Service of the United States Department of Agriculture
in the Soil Survey of the District of Columbia and as shown on the Soil Maps as [Urban land, 0 to
8 percent slopes]. Developer acknowledges that, for further soil information, Developer can
18

contact a soil testing laboratory, DOEE, or the Natural Resources Conservation Service of the
United States Department of Agriculture. The foregoing is set forth pursuant to requirements
contained in D.C. Official Code § 42-608(b) and does not constitute a representation or warranty
by District.
2.3.3 Underground Storage Tanks. In accordance with the requirements of
Section 3(g) of the D.C. Underground Storage Tank Management Act of 1990, as amended by the
District of Columbia Underground Storage Tank Management Act of 1990 Amendment Act of
1992 (D.C. Official Code §§ 8-113.01 et seq.) (collectively, the “UST Act”) and the applicable
D.C. Underground Storage Tank Regulations, 20 DCMR Chapter 56 (the “UST Regulations”),
District’s Underground Storage Tank Disclosure Form is attached hereto as Exhibit P. Information
pertaining to underground storage tanks and underground storage tank removals of which the D.C.
Government has received notification is on file with DOEE, Underground Storage Tank Branch,
1200 First St., NE, 5th Floor, Washington, DC 20002, telephone (202) 535-2600. District’s
knowledge for purposes of this Section shall mean and be limited to the actual knowledge of the
Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development. The foregoing is set forth pursuant to
requirements contained in the UST Act and UST Regulations.
2.3.4 Heritage and Special Tree Requirements. District hereby states, and
Developer acknowledges and agrees, that if a “Heritage Tree” or “Special Tree” (as such terms are
defined in D.C. Official Code §8-651.02) exists on the Property as of the Effective Date,
Applicable Law restricts the removal of such trees.
2.3.5 AS-IS. OTHER THAN THE EXPRESS REPRESENTATIONS IN
SECTION 3.1, DISTRICT IS NOT MAKING, AND HAS NOT AT ANY TIME MADE, ANY
WARRANTIES OR REPRESENTATIONS OF ANY KIND OR CHARACTER, EXPRESS OR
IMPLIED, WITH RESPECT TO THE PROPERTY, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO,
ANY WARRANTIES OR REPRESENTATIONS AS TO HABITABILITY,
MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, TITLE, ZONING, TAX
CONSEQUENCES, LATENT OR PATENT PHYSICAL OR ENVIRONMENTAL
CONDITION, UTILITIES, OPERATING HISTORY OR PROJECTIONS, VALUATION,
GOVERNMENTAL APPROVALS, THE COMPLIANCE OF THE PROPERTY WITH LAWS,
THE TRUTH, ACCURACY, OR COMPLETENESS OF ANY DOCUMENTS OR OTHER
INFORMATION PERTAINING TO THE PROPERTY, THE STATUS OF ANY LITIGATION
OR OTHER MATTER, OR ANY OTHER INFORMATION PROVIDED BY OR ON BEHALF
OF DISTRICT TO DEVELOPER, OR ANY OTHER MATTER OR THING REGARDING THE
PROPERTY. DEVELOPER ACKNOWLEDGES AND AGREES, THAT UPON CLOSING,
DISTRICT SHALL SELL OR LEASE TO DEVELOPER AND DEVELOPER SHALL ACCEPT
THE PARCELS, “AS IS, WHERE IS, WITH ALL FAULTS.” FURTHER, DEVELOPMENT
OF THE PROPERTY IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS AGREEMENT AND THE
CONSTRUCTION COVENANT SHALL BE “AS IS, WHERE IS, WITH ALL FAULTS.”
DEVELOPER IS ADVISED THAT MOLD AND/OR OTHER MICROSCOPIC ORGANISMS
MAY EXIST AT THE PROPERTY AND THAT MOLD AND/OR OTHER MICROSCOPIC
ORGANISMS MAY CAUSE PHYSICAL INJURIES, INCLUDING, WITHOUT LIMITATION,
ALLERGIC REACTIONS, RESPIRATORY REACTIONS OR OTHER PROBLEMS,
PARTICULARLY IN PERSONS WITH IMMUNE SYSTEM PROBLEMS, YOUNG
CHILDREN, AND ELDERLY PERSONS. OTHER THAN THE EXPRESS
19

REPRESENTATIONS MADE BY DISTRICT IN SECTION 3.1, DEVELOPER HAS NOT
RELIED, AND WILL NOT RELY ON, AND DISTRICT IS NOT LIABLE FOR OR BOUND
BY, ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, GUARANTIES, STATEMENTS,
REPRESENTATIONS, OR INFORMATION PERTAINING TO THE PROPERTY OR
RELATING THERETO MADE OR FURNISHED BY DISTRICT, ANY MANAGER OF THE
PROPERTY, OR ANY AGENT REPRESENTING OR PURPORTING TO REPRESENT
DISTRICT, TO WHOMEVER MADE OR GIVEN, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, ORALLY
OR IN WRITING. DEVELOPER REPRESENTS TO DISTRICT THAT DEVELOPER HAS
HAD THE OPPORTUNITY TO CONDUCT, AND/OR HAS CONDUCTED, SUCH
INVESTIGATIONS OF THE PROPERTY, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE
PHYSICAL AND ENVIRONMENTAL CONDITIONS THEREOF, AS DEVELOPER DEEMS
NECESSARY TO SATISFY ITSELF AS TO THE CONDITION OF THE PROPERTY AND
THE EXISTENCE OR NONEXISTENCE OR CURATIVE ACTION TO BE TAKEN WITH
RESPECT TO ANY MOLD, FUNGI, VIRAL OR BACTERIAL MATTER, HAZARDOUS
MATERIALS, OR TOXIC SUBSTANCES ON OR DISCHARGED FROM THE PROPERTY,
AND WILL RELY SOLELY UPON SAME AND NOT UPON ANY INFORMATION
PROVIDED BY OR ON BEHALF OF DISTRICT OR ITS AGENTS OR EMPLOYEES WITH
RESPECT THERETO. DEVELOPER SHALL ASSUME THE RISK THAT ADVERSE
MATTERS, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, CONSTRUCTION DEFECTS AND
ADVERSE PHYSICAL AND ENVIRONMENTAL CONDITIONS (INCLUDING MOLD,
FUNGI, VIRAL OR BACTERIAL MATTER, HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, RADIOLOGICAL
CONDITIONS OR ITEMS, OR TOXIC SUBSTANCES), MAY NOT HAVE BEEN
REVEALED BY DEVELOPER’S INVESTIGATIONS, AND DEVELOPER SHALL BE
DEEMED TO HAVE WAIVED, RELINQUISHED, AND RELEASED DISTRICT FROM AND
AGAINST ANY AND ALL CLAIMS, DEMANDS, CAUSES OF ACTION (INCLUDING
CAUSES OF ACTION IN TORT), LOSSES, DAMAGES, LIABILITIES, COSTS, AND
EXPENSES (INCLUDING ATTORNEYS’ FEES AND COURT COSTS) OF ANY AND
EVERY KIND OR CHARACTER, KNOWN OR UNKNOWN, WHICH MIGHT HAVE BEEN
ASSERTED OR ALLEGED AGAINST DISTRICT AT ANY TIME BY REASON OF OR
ARISING OUT OF ANY LATENT OR PATENT CONSTRUCTION DEFECTS OR PHYSICAL
CONDITIONS, VIOLATIONS OF ANY LAWS (INCLUDING, WITHOUT LIMITATION,
ANY ENVIRONMENTAL LAWS), AND ANY AND ALL OTHER ACTS, OMISSIONS,
EVENTS, CIRCUMSTANCES, OR MATTERS REGARDING THE PROPERTY.
DEVELOPER AGREES THAT SHOULD ANY CLEANUP, REMEDIATION, OR REMOVAL
OF MOLD, FUNGI, VIRAL OR BACTERIAL MATTER, HAZARDOUS MATERIALS,
TOXIC SUBSTANCES, OR OTHER ENVIRONMENTAL CONDITIONS ON THE
PROPERTY BE REQUIRED FROM AND AFTER THE CLOSING, OR EARLIER IF CAUSED
BY DEVELOPER, SUCH CLEAN-UP, REMOVAL, OR REMEDIATION SHALL BE THE
RESPONSIBILITY OF AND SHALL BE PERFORMED AT THE SOLE COST AND EXPENSE
OF DEVELOPER. DISTRICT SHALL HAVE NO RESPONSIBILITY TO PREPARE THE
PROPERTY IN ANY WAY FOR DEVELOPMENT AT ANY TIME.
2.4 Title.
2.4.1 Developer hereby acknowledges that it has reviewed the title to the Property
and conducted any survey studies of the Property and has deemed the same acceptable, subject
only to the Permitted Exceptions.
20

2.4.2 At the First Closing, District shall convey fee simple title to the Office
Parcel and convey the leasehold interest in the Residential Parcel subject to the Permitted
Exceptions. The “Permitted Exceptions” shall be the following collectively: (i) all title and
survey matters, encumbrances or exceptions of record as of the Effective Date; (ii) encroachments,
overlaps, boundary disputes, or other matters which would be disclosed by an accurate survey or
an inspection of the Property as of the Effective Date; (iii) any documents described in this
Agreement that are to be recorded in the Land Records pursuant to the terms of this Agreement;
(iv) defects or exceptions to title to the extent such defects or exceptions are created by Developer
or Developer’s Agents or created as a result of or in connection with the use of or activities on the
Property or any portion thereof by Developer or Developer’s Agents; (v) all building, zoning, and
other Applicable Law affecting the Property; (vi) any easements, rights-of-way, exceptions and
other matters required in order to obtain necessary approvals from Governmental Authorities for
the Project; and (vii) any matter to which Developer has objected, District is unable or unwilling
to cure, and Developer elects to proceed to the First Closing pursuant to Section 2.4.3.
2.4.3 From and after the Effective Date through the First Closing, District agrees
not to take any action that would cause a material adverse change to the status of title to the
Property existing as of the Effective Date, without the approval of Developer, which approval shall
not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned, or delayed, except as expressly required by Applicable
Law or permitted by this Agreement.
2.4.4 Developer may, no later than ninety (90) days prior to the First Closing Date
and again any time thereafter prior to the First Closing update title and survey and notify District
in writing of any material adverse changes to the status of title to or survey matters with respect to
the Parcels that occurred after the Effective Date as a direct result of action by (or the failure to act
of) District; provided that such notification to District shall be given promptly and may only
include new title or survey matters that arise within one hundred and twenty (120) days of the First
Closing Date. With respect to any objections to title or survey set forth in such notice, District shall
have the right, but not the obligation, to cure such objections. Within ten (10) Business Days after
receipt of Developer’s notice of objections, District shall notify Developer in writing whether
District elects to attempt to cure such objections. If District fails to timely give Developer such
notice of election, then District shall be deemed to have elected not to attempt to cure such matters.
If District elects to attempt to cure, District shall have until the First Closing Date to attempt to
remove, satisfy or cure the same and for this purpose District shall be entitled to a reasonable
adjournment of First Closing if additional time is required, but in no event shall the adjournment
exceed sixty (60) days after the scheduled First Closing Date (but in no event later than the Outside
Closing Date). If District elects not to cure any objections specified in Developer’s notice, or if
District is unable to effect a cure prior to the First Closing, Developer shall have the following
options: (i) to proceed to the First Closing and accept the conveyance of the Parcels subject to the
Permitted Exceptions, in which event Developer shall be obligated to develop the Parcels in
accordance with this Agreement and the Construction Covenant, or (ii) to terminate this
Agreement by sending notice thereof to District, and upon delivery of such notice of termination,
this Agreement shall terminate, the Project Deposit shall be returned to Developer and thereafter
neither Party hereto shall have any further rights, obligations or liabilities hereunder except to the
extent that any right, obligation or liability set forth herein expressly survives termination of this
Agreement. In the event District provides notice (or is deemed to have provided such notice) to
Developer that District does not intend to attempt to cure any objection, or if, having commenced
21

to attempt to cure any objection, District later provides notice to Developer that District will be
unable to effect a cure thereof, Developer shall, within five (5) Business Days after such notice
has been given, provide notice to District whether Developer shall elect to accept conveyance
under clause (i) or to terminate this Agreement under clause (ii). In the event Developer does not
provide notice to District within such five (5) Business Day period, then Developer shall be
deemed to have elected to accept the conveyance under clause (i).
2.5 Risk of Loss. No casualty prior to Closing to all or any portion of the existing
improvements on the Property (if any) shall excuse Developer from its obligation to proceed to
Closing hereunder, but neither Developer nor District shall have any obligation to rebuild or restore
any existing improvements damaged by such casualty.
2.6 Condemnation.
2.6.1 Notice. If, prior to any Closing, any condemnation or eminent domain
proceedings shall be commenced by any other competent public authority against any Parcel,
District shall promptly give Developer notice thereof.
2.6.2 Total Taking. In the event of a taking of the entire Property prior to the
First Closing: (a) District shall return the Project Deposit to Developer, (b) this Agreement shall
terminate, and the Parties shall be released from any and all rights, obligations and liabilities
hereunder (unless such rights, obligations, and liabilities expressly survive termination pursuant to
this Agreement), and (c) District shall have the right to receive any and all condemnation proceeds.
2.6.3 Partial Taking. In the event of a partial taking of the Property prior to First
Closing, District and Developer shall jointly determine in good faith whether the development of
the Project remains physically and economically feasible. If the Parties reasonably determine that
the Project is no longer feasible, whether physically or economically, as a result of such
condemnation, this Agreement shall terminate, and District will return the Project Deposit to
Developer, the Parties shall be released from any further liability or obligation hereunder, except
as expressly provided otherwise herein, and District shall have the right to collect all condemnation
proceeds. If the Parties jointly determine that the Project remains economically and physically
feasible, the Parties shall be deemed to have elected to proceed to First Closing with respect to the
portions of the Property not subject to the condemnation, and Developer shall accept the Property
without any adjustment to the Purchase Price or rent due under the Ground Lease. In no event shall
District (as the seller hereunder, as opposed to as the condemning authority) have any liability or
obligation to make any payment to Developer with respect to any such condemnation. In the event
that within forty-five (45) days after the date of receipt by District of notice of such condemnation
the Parties have not jointly determined, in accordance with the foregoing provisions, to elect to
terminate or proceed to First Closing hereunder, such failure shall be deemed the Parties’ election
to terminate this Agreement, and the termination provisions of this Section 2.6.3 shall apply.
2.7 Service Contracts and Leases; Temporary Licensees. Except as provided for in
Section 2.8, District has not and will not hereafter procure or enter into any (i) service,
management, maintenance, or development contracts, or (ii) lease, license, easement, or other
occupancy agreements affecting any Parcels that will survive the First Closing. Notwithstanding
the above, District may enter into licenses to third parties for temporary use of the Property, upon
22

such terms as may be agreed to by District, which licenses shall be terminable by District upon
thirty (30) days’ advance notice to such licensees. Such licenses shall not contain any provisions
that will survive the First Closing without the approval of Developer. District shall terminate any
existing agreement(s) referred to in subsections (i) and (ii) above so all terminations are effective
prior to or at the First Closing.
2.8 Air Rights Parcel and Air Rights Lease.
2.8.1 Developer acknowledges and agrees that the Air Rights Parcel is
encumbered with the Air Rights Lease. Pursuant to Sections 2.8.2 and 2.8.3: (i) Developer intends
to enter into a Purchase and Sale Agreement to acquire the Air Rights Lessee’s leasehold interest
in the Air Rights Parcel on or before First Closing; (ii) close on the acquisition of the Air Rights
Lessee’s leasehold interest in the Air Rights Parcel on or before the Second Closing;3 and (iii)
construct the Residential Component on the Residential Parcel, inclusive of the Air Rights Parcel.
If Developer has not entered into a Purchase and Sale Agreement with the Air Rights Lessee by
the First Closing, the Air Rights Lease will be assigned to and assumed by Developer in connection
with the First Closing pursuant to the Assignment and Assumption of Air Rights Lease; provided
that if the Air Rights Lessee does not attorn to Developer as the landlord, the Air Rights Parcel
shall be excluded from the Ground Lease. If the Air Rights Parcel is excluded from the Ground
Lease at the First Closing, District may lease the Air Rights Parcel to Developer, at the then fair
market value determined by a MAI appraisal, at the expiration or earlier termination of the Air
Rights Lease pursuant to the terms of the Ground Lease, which shall include a requirement that if
the Air Rights Parcel is leased to the Developer, any Residential Units shall be constructed in
accordance with then Applicable Laws with respect to Affordable Units. The Assignment and
Assumption of Air Rights Lease shall provide that the Air Rights Lease shall be re-assigned to
District in the event the Ground Lease is terminated.
2.8.2 Developer shall use best efforts to pursue the acquisition of the leasehold
interest in the Air Rights Parcel. Developer shall, at a minimum, undertake the following activities
in furtherance of its efforts to pursue such acquisition:
(a) Obtain an appraisal from an MAI designated appraiser to determine the fair
market value of the leasehold interest in the Air Rights Parcel, which appraisal’s scope of work
shall be provided to DMPED for review and approval, not to be unreasonably withheld,
conditioned, or delayed, prior to Developer commissioning the appraisal. Developer shall provide
District with a copy of the final MAI Appraisal; and
(b) Make a minimum of three commercially reasonable and distinct offers
(“Offers”) to the Air Rights Lessee to acquire said leasehold interest, which Offers shall also be
provided to District. An Offer that includes a purchase price within 15% (higher or lower) of the
MAI appraisal will be deemed commercially reasonable. Each Offer will be evidenced by a non-
binding letter of intent (the “LOI”) and shall be materially different in terms of one or more deal
3 Note: Ground Lease will include provisions regarding Air Rights Lease assignment or acquisition, as
applicable, by Developer at Second Closing.
23

terms, which may include, but not be limited to, meaningful changes in price, the amount and
timing of earnest monies and portion at-risk, or equity participation in lieu of buyer cash proceeds.
All Offers must be made within nine (9) months of the effective date of the Act. If Air Rights
Lessee has not accepted the final Offer within twelve (12) months of the effective date of the Act,
Developer shall inform District that they intend to proceed with the Development Plan (option B).
2.8.3 If Developer and Air Rights Lessee have agreed upon the terms for
Developer’s acquisition of the leasehold interest in the Air Rights Lease, Developer and Air Rights
Lessee will execute a purchase and sale agreement (“Purchase and Sale Agreement”) in
accordance with the agreed upon terms, a copy of which shall be provided to District immediately
thereafter.
ARTICLE III
REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES
3.1 Representations and Warranties of District.
3.1.1 District hereby represents and warrants to Developer as follows:
(a) District (i) has all requisite right, power, and authority to execute
and deliver this Agreement and to perform its obligations under this Agreement and (ii) has taken
all necessary action to authorize the execution, delivery, and performance of this Agreement. This
Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by District, and constitutes the legal, valid, and
binding obligation of District, enforceable against it in accordance with its terms. The Person
signing this Agreement on behalf of District is authorized to do so.
(b) No agent, broker, or other Person acting pursuant to express or
implied authority of District is entitled to any commission or finder’s fee in connection with the
transactions contemplated by this Agreement or will be entitled to make any claim against
Developer for a commission or finder’s fee. District has not dealt with any agent or broker in
connection with the conveyance of the Property.
(c) There is no litigation, arbitration, condemnation, administrative, or
other similar proceeding pending, or, to the current actual knowledge of District, threatened against
District, which relates to the Property. There is no other litigation, arbitration, administrative
proceeding, or other similar proceeding pending or, to District’s current actual knowledge,
threatened against District which, if decided adversely to District, would impair District’s ability
to perform its obligations under this Agreement.
(d) The execution, delivery, and performance of this Agreement by
District and the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby do not violate any of the
terms, conditions, or provisions of any judgment, order, injunction, decree, regulation, or ruling of
any court or other Governmental Authority, or Applicable Law, to which District is subject, or any
agreement or contract to which District is a party or to which it is subject.
24

3.1.2 Survival. The representations and warranties contained in Section 3.1.1
shall survive the First Closing for a period of one (1) year. District shall have no liability or
obligation hereunder for any representation or warranty that becomes untrue because of reasons
beyond District’s control, but District shall promptly notify Developer upon learning of same.
3.2 Representations and Warranties of Developer.
3.2.1 Developer hereby covenants, represents, and warrants to District as follows:
(a) Developer is a limited liability company, duly formed and validly
existing and in good standing, and has full power and authority under, the laws of the District of
Columbia to conduct the business in which it is now engaged.
(b) Attached as Exhibit Q is a true, accurate, and complete
organizational structure chart of Developer showing all Members and their respective ownership
interests in Developer. Neither Developer, any Member of Developer, nor any Person owning
directly or indirectly any interest in Developer or any Member is a Prohibited Person. As of the
Effective Date, Developer has provided the District with an additional true, accurate and complete
organizational chart reflecting NAACP Investments membership in RUSH JV.
(c) The execution, delivery, and performance of this Agreement and the
consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby have been duly and validly authorized by
Developer and Managing Member of Developer. Upon the due execution and delivery of this
Agreement by Developer, this Agreement constitutes the valid and binding obligation of
Developer, enforceable in accordance with its terms.
(d) The execution, delivery, and performance of this Agreement and the
consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby do not violate any of the terms, conditions,
or provisions of: (i) Developer’s organizational documents, (ii) any judgment, order, injunction,
decree, regulation, or ruling of any court or other Governmental Authority, or Applicable Law to
which Developer or Managing Member is subject, or (iii) any agreement or contract to which
Developer is a party or to which it is subject.
(e) No agent, broker, or other Person acting pursuant to express or
implied authority of Developer is entitled to any commission or finder’s fee in connection with the
transactions contemplated by this Agreement or will be entitled to make any claim against District
for a commission or finder’s fee. Developer has not dealt with any agent or broker in connection
with its purchase or other acquisition of the Property.
(f) There is no litigation, arbitration, administrative, or other similar
proceeding pending or, to Developer’s knowledge, threatened against Developer that, if decided
adversely to Developer, would (i) impair Developer’s ability to enter into and perform its
obligations under this Agreement or (ii) materially adversely affect the financial condition or
operations of Developer.
(g) Developer’s acquisition of the Property and its other undertakings
pursuant to this Agreement are for the purpose of constructing and operating the Improvements in
25

accordance with the Development Plan and the Approved Plans and Specifications and not for
speculation in land holding.
(h) Neither Developer nor any of its Members is the subject debtor
under any federal, state, or local bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding, or any other proceeding for
dissolution, liquidation, or winding up of its assets.
(i) Attached as Exhibit T are the Equitable Inclusion Priority Forms
(“Equitable Inclusion Forms”) Developer completed and submitted with its response as part of
District’s solicitation for the disposition of the Property. The information contained in the
Equitable Inclusion Forms is true, accurate, and complete.
3.2.2 Survival. The representations and warranties contained in Section 3.2.1
shall be updated and restated as of the First Closing and the Second Closing, and (i) with respect
to the Office Parcel, shall survive First Closing for a period of one (1) year and (ii) with respect to
the Residential Parcel, shall survive Second Closing for a period of one (1) year. Developer shall
have no liability or obligation hereunder for any representation or warranty that becomes untrue
because of reasons beyond Developer’s control, but Developer shall promptly notify District upon
learning of same.
ARTICLE IV
APPROVAL OF CONSTRUCTION PLANS AND SPECIFICATIONS AND OTHER
SUBMISSIONS
4.1 Construction Plans and Specifications.
4.1.1 Developer’s Submissions for the Project. Developer shall submit to District
for District’s review and approval the Construction Plans and Specifications for the Improvements
for each Component within the timeframes set forth on the Schedule of Performance. All
Construction Plans and Specifications shall be prepared and completed in accordance with this
Agreement and the Development Plan.
4.1.2 Requirements for Construction Plans and Specifications. Notwithstanding
anything to the contrary herein, prior to the issuance of any Permit by a Governmental Authority,
Developer shall cause the Construction Plans and Specifications applicable to such Permit to
become Approved Plans and Specifications pursuant to Section 4.2. All of the Construction Plans
and Specifications shall conform to and be consistent with Applicable Law, including the
applicable zoning requirements, and shall comply with the following:
(a) The Construction Plans and Specifications shall be prepared or
supervised and signed by the Architect or engineer as appropriate.
(b) A structural, geotechnical, and civil engineer, as applicable, who is
licensed by the District of Columbia, shall review and certify all final foundation and grading
designs.
26

(c) Upon Developer’s submission of all Construction Plans and
Specifications to District for the applicable Component, the Architect shall certify (with standard
professional language reasonably acceptable to District) that the Improvements have been
designed in accordance with all Applicable Law relating to accessibility for persons with
disabilities.
4.1.3 Progress Meetings. During the preparation of the Construction Plans and
Specifications, District’s staff and Developer shall hold periodic progress meetings (“Progress
Meetings”), during which meetings Developer and designated representatives of District and other
District staff shall coordinate the preparation, submission, and review of the Construction Plans
and Specifications, as well as any other pending matters involving the Project, including, without
limitation, the status of Developer’s activities regarding the Community Participation Program.
4.2 District Review and Approval of Construction Plans and Specifications.
4.2.1 Generally. District shall have the right to review and approve or
disapprove all or any part of each of the Construction Plans and Specifications, which approval
shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned, or delayed; provided such Construction Plans and
Specifications are consistent with the Development Plan, the Concept Plans, and with the
information exchanged in Progress Meetings and are in accordance with the requirements of the
terms herein and Applicable Law. Any Construction Plans and Specifications approved (or any
approved portions thereof) pursuant to this Section 4.2 shall be “Approved Plans and
Specifications”.
4.2.2 Time Period for District Review and Approval. District shall complete its
review of each submission of Construction Plans and Specifications and provide a written response
thereto within thirty (30) days after its receipt of the same (the thirty (30) day review period may
be referred to herein as the “Review Period”). If District fails to respond with its written response
to a submission of any Construction Plans and Specifications within the Review Period, Developer
shall notify District, in writing, of District’s failure to respond by delivering to District a Second
Notice. Failure of District to respond within fifteen (15) Business Days after its receipt of the
Second Notice shall constitute and shall be deemed to be District approval of the applicable
Construction Plans and Specifications.
4.2.3 Disapproval Notices. Any notice of disapproval (“Disapproval Notice”)
delivered to Developer by District shall state the basis for such disapproval in reasonably sufficient
detail so as to enable Developer to respond to District. If District issues a Disapproval Notice,
Developer shall have a period of time equal to the Resubmission Period to revise the Construction
Plans and Specifications to address the comments of District and shall resubmit the revised
Construction Plans and Specifications for approval by District prior to the expiration of such
Resubmission Period. District shall complete its review of such revised Construction Plans and
Specifications and provide written response thereto within the Review Period, which Review
Period shall commence the day following District’s receipt of such revised Construction Plans and
Specifications from Developer. If District fails to notify Developer of its approval or disapproval
of such revised Construction Plans and Specifications within the Review Period, Developer may
provide a written Second Notice to District with respect to such revised Construction Plans and
Specifications. Failure of District to respond within fifteen (15) Business Days after its receipt of
27

the Second Notice shall constitute and shall be deemed to be District approval of the revised
Construction Plans and Specifications. The provisions of this Section 4.2 relating to approval,
disapproval, and resubmission of any Construction Plans and Specifications shall continue to apply
until such Construction Plans and Specifications (and each component thereof) have been
approved by District. In no event will District’s failure to respond to any submission of
Construction Plans and Specifications be deemed an approval except as otherwise expressly set
forth in this Section 4.2. Any Construction Plans and Specifications or portions thereof may not
be later disapproved by District unless any disapproval and revision is mutually agreed upon by
the Parties. District’s review of any Construction Plans and Specifications that is responsive to a
Disapproval Notice shall be limited to the matters disapproved by District as set forth in the
Disapproval Notice but shall not be so limited with regard to any new matters shown on such
Construction Plans and Specifications that were not included or indicated on any prior
Construction Plans and Specifications.
4.2.4 No Representation; No Liability. District’s review and approval of the
Construction Plans and Specifications is not and shall not be construed as a representation or other
assurance that they comply with any building codes, regulations, or standards, including, without
limitation, building, engineering, and structural design or any other Applicable Law. District shall
incur no liability in connection with its review of any Construction Plans and Specifications and
is reviewing such Construction Plans and Specifications solely for the purpose of ensuring that the
Construction Plans and Specifications are consistent with the Development Plan and in accordance
with the terms of this Agreement.
4.3 Changes in Construction Plans and Specifications; Government Required Changes.
4.3.1 No Material Changes. Once approved, Developer may make changes to the
Approved Plans and Specifications without the prior approval of, but with notice to, District,
provided such changes are (a) consistent with Applicable Law and (b) not Material Changes. Such
notice shall specifically identify the changes made and shall include any modifications to the
Project Budget as a result of such changes. Developer shall not make any Material Changes to the
Approved Plans and Specifications without District’s prior written approval, except those changes
required by a Governmental Authority pursuant to Section 4.3.2. If Developer desires to make any
Material Changes to the Approved Plans and Specifications, Developer shall submit in writing the
proposed changes to District for approval, including a written description of the Material Change
and the modified Constructions Plans and Specifications with notations highlighting such Material
Change. The procedures set forth in Section 4.2 shall apply to District’s review and approval (or
disapproval) of any such proposed Material Changes in the same manner as if the submission of
such proposed Material Change was the Submission of the original Construction Plans and
Specifications for District’s review. In the event Developer makes a Material Change to the
Construction Plans and Specifications but does not comply with the procedures in this Section
4.3.1, such Material Change shall be deemed disapproved, notwithstanding the inclusion of the
Material Change in a subsequently submitted Construction Plans and Specifications receiving
approval by District.
4.3.2 Government Required Changes. Notwithstanding any other provision of
this Agreement to the contrary, District acknowledges and agrees that District shall not withhold
its approval (if otherwise required by the terms of this Agreement) of any elements contained in
28

proposed changes to Approved Plans and Specifications that are required by any Governmental
Authority; provided however, that (i) District shall have been afforded a reasonable opportunity to
discuss such element of, or change in, the submission with the Governmental Authority requiring
such element or change and with the Architect, (ii) the Architect shall have reasonably cooperated
with District and such Governmental Authority in seeking such reasonable modifications of the
required element or change as District shall deem reasonably necessary, and (iii) such element or
change is consistent with Applicable Law. Developer and District each agree to use diligent, good
faith efforts to resolve District’s approval of such elements or changes, and District’s request for
reasonable modifications to such elements or changes required by a Governmental Authority, as
soon as reasonably possible and in no event later than ten (10) Business Days after the submission
of the applicable Construction Plans and Specifications or Approved Plans and Specifications.
Developer shall promptly notify District of any changes required by a Governmental Authority
whether before or during construction.
4.4 Project Professionals.
4.4.1 Approval of Project Professionals.
(a) Any Person that Developer proposes for any of the following
Persons, and the contracts with such Persons, shall be subject to District’s approval, which
approval shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned, or delayed: (i) the Architect; (ii) the
Contractor; and (iii) any replacement of either of the foregoing.
(b) District’s review of any proposed Person under this Section 4.4.1
shall be limited to whether the Person (i) reasonably has the experience and technical qualifications
to provide the services required and (ii) is not a Prohibited Person.
(c) Developer shall submit documentation as to the identity of the
applicable Project professional and a copy of the proposed contract with such Project professional
(i) with respect to the Architect, within thirty (30) days after the Effective Date, (ii) with respect
to the Contractor, on or before the date set forth on the Schedule of Performance, but in no event
later than thirty (30) days prior to the applicable Closing, and (iii) with respect to the Architect,
the Contractor, or any replacement of either of the foregoing, in any event prior to Developer
signing the contract with such Project professional in connection with the applicable Component.
Upon execution of the contract with the Architect and the Construction Contract, Developer shall
provide to District a copy of such executed contracts.
4.4.2 Copies of Contracts. Upon District’s request, Developer shall provide to
District copies of the contracts with any Persons providing materials or services with respect to
each Component.
4.4.3 No Prohibited Persons. No Person who is a Prohibited Person shall be
engaged as contractor or a subcontractor or otherwise provide materials or services with respect to
the Project.
4.5 Retail Plan. Prior to Closing for a Parcel in which retail uses are planned, Developer
shall submit to District for District’s review and approval, which shall not be unreasonably
withheld, conditioned, or delayed, a retail strategy and marketing plan for the retail component of
29

the Improvements for the applicable Component (the “Retail Plan”).The Retail Plan shall: (i)
prioritize community serving retail and opportunities for local and culturally rooted businesses,
and (ii) outline how the Component will dedicate approximately 8,000 square feet of retail space
at below market rents for non-profit and local business tenants who are often priced out of new
mixed-use developments
4.6 Community Participation Program. No later than ninety (90) days after the Effective
Date, Developer shall provide District a description of Developer’s program for public
involvement, education, and outreach with respect to the Project (including input from the
community that is impacted by the Project as it is designed, developed, constructed, and operated)
(the “Community Participation Program”), including a plan for implementing the Community
Participation Program and shall include, without limitation, the organization(s) with whom
Developer proposes to discuss the Project, a schedule for public meetings and the type of
information that Developer proposes to submit to the public. The Community Participation
Program shall include a mechanism to document all public meetings, including a narrative
description of (a) the events of each meeting, (b) the concerns raised by members of the public,
and (c) Developer’s responses to such concerns. Developer shall submit such documentation of
each public meeting to District and shall, at each Progress Meeting, otherwise include a summary
of Developer’s activities with respect to, and in furtherance of, the Community Participation
Program at each Progress Meeting.
4.7 Construction Consultant. At least thirty (30) days prior to the applicable Closing,
Developer shall appoint a construction consultant, who may be the construction consultant
engaged by the senior construction lender, for supervision of construction of the Improvements
reasonably approved by District (the “Construction Consultant”) and provide written
confirmation from the Construction Consultant that it will provide a report to District in
accordance with this Section 4.7. The Construction Consultant shall review and report, in writing,
to the Parties on a monthly basis on the following matters: (a) the construction documents relating
to the construction of the Improvements and the conformity of such matters to the Approved Plans
and Specifications, (b) the construction of the Improvements and the conformity of such
construction to the Approved Plans and Specifications, (c) the schedule and costs of construction
and the conformity of the current construction progress with the Schedule of Performance and the
Final Project Budget, (d) any change orders for the Improvements, and (e) any other issues relating
to the Project. The Construction Consultant shall provide regular written status updates and
promptly report, in writing, any issues to District and Developer. If the Construction Consultant
determines there is a non-conformity with the Approved Plans and Specifications or a deviation
from the Schedule of Performance or Final Project Budget, District may require Developer to
propose and adopt a recovery and modification plan that is reasonably satisfactory to the
Construction Consultant and District. In addition, the Construction Consultant shall provide such
certifications as are required in the Construction Covenant. The Construction Consultant’s time,
expenses, reports, and certification shall be at Developer’s sole cost and expense.
4.8 Project Funding Plan; Project Budget.
4.8.1 Project Funding Plan. As of the Effective Date, Developer has provided District
its initial funding plan describing the sources and uses of funds for the Components, broken down
by Parcel, and the methods for obtaining such funds (including lending sources), which plan is
30

attached hereto as Exhibit N (such plan, as may be modified from time to time in accordance with
this Agreement being the “Project Funding Plan”). Any funding source set forth in the Project
Funding Plan that includes District sources of funding or subsidy shall be subject to the applicable
District agency’s review and approval.
4.8.2 Project Budget. As of the Effective Date, Developer has provided District
its initial Project Budget describing the expenditure of direct and indirect costs for the
Components, delineated by Parcel, which shall include a cost itemization prepared by Developer
specifying all “hard” and “soft” costs (direct and indirect) by item, including (i) the costs of all
labor, materials, and services necessary for each Component and (ii) all other expenses anticipated
by Developer incident to each Component (including, without limitation, anticipated interest on
all financing, taxes, and insurance costs) and the construction thereof (such budget, as may be
modified from time to time in accordance with this Agreement being the “Project Budget”). The
Project Budget is attached hereto as Exhibit O. Any project costs set forth in the Project Budget
that anticipates District sources of funding or subsidy shall be subject to the applicable District
agency’s review and approval.
4.8.3 Final Project Budget and Funding Plan. On or before the date set forth on
the Schedule of Performance, Developer shall provide District with a revised Project Budget and
Project Funding Plan and such supporting documentation as District may reasonably request. In
addition, Developer shall deliver to District copies of the Project Budget and Project Funding Plan,
and any updates thereto, that are submitted to the providers of the Equity Investment, Debt
Financing, and the Additional Funding Sources. Developer shall further modify the Project Budget
and Project Funding Plan as to the applicable Component (i) upon receipt of the Financing
Commitments and (ii) within sixty (60) days but no later than thirty (30) days prior to the
applicable Closing. Upon District’s approval of the modified Project Budget and Project Funding
Plan submitted pursuant to clause (ii), such modified Project Budget and Project Funding Plan
shall be the “Final Project Budget” and “Final Project Funding Plan”, respectively. Each Final
Project Budget and Final Project Funding Plan shall be substantially similar to the budget and
financing plans submitted to, and approved by, the providers of the Equity Investment and Debt
Financing for the applicable Component.
4.8.4 First Closing Residential Component Project Funding Plan and First
Closing Residential Component Project Budget. The Parties acknowledge and agree that the
Project Funding Plan and Project Budget attached hereto for the Residential Component are
speculative and based on 2026 market conditions. Developer acknowledges and agrees that the
Project Funding Plan for the Residential Component includes proposed District sources of funding
or subsidy and does not create an obligation or commitment by District to approve or provide such
funding or subsidy. At the First Closing, Developer agrees to provide a modified Project Funding
Plan and Project Budget for the Residential Component (respectively “First Closing Residential
Component Project Funding Plan and First Closing Residential Component Project
Budget”), based on its Construction Drawings, which will serve as a basis for District to determine
the District sources of funding or subsidy for the Residential Component.
4.9 Zoning Commission. In order to undertake the Residential Component in
accordance with the Development Plan (option A or option B), Developer will need to seek
approval of a PUD or Map Amendment from the Zoning Commission. Prior to submission of such
31

application (a “Zoning Application”) to the D.C. Office of Zoning, Developer shall submit its
draft Zoning Application to District for District’s review and approval in accordance with Section
7.2. Any submissions in support of the Zoning Application shall be consistent with the
Development Plan and this Agreement, and any Construction Plans and Specifications submitted
therewith shall be approved by District as Approved Plans and Specifications prior to such
submission. Once approved by District, Developer shall not modify the Zoning Application
without District’s prior approval. Developer acknowledges and agrees that it will seek approval of
the Zoning Application whether or not Developer has entered into a Purchase and Sale Agreement
to acquire the Air Rights Lessee’s leasehold interest in the Air Rights Parcel.
4.10 Zoning Application Appeals and Revised Development Plan.
4.10.1 If the Zoning Application approved by the D.C. Office of Zoning is
appealed to the U.S. Court of Appeals, then Developer may certify to the District in writing that
Developer will no longer pursue resolution of the appeal after the following has occurred: (i)
Developer has spent eighteen months from the date of the initial appeal actively resolving the
concerns raised in the appeal; and (ii) Developer has expended over $1,500,000.00 solely on design,
engineering, legal fees, travel and meals, professional services and fees, marketing and advertising,
and community promotional events directly associated with resolution on the concerns raised in the
appeal. Developer’s notification to District must include documentation supporting the above
assertions for District’s review and confirmation.
4.10.2 If Developer is unable to obtain final approval of the Zoning Application in
accordance with Section 4.10.1, and District has confirmed of the same, Developer may propose a
revised development plan for the Residential Component, which shall be subject to District’s review
and approval which shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned, or delayed. Any revised
development plan approved by District pursuant to this Section 4.10.2 shall be the Development
Plan for the Residential Component.
4.11 Naming of Project. Developer shall submit to District, for District’s reasonable
approval, Developer’s proposed name of the Project by the date indicated therefor in the Schedule
of Performance. Once approved by District, Developer shall not change the name of the Project
without District’s prior approval. Any proposed name should reflect the history and significance of
the Property to the African American community in the District of Columbia, and more broadly,
the United States.
4.12 Submission Deadline Extensions. If Developer is proceeding diligently and in good
faith and desires to extend a specified deadline in the Schedule of Performance for any submission
of Construction Plans and Specifications or other Submissions, Developer may request such
extension in writing, and, for good cause shown, District may, in its sole and absolute discretion,
grant such extension by notice to Developer.
4.13 Outdoor Activation Plan and Budget. Prior to First Closing, Developer shall submit
to District for District’s review and approval, which shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned,
or delayed, a strategy for activating the Outdoor Plaza for the Improvements on the Property (the
32

“Outdoor Activation Plan and Budget”). The Outdoor Activation Plan and Budget shall set forth
the management, programming, reporting, and financing of the Outdoor Plaza that is part of the
Project. The framework for the Outdoor Activation Plan and Budget is set forth in Exhibit V.
4.14 Subdivision. Prior to the Effective Date, Developer agrees to cause the Property to
be subdivided into the individual Parcels shown on Exhibit A-1, in order to delineate assessment
and taxation lots for the Office Parcel and the Residential Parcel. Prior to submitting documents,
certificates, plats, and applications required with respect to any division of the Property, Developer
shall seek District’s prior written consent thereto, which consent shall be in District’s sole discretion,
after which approval, District will execute such documents that are reasonably required of District
as the owner of the Property, provided that any such documents are consistent with the Development
Plan and the provisions of this Agreement, including without limitation, Exhibit A-1. In no event
shall District be under any obligation to incur any expenses or any liabilities with respect to its
cooperation under this Section 4.14.
4.15 NAACP Enterprises Acquisition of NAACP Unit: NAACP Investments Interest in
RUSH JV. District acknowledges that in accordance with and as set forth in the NAACP Governing
Agreements, Developer has (i) agreed to construct and NAACP Enterprises has agreed to purchase
the NAACP Unit for NAACP’s national corporate headquarters, and (ii) entered into the RUSH JV
Agreement with NAACP Investments. Prior to the Effective Date, NAACP has provided District
with the RUSH JV Agreement and any other operating or investment agreements related to the
Project, and an organizational chart for District’s review and verification.
4.16 Reciprocal Easement Agreement. The Parties acknowledge that Developer may, at
its sole cost and expense, impose one or more reciprocal easement agreements, or such similar
agreement (“REA”) against its fee or leasehold interest in the Property as is reasonably necessary
and appropriate to govern the use, maintenance, and operation of the common areas, community
spaces, or Garage in the Project. The Parties further acknowledge that such an REA with respect to
the Garage shall be substantially similar to the form attached hereto as Exhibit U and shall be
executed in connection with the First Closing.4
4.17 Hotel Franchise Agreement. Prior to First Closing, Developer shall submit to the
District an executed Hotel Franchise Agreement, if applicable, with a hotel chain or brand owner
with respect to the Hotel approved by the District. The Hotel Franchise Agreement shall grant the
Developer the right to use a brand's name, systems, and reservations in exchange for fees and include
the requirements for the Developer to maintain the Hotel consistent with the maintenance and
operational standards applicable to the Hotel chain or brand owner.
4.18 Hotel Management Agreement. Prior to First Closing, Developer shall submit to
District an executed Hotel Management Agreement, if applicable, between Developer and hotel
brand operator or independent operator pursuant to which hotel operator has agreed to manage the
4 Note: Garage REA to include District’s rights as the fee owner of the Residential Parcel in the event of a
default by the Developer and termination of the Ground Lease.
33

day-to-day operations of the Hotel consistent with the maintenance and operational standards
applicable to the hotel chain or brand owner.
4.19 Arts and Cultural Leases. Prior to First Closing, Developer shall submit to District
the executed lease agreements with Alvin Ailey American Dance Theatre/The Ailey School, Viva
School, Dave Chappelle Comedy Club, Love First Child Development Center, and/or any additional
or substitute arts or cultural tenants (“Arts and Cultural Leases”) for the occupancy of
approximately 30,000 square feet of space to be constructed on the Office Parcel in accordance with
the Development Plan.
4.20 Labor Peace Agreement. Prior to the Effective Date, Developer will enter into a
written agreement with any labor organization that seeks to represent employees involved in Hotel
operations on the Office Parcel, which agreement shall contain, at a minimum, a provision
prohibiting the labor organization and its members from engaging in any picketing, work stoppage,
boycott, or other economic interference with Hotel operations or the Project (“Labor Peace
Agreement”) as required under Hotel Development Projects Labor Peace Agreement Act of 2002,
D.C. Official Code §32-851, et seq.
4.21 Office Lease Unit. District intends to lease a portion of the Office Parcel from the
Developer for municipal purposes (“Office Lease Unit”) in connection with the First Closing. If the
District does not enter into a lease with Developer for the Office Lease Unit, Developer intends to
lease or sell the Office Lease Unit to a quasi-government District agency. Developer acknowledges
and agrees that in the event the Office Lease Unit is leased or purchased by a quasi-government
District agency or a private user, District may adjust the tax increment financing not-to-exceed
amount of gross and net issuance proceeds if it determines a different level of public assistance is
minimally required for the Office Component.
ARTICLE V
CONDITIONS TO CLOSING
5.1 Conditions Precedent to Developer’s Obligation to Close.
5.1.1 The obligations of Developer to consummate First Closing on the First
Closing Date shall be subject to the following conditions precedent:
(a) the representations and warranties made by District in Section 3.1.1
of this Agreement shall be true and correct in all material respects on and as if made on the Closing
Date;
(b) District shall have performed all of its material obligations and
observed and complied with all material covenants and conditions required at or prior to Closing
under this Agreement;
(c) this Agreement shall not have been previously terminated pursuant
to any provision hereof;
34

(d) District shall have delivered (or caused to be delivered) the original,
executed documents required to be delivered pursuant to Section 6.2.1 herein;
(e) as of the First Closing Date, there shall be no rezoning or other
statute, law, judicial, or administrative decision, ordinance, or regulation (including amendments
and modifications of any of the foregoing) by any Governmental Authorities or any public or
private utility having jurisdiction over the applicable Parcel that would materially adversely affect
the acquisition, development, sale, or use of the applicable Parcel such that the Component is no
longer physically or economically feasible (this provision shall not apply to any normal and
customary reassessment of the Property for ad valorem real estate tax purposes);
(f) title to the applicable Parcel shall be subject only to the Permitted
Exceptions;
(g) there is no material default past notice and cure periods of the
NAACP Enterprises or NAACP Investments under the NAACP Purchase Agreement or the RUSH
JV Agreement, respectively;
(h) if the District leases the Office Lease Unit, the fully executed lease
agreement for the Office Lease Unit upon mutually agreed upon terms and conditions, or if a quasi-
government District agency the fully executed lease or purchase agreement for the Office Lease
Unit; and
(i) except with respect to the Air Rights Lease, District has terminated
any existing lease agreements or license agreements at the Property which are known to District
effective not later than the First Closing Date.
5.1.2 Failure of Condition. If all of the conditions to First Closing set forth above
in Section 5.1.1 have not been satisfied by the First Closing Date, provided the same is not the
result of Developer’s failure to perform any obligation of Developer hereunder, Developer shall
have the option, in its sole discretion, to: (i) waive such condition(s) and proceed to First Closing
hereunder; (ii) terminate this Agreement by delivering notice of such termination to District,
whereby District will release the Project Deposit to Developer and the Parties shall be released
from any further liability or obligation hereunder except those that expressly survive termination
of this Agreement; or (iii) delay First Closing for up to sixty (60) days (or such longer time as may
be agreed to by the Parties) to permit District to satisfy the conditions to First Closing set forth in
Section 5.1.1. In the event Developer proceeds under clause (iii), First Closing shall occur within
sixty (60) days after the conditions precedent set forth in Section 5.1.1 have been satisfied, but in
no event later than the Outside Closing Date. If such conditions precedent have not been satisfied
by the end of the sixty (60) day period, provided the same is not the result of Developer’s failure
to perform any obligation of Developer hereunder, Developer may again proceed under clause (i),
(ii), or (iii) above, in its sole discretion. The foregoing notwithstanding, First Closing shall not
occur after the Outside Closing Date. If First Closing has not occurred by the Outside Closing
Date, this Agreement shall immediately terminate and be of no further force and effect, except for
those provisions that expressly survive termination of this Agreement. Notwithstanding anything
set forth above to the contrary, if any such failed condition precedent is a result of a District
Default, then Developer may exercise its remedies in Section 9.3.
35

5.2 Conditions Precedent to District’s Obligation to Close.
5.2.1 The obligation of District to convey the Parcel(s) and consummate First
Closing on the First Closing Date shall be subject to the following conditions precedent:
(a) Developer shall have performed all of its material obligations
hereunder and observed and complied with all material covenants and conditions required at or
prior to First Closing under this Agreement;
(b) the representations and warranties made by Developer in
Section 3.2.1 of this Agreement shall be true and correct in all material respects on and as if made
on the First Closing Date;
(c) this Agreement shall not have been previously terminated pursuant
to any other provision hereof;
(d) District’s authority, pursuant to the Act, to proceed with the
disposition, as contemplated in this Agreement, shall have not previously expired;
(e) the Construction Plans and Specifications for the applicable
Improvements shall have been approved as Approved Plans and Specifications in their entirety
pursuant to Article IV;
(f) all Submissions required to be submitted prior to First Closing shall
have been approved by District in their entirety;
(g) Developer shall have certified to District in writing that it is ready,
willing, and able in accordance with the terms and conditions of this Agreement to purchase or
lease the applicable Parcel and achieve Commencement of Construction for each Parcel on or
before the date set forth in the Schedule of Performance;
(h) Developer shall be in compliance with the terms of the First Source
Agreement;
(i) Developer shall be in compliance with the terms of the CBE
Agreement;
(j) Developer shall have obtained all Governmental Approvals
necessary to complete the Office Component and to acquire the Residential Component and shall
have delivered copies of the same to District;
(k) Developer shall have obtained, and furnished to District certificates
of insurance or duplicate originals of insurance policies, for the insurance coverage required under
the Construction Covenant and Ground Lease, as applicable;
(l) Developer shall have provided District with satisfactory evidence of
its authority to purchase or lease, as applicable, the Parcel(s) and to perform its obligations under
this Agreement and the Construction Covenant;
36

(m) Developer shall have obtained all Permits for demolition (if any),
excavation, sheeting and shoring, and the building permit for construction of the Office
Component Improvements, or obtained evidence that such Permits are ready subject only to
payment for such Permits, except for those Permits which are normally obtained during the course
of construction of the Improvements, such as Permits for elevators and landscaping, and shall have
delivered the copies of the same to District;
(n) Developer shall have delivered (or caused to be delivered) the
original, executed documents required to be delivered pursuant to Section 6.2.2 herein;
(o) Developer shall have delivered to District the documents required
under Section 10.2 and District shall have approved the Financing Commitments for the Office
Component;
(p) District shall have approved the Final Project Funding Plan and the
Final Project Budget for the Office Component, and there shall have been no changes to the same,
except to the extent such changes have been approved by District;
(q) Developer shall have executed a Construction Contract for the
Office Component;
(r) Developer shall have retained the Construction Consultant for the
Office Component and District shall have approved the same in accordance with Section 4.7;
(s) Developer and NAACP Enterprises have executed the NAACP
Purchase Agreement and Developer and NAACP Investments have executed the RUSH JV
Agreement, and neither Developer nor NAACP Enterprises or NAACP Investments, as applicable,
shall be materially in default of such agreements past any applicable notice and cure periods;
(t) Developer shall have provided to District updated Guarantor
Submissions and District shall have confirmed that no material adverse change has occurred in the
financial condition of any Guarantor, determined in accordance with the provisions of Section
8.1.4 or, if a material adverse change has occurred, District has approved a substitute guarantor
pursuant to Sections 8.1.2 and 8.1.4;
(u) Developer shall have executed and delivered to District the REA in
accordance with Section 4.16 for the Garage;
(v) Developer shall have provided to District the executed Hotel
Franchise Agreement, if applicable;
(w) Developer shall have provided to District the executed Hotel
Management Agreement, if applicable;
(x) Developer shall have provided to District the executed Arts and
Cultural Leases;
37

(y) Developer shall have provided to District the Outdoor Activation
Plan and Budget; and
(z) Developer shall have delivered the Bonds for the Office Component
pursuant to Section 8.3.
(aa) if the District leases the Office Lease Unit, the fully executed lease
agreement for the Office Lease Unit upon mutually agreed upon terms and conditions, or if a quasi-
government District agency the fully executed lease or purchase agreement for the Office Lease
Unit;.
5.2.2 Failure of Condition. If all of the conditions to First Closing set forth above
in Section 5.2.1 have not been satisfied by the First Closing Date, provided the same is not the
result of District’s failure to perform any obligation of District hereunder, District shall have the
option, in its sole discretion, by notice to Developer, to: (i) waive such condition(s) and proceed
to First Closing hereunder; (ii) terminate this Agreement by delivering notice of such termination
to Developer whereby the Project Deposit shall be retained by District and the Parties shall be
released from any further liability or obligation hereunder except those that expressly survive
termination of this Agreement; or (iii) delay First Closing for up to sixty (60) days (or such longer
period as may be agreed to by the Parties), to permit Developer to satisfy the conditions to First
Closing set forth in Section 5.2.1. In the event District proceeds under clause (iii), First Closing
shall occur within sixty (60) days after the conditions precedent set forth in Section 5.2.1 have
been satisfied but in no event later than the Outside Closing Date. If such conditions precedent
have not been satisfied by the end of the sixty (60) day period, provided the same is not the result
of District’s failure to perform any obligation of District hereunder, District may again proceed
under clause (i), (ii), or (iii) above, in its sole discretion. The foregoing notwithstanding, First
Closing shall not occur after the Outside Closing Date. If First Closing has not occurred by the
Outside Closing Date, this Agreement shall immediately terminate and be of no further force and
effect, except for those provisions that expressly survive termination of this Agreement.
Notwithstanding anything set forth above to the contrary, if any such failed condition precedent is
a result of a Developer Default, then District may exercise its remedies in Section 9.2.
5.3 Confirmation to Close by NAACP Enterprises and NAACP Investments. District and
Developer acknowledge and agree that, so long as neither NAACP Enterprises nor NAACP
Investments is in material default of its obligations under the terms of the NAACP Governing
Agreements to which it is a party, the written confirmation of NAACP Enterprises and NAACP
Investments that Developer is not materially in default, past any applicable notice and cure periods,
under its respective NAACP Governing Agreements shall be a pre-requisite to First Closing. In
the event that either District or Developer request such written confirmation from NAACP
Enterprises and NAACP Investments, and such entities do not respond in writing in seven (7)
Business Days, the parties may proceed to First Closing.
5.4 Conditions Precedent to District and Developer’s Obligation to Close on the Second
Closing. The obligations of District and Developer to consummate Second Closing on the second
Closing Date shall be subject to the conditions precedent set forth in the applicable Construction
Covenant.
38

ARTICLE VI
CLOSING
6.1 Closing Date and Outside Closing Date.
6.1.1 First Closing Date. Developer and District shall consummate the First
Closing on the Property upon satisfaction (or waiver by the Party entitled to waive the same) of all
conditions to First Closing, but no later than the First Closing Date shown on the Schedule of
Performance (“First Closing Date”). In no event shall the First Closing be held after [THE DATE
THAT IS THREE (3) YEARS AFTER DATE OF THE ACT] (the “First Outside Closing
Date”). The First Closing shall occur in the District of Columbia in a location acceptable to the
Parties.
6.1.2 Second Closing Date. Developer shall close on all Debt Financing and
Equity Investment required to fund the construction of the Improvements comprising the
Residential Component (the “Second Closing”) upon (i) satisfaction (or waiver by the Party
entitled to waive the same) of all conditions to Second Closing for the Residential Parcel and (ii)
delivery of documents required to be delivered for the Residential Component, as set forth in the
applicable Construction Covenant, but no later than the Second Closing Date shown on the
Schedule of Performance (“Second Closing Date”). In no event shall the Second Closing be held
after [THE DATE THAT IS THREE (3) YEARS AFTER DATE OF THE ACT] (the “Second
Outside Closing Date”). The Second Closing shall occur in the District of Columbia in a location
acceptable to the Parties.
6.2 Deliveries at Closing.
6.2.1 District’s First Closing Deliveries. On or before the First Closing Date,
subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, District shall execute, notarize, as
applicable, and deliver to Settlement Agent:
(a) (i) as to the Office Parcel, the Deed in recordable form to be
recorded in the Land Records against the Property5 and (ii) as to the Residential Parcel, the Ground
Lease, together with the Memorandum of Ground Lease in recordable form to be recorded in the
Land Records against the Residential Parcel;
(b) the Construction Covenant in recordable form to be recorded in the
Land Records against the applicable Parcel;
(c) as to the Residential Parcel, the Affordable Housing Covenant in
recordable form to be recorded in the Land Records against the Residential Parcel;
5 Note: District Deed includes a right of re-entry in favor of the District.
39

(d) a certificate, duly executed by District, stating that all of District’s
representations and warranties set forth herein are true and correct as of and as if made on the
Closing Date;
(e) as to the Residential Parcel, the Assignment and Assumption of Air
Rights Lease, if applicable, in recordable form to be recorded in the Land Records against the Air
Rights Parcel; and
(f) any and all other deliveries required from District on the Land
Closing Date under this Agreement and such other documents and instruments as are customary
and as may be reasonably requested by Developer or Settlement Agent, and reasonably acceptable
to District, to effectuate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
6.2.2 Developer’s First Closing Deliveries. On or before the First Closing Date,
subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, Developer shall execute, notarize, as
applicable, and deliver to Settlement Agent:
(a) (i) as to the Office Parcel, the Purchase Price in full, (ii) as to the
Residential Parcel, the rent due to be paid as of the effective date of the Ground Lease, and any
additional funds, if so required by the Settlement Statement to be delivered at Closing;
(b) the Performance Letter of Credit;
(c) as to the Residential Parcel, the Assignment and Assumption of Air
Rights Lease, if applicable, in recordable form to be recorded in the Land Records against the Air
Rights Parcel;
(d) the Construction Covenant in recordable form to be recorded in the
Land Records against the applicable Parcel;
(e) as to the Residential Parcel, the Affordable Housing Covenant in
recordable form to be recorded in the Land Records against the Residential Parcel;
(f) as to the Residential Parcel, the Ground Lease, together with the
Memorandum of Ground Lease in recordable form to be recorded in the Land Records against the
Residential Parcel;
(g) the fully executed Guaranty for the applicable Component;
(h) as to the Office Parcel, the Financing Documents and any other
documents required to close on the Debt Financing and Equity Investment for the Office
Component;
(i) a certificate, duly executed by Developer, stating that all of
Developer’s representations and warranties set forth herein are true and correct as of and as if made
on the Land Closing Date;
40

(j) as to the Office Parcel, a certificate, duly executed by Developer,
stating that (i) there is no default, or event which with the passage of time or giving of notice or
both would become a default, by any party under the Financing Documents and (ii) the terms of
the Financing Documents are consistent with the terms of the Financing Commitments approved
by District;
(k) written confirmation from Developer that neither NAACP
Enterprises nor NAACP Investments is in material default past any applicable notice and cure
periods of its obligations under the NAACP Governing Agreements to which it is a party;
(l) the following documents evidencing the due organization and
authority of Developer and Managing Member to enter into, join, and consummate this Agreement
and the transactions contemplated herein:
(i) organizational documents and a current certificate of good
standing for Developer issued by the District of Columbia;
(ii) authorizing resolutions, in form and content reasonably
satisfactory to District, demonstrating the authority of the entity and of the Person executing each
document on behalf of Developer and Managing Member in connection with this Agreement and
the Project; and
(iii) an opinion of Developer’s counsel that Developer and
Managing Member are validly organized, existing, and in good standing in the District of
Columbia, that Developer and Managing Member have the full authority and legal right to carry
out the terms of this Agreement and the documents to be recorded in the Land Records, that
Developer and Managing Member have taken all actions to authorize the execution, delivery, and
performance of said documents and any other document relating thereto in accordance with their
respective terms, that none of the aforesaid actions, undertakings, or agreements violate any
restriction, term, condition, or provision of the organizational documents of Developer or
Managing Member or any contract or agreement to which they are a party or by which they are
bound; provided, however, that if a separate opinion is provided by Developer’s counsel to an
Institutional Lender covering such matters, that Developer may satisfy the requirements of this
clause (iii) by delivering a counsel letter to District stating that District shall be entitled to rely on
the legal opinion provided to the Institutional Lender; and
(m) any and all other deliveries required from Developer on the applicable
Closing Date under this Agreement and such other documents and instruments as are customary
and as may be reasonably requested by District or Settlement Agent, and reasonably acceptable to
Developer, to effectuate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
6.2.3 Deliveries by NAACP Enterprises and NAACP Investments. On or before
the First Closing Date, subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, NAACP Enterprises
and NAACP Investments shall each have delivered to District:
(a) the written confirmation required from such entity under Section
5.3, as applicable; and
41

(b) any and all other deliveries required from such entities on the First
Closing Date under this Agreement, the NAACP Governing Agreements to which it is a party and
such other documents and instruments as are customary and as may be reasonably requested by
District, Developer or Settlement Agent, and reasonably acceptable to NAACP Enterprises and
NAACP Investments, as applicable, to effectuate the transactions contemplated by this Agreement.
6.2.4 Deliveries at Second Closing. On or before the Second Closing Date,
subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement and the applicable Construction Covenant,
District and Developer shall execute, notarize, as applicable, and deliver to Settlement Agent the
documents set forth in the applicable Construction Covenant.
6.2.5 On the applicable Closing Date, Settlement Agent shall record and
distribute documents and funds in accordance with closing instructions provided by the Parties so
long as they are consistent with this Agreement.
6.3 Recordation of Closing Documents; Closing Costs.
6.3.1 (a) At First Closing, Settlement Agent shall file for recordation among the
Land Records, the Deed for the Office Parcel, the Memorandum of Ground Lease and the
Affordable Housing Covenant for the Residential Parcel, the Construction Covenant for each
Parcel, and, if applicable, the Assignment and Assumption of the Air Rights Lease for the Air
Rights Parcel and (b) at Second Closing, Settlement Agent shall file for recordation among the
Land Records, such documents required for Second Closing set forth in the Construction Covenant
for the Residential Parcel. Such documents shall be recorded prior to any security instruments to
be recorded in connection with the Debt Financing.
6.3.2 At Closing, Developer shall be responsible for and pay all costs pertaining
to the transfer of the applicable Parcel and financing of the Component, including, without
limitation: (i) title search costs, (ii) title insurance premiums and endorsement charges, (iii) survey
costs, (iv) all recordation and transfer taxes, and (v) all of Settlement Agent’s fees and costs.
6.3.3 All real estate and personal property taxes and all utilities and other
operating expenses, if any, applicable to a Parcel shall be prorated between District and Developer
as of the Closing Date based on estimates of the amounts that will be due and payable on the next
payment date, unless final readings or invoices therefor as of the Closing Date shall have been
obtained, in which event such final readings shall be utilized as the basis for adjustment. All items
to be apportioned and adjusted pursuant to this Section 6.3.3 shall be prorated as of midnight of
the day immediately preceding the Closing Date, based on the actual number of days of the month
which shall have elapsed as of the Closing Date and the actual number of days in the month and a
three hundred sixty-five (365) day year.
ARTICLE VII
DEVELOPMENT OF PROPERTY AND CONSTRUCTION OF IMPROVEMENTS;
AFFORDABLE HOUSING REQUIREMENT
42

7.1 Obligation to Construct Improvements. Developer hereby agrees to develop,
construct, use, maintain, and operate the Improvements in accordance with the requirements
contained in the applicable Construction Covenant and the Schedule of Performance, subject only
to Force Majeure. Developer shall construct the Improvements in accordance with the Approved
Plans and Specifications and in compliance with all Permits, Governmental Approvals, and
Applicable Law. All costs of the Project, including all due diligence, predevelopment and soft costs,
hard costs, and cost overruns, shall be borne solely by Developer. Any cost overruns shall not excuse
Developer from completing construction of the Project in accordance with the terms and conditions
of this Agreement, the applicable Construction Covenant. Developer shall not seek any additional
subsidy that is not reflected in the applicable Project Funding Plan, applicable Final Project Funding
Plan, or First Closing Residential Project Funding Plan, each as approved by District, from any
District of Columbia agency or instrumentality for any costs associated with this Project, including
without limitation, any grants or subsidies for construction and operation of affordable housing,
Federal tax credits, or a tax exemption pursuant to D.C. Official Code § 47–1005.02. District is not
obligated to provide funds for the Project and any funds from a District of Columbia government
source proposed by Developer in the Project Budget or Final Project Budget is subject to availability
and approval of the funding by the applicable District of Columbia agency.
7.2 Governmental Approvals. Developer shall obtain all necessary Governmental
Approvals to construct the Improvements within the Components. Any application for a
Governmental Approval, or modifications to existing Governmental Approvals, shall be prepared
and filed by Developer on behalf of District as the owner of the Property. All applications for
Governmental Approvals shall be subject to prior approval by District. Developer shall submit a
copy of the proposed application to District for its review and approval prior to submission of the
application. District shall have thirty (30) days to review and comment on the application. District
shall cooperate, at no cost to District, with Developer in connection with all such applications
approved by District and shall join such applications (if and to the extent it remains fee owner of the
subject Parcel) as reasonably requested by Developer.
7.3 Issuance of Permits. Developer shall have the sole responsibility for obtaining all
Permits and shall make application therefor directly to the applicable Governmental Authority.
Developer shall submit to District copies of its applications for Permits prior to submission of the
applications with the relevant Governmental Authority. District shall, upon request by Developer,
execute applications (if and to the extent it remains fee owner of the Property) for such Permits, at
no cost, expense, obligation, or liability to District. In no event shall Developer commence site work
or construction of all or any portion of the Improvements on its respective Parcel until Developer
shall have obtained all Permits for the work in question. Developer shall submit its applications for
Permits on or before the date set forth in the Schedule of Performance, which shall be within a period
of time that Developer believes in good faith is reasonably sufficient to allow issuance of such
Permits prior to the applicable Closing Date. From and after the date of Developer’s submission of
an application for a Permit, Developer shall diligently prosecute such application until receipt. In
addition, from and after submission of any such application until issuance of the Permit, Developer
shall report Permit status in writing on a periodic basis to District, not more frequently than once
every thirty (30) days.
7.4 Site Preparation. Developer, at its sole cost and expense, shall be responsible for all
preparation of the Parcels for development and construction in accordance with the Development
43

Plan and Approved Plans and Specifications, including costs associated with demolition, excavation,
construction of the Improvements, utility relocation and abandonment, relocation and rearrangement
of water and sewer lines and hook-ups, and construction or repair of alley ways on the Property and
abutting public property necessary for the Project. All such work, including but not limited to,
excavation, backfill, and upgrading of the lighting and drainage, shall be performed under all
required Permits and Governmental Approvals and in accordance with Applicable Law.
7.5 Affordable Housing Requirement. Developer will comply with all affordable
housing requirements of D.C. Official Code §10-801 and the requirements of District of Columbia’s
Inclusionary Zoning program. As of the Effective Date, Developer has delivered to District, and
District has approved, the Affordable Housing Plan governing the requirements for the Affordable
Units, including specific affordability levels, tenure type, unit mix, and number of bedroom
breakdowns. The proposed “Affordable Unit Index” to be attached to the Affordable Housing
Covenant, which shall include the floor plans depicting the Affordable Units for the Property, shall
also be presented to District for review and approval prior to First Closing. At First Closing,
Developer shall execute the Affordable Housing Covenant, which shall reflect the Affordable
Housing Plan.
7.6 Opportunity for CBEs. Developer shall comply with the terms and conditions set
forth in the CBE Agreement.
7.7 Employment of District Residents; First Source Agreement. Pursuant to D.C.
Official Code § 10-801(b)(7), the Workforce Intermediary Establishment and Reform of the First
Source Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Law 19-84, D.C. Official Code §§ 2-219.01 et seq.) and the
rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, and Mayor’s Order 83-265, Developer has entered
into a First Source Agreement with DOES that shall, among other things, require Developer to: (i)
hire, and require its architects, engineers, consultants, contractors, and subcontractors to hire, at least
fifty-one percent (51%) District of Columbia residents for all new jobs created by the Project, all in
accordance with such First Source Employment Agreement and (ii) ensure that at least fifty-one
percent (51%) of apprentices and trainees employed are residents of the District of Columbia and
are registered in apprenticeship programs approved by the DC Apprenticeship Council as required
under D.C. Official Code §§ 32-1401 et seq.
7.8 Davis Bacon Act; Living Wage Act. If applicable, Developer shall, and shall cause
the Contractor to, comply with the provisions of the Davis-Bacon Act, 40 U.S.C. §§ 3141 et seq.,
and the regulations promulgated therewith. In addition, as required under D.C. Official Code § 2-
220.06, Developer shall, and shall cause the Contractor to, to comply with all requirements under
the Living Wage Act of 2006, D.C. Official Code §§ 2-220.01 et seq, as amended. To the extent
applicable, the Contractor shall notify all subcontractors of the requirements under the Davis-Bacon
Act and the Living Wage Act and shall post the notice required thereunder in a conspicuous site at
its place of business.
7.9 Green Building Act and Clean Energy.
7.9.1 Developer shall design and construct the Improvements in accordance with
the Green Building Act of 2006, D.C. Official Code §§ 6-1451.01 et seq., as amended, and the
regulations promulgated therewith.
44

7.9.2 In addition, to the extent the building permit(s) for the Improvements is not
issued prior to December 31, 2026, and all or any part of the Improvements is a “covered building”,
Developer shall design and construct such Improvements in accordance with the Clean Energy DC
Building Code Amendment Act of 2022 (D.C. Law 24-177; 69 D.C. Reg. 9924; D.C. Official
Code §6-1453.01) and the regulations promulgated therewith.
7.9.3 Developer shall construct the Improvements to LEED Gold standards or, if
approved by the District, a comparable level of sustainable design and construction.
7.10 Living Building Challenge.
7.10.1 Developer will work collaboratively with NAACP Enterprises and its
advisors to use commercially reasonable efforts to advance the goals of Centering Equity in the
Sustainable Building Sector Initiative and its Living Building Challenge in connection with the
development of the NAACP Unit. NAACP Enterprises will pursue federal government or other
private subsidies to defray any additional costs that may be incurred in connection with the
foregoing.
7.10.2 Failure of Developer or NAACP Enterprises to comply with Section 7.10.1
shall not be a default of this Agreement.
ARTICLE VIII
POST-CLOSING GUARANTIES OF PERFORMANCE
8.1 Development and Completion Guaranty.
8.1.1 Delivery at Closing. Developer shall deliver to District on, as a condition
of the applicable Closing, a Guaranty executed by Guarantor.
8.1.2 Approval of Guarantor. The Guaranty shall be from one or more Persons
approved by District in District’s sole and absolute discretion, which approval shall include
District’s determination as to whether such Person has sufficient net worth and liquidity to satisfy
its obligations under the Guaranty, taking into account all relevant factors, including, without
limitation, such Person’s obligations under other guaranties and the other contingent obligations
of such Person. District may, at its sole option, require the Guaranty to be delivered by the Person
who is delivering the guaranty that guaranties repayment to the primary lender providing Debt
Financing. In no event shall a Guarantor be a Prohibited Person.
8.1.3 Guarantor Submissions. In order for District to approve a Person as a
Guarantor under Section 8.1.2, Developer shall deliver or cause the Person to deliver to District
the Guarantor Submissions. Developer shall submit to District updated Guarantor Submissions (a)
at any time upon District’s request and (b) no later than sixty (60) days prior to the applicable
Closing.
45

8.1.4 Material Adverse Change in Financial Condition of Guarantor. In the event
District determines, in its sole and absolute discretion, that a material adverse change in the
financial condition of the Guarantor has occurred that impacts, or could threaten to impact, the
Guarantor’s ability to perform under the Guaranty, Developer shall, within five (5) Business Days
after notice from District, identify a proposed substitute guarantor and request District’s approval
of the same, which request shall include delivery of the Guarantor Submissions for such proposed
substitute guarantor.
8.2 Performance Letter of Credit. At First Closing, Developer shall deliver to District
an Acceptable Letter of Credit in the amount of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000.00)
(the “Performance Letter of Credit”) to secure Developer’s performance of the obligations
contained in the Construction Covenant.
8.3 Payment and Performance Bonds. Prior to the applicable Closing, Developer shall
obtain, as to each Component, or require its Contractor to obtain, and deliver to District, payment
and performance bonds with respect to the work to be performed under the applicable Construction
Contract. The payment and performance bonds (the “Bonds”) for the applicable Component shall
(a) be issued by a surety company that is admitted as a bonding carrier listed on the then-most
current version of U.S. Treasury Circular 570 or any replacement or substitute U.S. government
listing, has an A.M. Best’s rating of at least A-:VIII or better and is duly licensed and authorized
to conduct and transact surety business in the District of Columbia by the Commissioner of the
D.C. Department of Insurance, Securities and Banking, (b) be on a form consistent with AIA
Document 312 or another form that provides substantially equivalent protection to the owner, with
such changes as District may reasonably request, (c) name District as a beneficiary, and (d) be in
the amount equal to the total price of the applicable Construction Contract.
ARTICLE IX
DEFAULTS AND REMEDIES
9.1 Default.
9.1.1 Default by Developer. Developer shall be in default under this Agreement
if (each, a “Developer Default”):
(a) any of Developer’s representations and warranties under Section
3.2.1 is not true and correct as of the Effective Date or as of the applicable Closing Date;
(b) Developer fails to achieve a milestone on the Schedule of
Performance by the Outside Date therefor, and such failure shall continue for a period of ten (10)
days after notice from District;
(c) Developer shall (i) admit in writing in a legal proceeding its inability
to pay its debts as they mature, (ii) file a voluntary petition in bankruptcy or insolvency or for
reorganization under the United States Bankruptcy Code, (iii) be adjudicated bankrupt or insolvent
by any court, (iv) be the subject of involuntary proceedings under the United States Bankruptcy
Code, or the appointment of a receiver or trustee for all or substantially all of its property and such
46

proceedings shall not be dismissed or stayed, or the receivership or trustee ship vacated, within
one hundred twenty (120) days, or (v) make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors;
(d) Developer becomes a Prohibited Person and such breach is not cured
within thirty (30) days after notice from District; or
(e) Developer fails to perform any obligation or requirement under this
Agreement or fails to comply with any term or provision of this Agreement that is not specified
under (a) – (d) above, and such default remains uncured for thirty (30) days after notice from
District (except as provided in Section 5.1.2, no notice shall be necessary nor shall any cure period
apply to Developer’s obligation to close on its acquisition of the Property by the Outside Closing
Date, time being of the essence), or if such a default does not involve the payment of money and
cannot reasonably be cured within thirty (30) days, Developer shall have such additional time as
is reasonably necessary, not to exceed an additional sixty (60) days, to cure such default, provided
that Developer commences the cure within the initial thirty (30) day period and diligently pursues
completion of such cure thereafter.
9.1.2 Default by District. District shall be in default under this Agreement if
District fails to perform any obligation or requirement under this Agreement or fails to comply
with any term or provision of this Agreement and such default remains uncured for thirty (30) days
after receipt of notice of such failure from Developer (any such default that remains uncured after
all notice and cure periods have expired, a “District Default”). Notwithstanding the foregoing, if
a default cannot reasonably be cured within thirty (30) days, District shall have such additional
time as is reasonably necessary, not to exceed an additional sixty (60) days, to cure such default;
provided, however, District must commence the cure within the initial thirty (30) day period and
diligently pursue completion of such cure thereafter.
9.2 District Remedies in the Event of a Developer Default. In the event of a Developer
Default under this Agreement, District may elect to:
(a) terminate this Agreement and, as liquidated damages, draw on the
Project Deposit in the full amount, whereupon the Parties shall be released from any further
liability or obligation hereunder, except those that expressly survive termination of this
Agreement. Upon such termination, the Development Work Product shall be automatically
assigned to District in accordance with Section 9.6;
(b) cure any Developer Default at Developer’s sole cost and expense,
whereupon District shall be entitled to draw on the Project Deposit for reimbursement of such
costs, in addition to pursuing any other legal remedies;
(c) pursue specific performance; and/or
(d) pursue any other legal or equitable relief.
9.3 Developer Remedies in the Event of a District Default. In the event of a District
Default prior to the applicable Closing, Developer may elect to:
47

(a) extend the applicable Closing Date for a reasonable period of time
to allow District to cure the District Default, not to exceed the Outside Closing Date;
(b) terminate this Agreement, whereupon District shall return the
Project Deposit to Developer and the Parties shall be released from any further liability or
obligation hereunder, except those that expressly survive termination of this Agreement; and/or
(c) pursue specific performance or other injunctive relief.
9.4 Limitation on Remedies; Cure Periods. The remedies of Developer and District
provided herein shall be the sole and exclusive remedies of the Parties in the event of a District
Default or Developer Default hereunder. In no event shall either Party be liable for any
consequential, punitive, or special damages. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in
this Agreement, any cure period provided to District or Developer under this Article IX shall not
delay First Closing beyond, and shall automatically expire on, the Outside Closing Date.
9.5 No Waiver By Delay; Waiver. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained
herein, any delay by any Party in instituting or prosecuting any actions or proceedings with respect
to a default by the other hereunder or otherwise asserting its rights or pursuing its remedies under
this Article, shall not operate as a waiver of such rights or to deprive such Party of or limit such
rights in any way (it being the intent of this provision that neither Party shall be constrained by
waiver, laches, or otherwise in the exercise of such remedies). Any waiver by either Party hereto
must be made in writing. Any waiver in fact made with respect to any specific default under this
Section shall not be considered or treated as a waiver with respect to any other defaults or with
respect to the particular default except to the extent specifically waived in writing.
9.6 Assignment of Development Work Product. Upon termination of this Agreement
pursuant to Section 9.2(a), Developer shall assign to District all of Developer’s assignable right,
title, and interest in and to all plans, drawings, specifications, engineering studies, investigations,
reports, Governmental Approvals and Permits in connection with the Project (collectively, the
“Development Work Product”) at Developer’s sole cost and expense. Developer shall cause all
professional contracts for Development Work Product to expressly provide that Developer shall have
the right to so assign (or failing that, to license) the Development Work Product to District and that,
from and after the effective date of such assignment (or license), District shall have the right to use
such Development Work Product and rely thereon to the same extent as Developer. Upon
termination of this Agreement pursuant to Section 9.2(a), if requested by District, Developer shall
execute such assignments as District may request to perfect such assignment. Developer hereby
indemnifies, defends, and holds harmless District from and against any and all third-party costs,
claims or liabilities, caused by the failure of Developer to pay when due third parties for any
Development Work Product. Developer’s obligations pursuant to this Section 9.6 shall survive
termination of this Agreement. Notwithstanding any term of this Section 9.6, Developer shall not be
deemed to represent or warrant the correctness or accuracy of any Development Work Product
undertaken prior to the assignment to District.
9.7 Attorneys’ Fees. In the event District prevails in any legal action or proceeding to
enforce the terms of this Agreement, District shall be entitled to recover from Developer the
reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs incurred by District in such action or proceeding. In the event
48

District is represented by the Office of the Attorney General for the District, reasonable attorneys’
fees shall be calculated based on the then-applicable hourly rates established in the most-current
Adjusted Laffey Matrix prepared by the Civil Division of the United States Attorney’s Office for
the District of Columbia and the number of hours employees of the Office of the Attorney General
for the District of Columbia prepared for or participated in any such litigation.
9.8 Rights and Remedies Cumulative. The rights and remedies of the Parties under this
Agreement shall be cumulative, and the exercise by a Party of any one or more of such remedies
shall not preclude the exercise of any other remedies for the same such default or breach.
ARTICLE X
CONSTRUCTION FINANCING
10.1 Limitations on Encumbrances.
10.1.1 Debt Financing; Mortgages. As further provided in the applicable
Construction Covenant and Ground Lease, beginning at the First Closing, Developer shall not
obtain any Debt Financing or engage in any other transaction that shall create a Mortgage or other
encumbrance or lien upon the Property, whether by express agreement or operation of law, or
suffer any encumbrance or lien to be made on or attached to the Property without the prior written
approval of District.6 Following the First Closing, Developer shall not place, or cause to be placed,
any Mortgage against the Residential Parcel until the Second Closing occurs for the Residential
Component.
10.1.2 Bona Fide Indebtedness. The Debt Financing obtained in connection with
a Closing and construction of the Improvements within a Component shall (i) secure a bona fide
indebtedness to an Institutional Lender, the proceeds of which shall be applied only to the costs
identified in the applicable Final Project Budget and (ii) be of an amount which, together with the
Equity Investment, Additional Funding Sources, and all other funds available to Developer with
respect to development of such Parcel, shall be sufficient to complete construction of the
Improvements. In no event shall the proceeds of any Debt Financing or Mortgage be used to fund
the acquisition, development, construction, operation, or any other costs relating to any real
property, personal property, or business operation other than the Project.
10.2 Submissions. At least thirty (30) days prior to the applicable Closing under the terms
of this Agreement, Developer shall submit to District, for the purpose of obtaining District’s
approval of any Debt Financing, Equity Investment, or Additional Funding Sources, such documents
as District may reasonably request, including, but not limited to, copies of:
6 Developer’s ability to create a mortgage or other encumbrance upon the Office Parcel after issuance of
the District Certificate of Final Completion shall be set forth in the Construction Covenant.
49

(a) the Financing Commitments, certified by Developer to be a true and
correct copies thereof;
(b) the signed loan agreement (which may be the most recent draft
exchanged between Developer and the lender, provided that, Developer delivers the final loan
agreement prior to the applicable Closing and the executed loan agreement as soon as available
after Closing on the Debt Financing) between Developer and the lender of such Debt Financing,
certified by Developer to be a true and correct copy thereof;
(c) the signed agreements (which may be the most recent draft
exchanged between Developer and the lender, provided that, Developer delivers the final
agreements prior to the applicable Closing and the executed agreements as soon as available after
the applicable Closing on the Equity Investment) evidencing the commitment to provide the Equity
Investment or the Additional Funding Sources for the applicable Component;
(d) a schedule detailing the disbursement of the proceeds of the
proposed Debt Financing, Equity Investment, and Additional Funding Sources for the applicable
Component, certified by Developer to be true and accurate; and
(e) a copy of the proposed deed of trust or such other instrument to be
used to secure the Debt Financing, provided that, Developer delivers the final deed of trust prior
to the applicable Closing and the recorded deed of trust or other instrument as soon as available
after the applicable Closing on the Debt Financing.
ARTICLE XI
ASSIGNMENT AND TRANSFER
11.1 Assignment. Developer acknowledges that District’s solicitation, and its eventual
selection of Developer, for the disposition of the Property was made, in part, to encourage equitable
access to, and inclusion in, development activities. In furtherance of these goals, Developer agrees
and accepts that its ability to assign its rights to the Parcels and delegate its obligations regarding the
development and construction thereof will be limited. Prior to First Closing, Developer represents,
warrants, covenants, and agrees, for itself and its successors and assigns, that Developer (or any
successor in interest thereof) shall not assign its rights under this Agreement, or delegate its
obligations under this Agreement, without District’s prior written approval, which may be granted
or denied in District’s sole and absolute discretion. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Developer may
assign its rights to the Office Parcel under this Agreement at First Closing or thereafter to a Person
or Persons (a “Permitted Assignee”) (i) that is Controlled by the Managing Member, and with the
same equity participation percentages indicated in the Equitable Inclusion Forms or (ii) with respect
to the NAACP Unit, to NAACP Enterprises. In the event Developer wishes to make an assignment
to a Permitted Assignee (“Permitted Assignment”), Developer shall submit to District at least thirty
(30) days prior to First Closing the following documentation for District’s confirmation that the
proposed Permitted Assignment meets the requirements of this Agreement: (1) a final draft of the
proposed assignment agreement between Developer and the Permitted Assignee, (2) the organization
documents of the Permitted Assignee, (3) if applicable, an equitable inclusion priority form,
executed by Permitted Assignee reflecting that Permitted Assignee meets the same equity
50

participation percentages indicated in the Equitable Inclusion Forms; and (4) a signed statement of
the Permitted Assignee certifying it and its Members are not Prohibited Persons. After First Closing,
Developer may (x) as to the Office Parcel, assign or transfer the Office Parcel (or portions thereof)
in accordance with the Construction Covenant and the Deed and (y) as to the Residential Parcel,
may assign or transfer Developer’s leasehold interest in the Residential Parcel (or portion thereof)
in accordance with the Construction Covenant and the Ground Lease; provided that Developer shall
not assign its rights to the Residential Parcel prior to the Second Closing.
11.2 Transfer of Membership Interests. Prior to First Closing, neither Developer nor any
Member of Developer (including any successors in interest of Developer or its Members) shall cause
or suffer to be made any assignment, sale, conveyance, or other transfer, or make any contract or
agreement to do any of the same, whether directly or indirectly, of the membership interests of
Developer (“Transfer of Membership Interests”), without District’s prior written approval, which
may be granted or denied in District’s sole and absolute discretion; provided, however, (i) no
membership interest shall be held by a Prohibited Person and (ii) prior to any Transfer of
Membership Interests the Developer shall provide to District an updated Equitable Inclusion Forms
reflecting that after that the proposed Transfer of Membership Interests, the Developer will continue
to meet equity participation percentages indicated in the Equitable Inclusion Forms. After First
Closing, Developer may conduct a Transfer of Membership Interests in accordance with the
applicable Construction Covenant and the Deed or Ground Lease, as applicable; provided that
Developer shall not conduct a Transfer of Membership Interests with respect to the Residential
Parcel prior to the Second Closing.
11.3 No Unreasonable Restraint. Developer hereby acknowledges and agrees that the
restrictions on transfers set forth in this Article do not constitute an unreasonable restraint on
Developer’s right to transfer or otherwise alienate the Property or its rights under this Agreement.
Developer hereby waives any and all claims, challenges, and objections that may exist with respect
to the enforceability of such restrictions, including any claim that such restrictions constitute an
unreasonable restraint on alienation.
ARTICLE XII
INSURANCE OBLIGATIONS; INDEMNIFICATION
12.1 Insurance Obligations. In addition to any insurance requirements required under the
terms of the applicable Construction Covenant, Developer shall comply with the insurance
requirements contained in Exhibit S.
12.2 Indemnification. Developer shall indemnify, defend, and hold harmless District
and District’s agents and employees from and against any and all losses, costs, claims, damages,
liabilities, and causes of action (including reasonable attorneys’ fees and court costs) arising out
of death of or injury to any person or damage to any property that is directly or indirectly caused
by any acts or omissions of Developer, its Members, or Developer’s Agents; provided, however,
that the forgoing indemnity shall not apply to any losses, costs, claims, damages, liabilities, and
causes of action (including reasonable attorneys’ fees and court costs) due solely to the gross
51

negligence or willful misconduct of District as determined by a court of competent jurisdiction.
The obligations of Developer under this Section shall survive Closing or the earlier termination of
this Agreement.
ARTICLE XIII
NOTICES
13.1 To District. Any notices given under this Agreement shall be in writing and delivered
(i) by U.S. Certified Mail (return receipt requested, postage pre-paid), (ii) by hand, (iii) by reputable
private overnight commercial courier service, (iv) by electronic mail, or (v) such other means as the
Parties may agree in writing, to District at the following addresses:
District of Columbia
Office of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Suite 317
Washington, DC 20004
Attn: Development Manager - Reeves
Email: dmpednotice@dc.gov
With a copy to:
Office of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Suite 317
Washington, DC 20004
Attn: General Counsel
Email: dmpednotice@dc.gov
13.2 To Developer. Any notices given under this Agreement shall be in writing and
delivered (i) by U.S. Certified Mail (return receipt requested, postage pre-paid), (ii) by hand, (iii) by
reputable private overnight commercial courier service, (iv) by electronic mail, or (v) such other
means as the Parties may agree in writing, to Developer at the following addresses:
Reeves CMC Venture
c/o CSG Urban Partners
1328 Florida Avenue, NW
Washington DC 20009
Attention: Simone Goring Devaney and Charles King
Email: sgoring@csgurban.com and cking@csgurban.com
With a copy to:
Capri Investment Group
111 W. Monroe St., Suite 1100-C
Chicago, Illinois 60603
Attention: Quintin E. Primo III and Dawil R. Sully
Emails: qprimo@capri.global and dsully@capri.global
With a courtesy copy to:
52

Polsinelli PC
1401 I Street NW, Suite 800
Washington, DC 20005
Attention: Anitra Androh
Email: aandroh@polsinelli.com
13.3 To NAACP: Any notices given under this Agreement shall be in writing and
delivered (i) by U.S. Certified Mail (return receipt requested, postage pre-paid), (ii) by hand, (iii) by
reputable private overnight commercial courier service, (iv) by electronic mail, or (v) such other
means as the Parties may agree in writing, to NAACP at the following addresses:
A courtesy copy to:
NAACP Enterprises, LLC
4805 Mt. Hope Drive
Baltimore, MD 21215
Attention: ___________________
Emails: ______________________
NAACP Investments, LLC
4805 Mt. Hope Drive
Baltimore, MD 21215
Attention: ___________________
Emails: ______________________
With a courtesy copy to:
Rogers Yogodzinski LLP
133 New Hampshire Avenue, Suite 800
Washington, DC 20036
Attention: Debra Yogodzinski
Email: dyogodzinski@rylawdc.com
Notices served upon Developer or District, and courtesy copies served upon NAACP, in the
manner aforesaid shall be deemed to have been received for all purposes hereunder at the time
such notice shall have been: (i) if hand delivered to a Party against receipted copy, when the copy
of the notice is receipted; (ii) if given by overnight courier service, on the next Business Day after
the notice is deposited with the overnight courier service; (iii) if given by certified mail, return
receipt requested, postage pre-paid, on the date of actual delivery or refusal thereof; or (iv) if given
by electronic mail, upon the recipient’s electronic mail response confirming receipt. If notice is
tendered under the terms of this Agreement and is refused by the intended recipient of the notice,
the notice shall nonetheless be considered to have been received and shall be effective as of the
date provided in this Agreement. The Parties agree that counsel to any of them may provide notice
to the other Parties under this Agreement.
ARTICLE XIV
MISCELLANEOUS
53

14.1 Party in Position of Surety With Respect to Obligations. Developer, for itself and its
successors and assigns and for all other persons who are or who shall become, whether by express
or implied assumption or otherwise, liable upon or subject to any obligation or burden under the
Agreement, hereby waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law and equity, any and all claims or
defenses otherwise available on the grounds of its being or having become a person in the position
of surety, whether real, personal, or otherwise or whether by agreement or operation of law,
including, without limitation any and all claims and defenses based upon extension of time,
indulgence or modification of this Agreement.
14.2 Conflict of Interests; Representatives Not Individually Liable. No official or
employee of District shall participate in any decision relating to this Agreement which affects his or
her personal interests or the interests of any District of Columbia agency, partnership, or association
in which he or she is, directly or indirectly, interested. No official or employee of District shall be
personally liable to Developer or any successor-in-interest in the event of any default or breach by
District or for any amount which may become due to Developer or such successor-in-interest or on
any obligations hereunder.
14.3 Survival; Merger. Except to the extent any provision contained herein expressly
survives the expiration or termination of this Agreement, the provisions of this Agreement are
intended to and shall merge with the Deed or the Ground Lease, as applicable, and shall be
superseded by the Construction Covenant and, if applicable, the Ground Lease.
14.4 Titles of Articles and Sections. Titles and captions of the several parts, articles, and
sections of this Agreement are inserted for convenient reference only and shall be disregarded in
construing or interpreting Agreement provisions.
14.5 Governing Law; Forum for Disputes. This Agreement shall be governed by,
interpreted under, construed, and enforced in accordance with the laws of the District of Columbia,
without reference to the conflicts of laws provisions thereof. District and Developer agree that any
suit, action, or proceeding arising out of this Agreement, or any transaction contemplated hereby,
shall be brought exclusively in (a) the courts of the District of Columbia and (b) the United States
District Court for the District of Columbia. District and Developer irrevocably and unconditionally
waive any objection to the laying of venue of any action, suit, or proceeding arising out of this
Agreement or the transactions contemplated hereby in the courts named in (a) and (b) above, and
hereby further waive and agree not to plead or claim in any such court that any such action, suit, or
proceeding brought in any such court has been brought in an inconvenient forum.
14.6 Entire Agreement; Recitals; Exhibits.
14.6.1 This Agreement (including the Exhibits annexed hereto and made part
hereof), and any document delivered pursuant to this Agreement collectively contain all the
agreements and understandings between District and Developer relative to the transactions
contemplated herein and thereby and there are no agreements or understandings, oral or written,
expressed or implied, between them with respect thereto other than as herein set forth or expressly
54

referenced herein and made a part hereof. Upon execution of this Agreement, all previous
agreements shall be deemed null and void.
14.6.2 The Recitals of this Agreement are incorporated herein by this reference
and are made a substantive part of the agreements between the Parties.
14.6.3 All Exhibits are incorporated herein by reference, whether or not so stated.
In the event of any conflict between the Exhibits and this Agreement that occurs prior to First
Closing, this Agreement shall control. In the event of any conflict between the Exhibit and this
Agreement that occurs after First Closing, the Exhibits shall control.
14.7 Counterparts. This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, each
of which shall be an original but all of which shall together constitute one and the same instrument.
Execution and delivery of this Agreement by facsimile or e-mail .pdf shall be sufficient for all
purposes and shall be binding on any Person who so executes.
14.8 Time of Performance. All dates for performance (including cure) shall expire at 5:00
p.m. (Eastern time) on the performance or cure date. A performance date which falls on a Saturday,
Sunday, District of Columbia government holiday, or day in which the District of Columbia
government is officially closed for business is automatically extended to the next Business Day.
14.9 Successors and Assigns. This Agreement shall be binding upon and shall inure to the
benefit of, the successors and assigns of District and Developer, and where the term “Developer” or
“District” is used in this Agreement, it shall mean and include their respective successors and
assigns.
14.10 Third Party Beneficiary. No Person shall be a third-party beneficiary of this
Agreement.
14.11 Waiver of Jury Trial. TO THE EXTENT PERMITTED BY LAW, ALL PARTIES
HERETO WAIVE THE RIGHT TO TRIAL BY JURY IN CONNECTION WITH ANY
LITIGATION ARISING IN RESPECT OF THIS AGREEMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS
CONTEMPLATED HEREBY.
14.12 Further Assurances. Each Party agrees to execute and deliver to the other Party such
additional documents and instruments as the other Party reasonably may request in order to fully
carry out the purposes and intent of this Agreement.
14.13 Modifications and Amendments. None of the terms or provisions of this Agreement
may be changed, waived, modified, or removed except by an instrument in writing executed by the
Party or Parties against which enforcement of the change, waiver, modification, or removal is
asserted. None of the terms or provisions of this Agreement shall be deemed to have been abrogated
or waived by reason of any failure or refusal to enforce the same. In addition, if any Party seeks to
amend or change any material terms set forth in the Council Term Sheet, the Parties must seek and
receive Council approval as required under D.C. Official Code §10-801(b-4).
14.14 Severability. If any provision of this Agreement is held to be illegal, invalid, or
unenforceable under present or future Applicable Law, such provision shall be fully severable, this
55

Agreement shall be construed and enforced as if such illegal, invalid, or unenforceable provision
had never comprised a part of this Agreement, and the remaining provisions of this Agreement shall
remain in full force and effect and shall not be affected by the illegal, invalid, or unenforceable
provision or by its severance from this Agreement, unless this construction would constitute a
substantial deviation from the general intent of the Parties as reflected in this Agreement.
Furthermore, there shall be added automatically as a part of this Agreement a provision as similar in
terms to such illegal, invalid, or unenforceable provision as may be possible that is legal, valid, and
enforceable.
14.15 Anti-Deficiency Limitation; Authority.
14.15.1 Though no financial obligations on the part of District are anticipated,
Developer acknowledges that District is not authorized to make any obligation in advance or in the
absence of lawfully available appropriations and that District’s authority to make such obligations
is and shall remain subject to the provisions of (i) the federal Antideficiency Act, 31 U.S.C. §§ 1341,
1342, 1349, 1350, 1351; (ii) D.C. Official Code § 47-105; (iii) the District of Columbia Anti-
Deficiency Act, D.C. Official Code §§ 47-355.01 – 355.08, as the foregoing statutes may be
amended from time to time; and (iv) Section 446 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act.
14.15.2 Developer acknowledges and agrees that any unauthorized act by District
is void. It is Developer’s obligation to accurately ascertain the extent of District’s authority.
14.16 Time of the Essence; Standard of Performance. Time is of the essence with respect
to all matters set forth in this Agreement. For all deadlines set forth in this Agreement, the standard
of performance of the Party required to meet such deadlines shall be strict adherence and not
reasonable adherence.
14.17 No Partnership. District and Developer are independent parties under this
Agreement, and nothing in this Agreement shall be deemed or construed for any purpose to establish
between them, or any third party, a relationship of principal and agent, employment, partnership, or
joint venture.
14.18 Each Party To Bear Its Own Costs. Each Party shall bear its own costs and expenses
incurred in connection with the negotiation of this Agreement and the performance of such Party’s
duties and obligations hereunder.
14.19 Discretion. Unless explicitly provided to the contrary in this Agreement, where
either Party has the right to approve or consent to any matter herein, such approval or consent shall
not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned, or delayed nor any charge made therefor.
14.20 Force Majeure. Neither District nor Developer, as the case may be, shall be
considered in default of their obligations under this Agreement, in the event such Party’s
performance is materially and adversely affected by a Force Majeure event. In the event of the
occurrence of any such Force Majeure event, the time or times for performance of the obligations of
District or of Developer shall be extended day-for-day for the period of the Force Majeure; provided
however, that (a) the Party seeking the benefit of this Section 14.20 shall notify the other Party in
writing within ten (10) days after it becomes aware of the beginning of any such Force Majeure
event, of the cause or causes thereof, with supporting documentation, and such Party’s estimate of
56

the length of the delay that will be caused by such Force Majeure event and (b) the Party seeking the
delay must take commercially reasonable actions to minimize the delay. If either Party requests any
extension on the date of completion of any obligation hereunder due to Force Majeure, it shall be
the responsibility of such Party to reasonably demonstrate that the delay was caused specifically by
such Force Majeure event. Force Majeure delays shall not delay the First Closing beyond the Outside
Closing Date and shall not apply to any obligation to pay money.
14.21 Joint Preparation. District and Developer each acknowledge that it has thoroughly
read and reviewed this Agreement, including all Exhibits and attachments thereto, and has sought
and received whatever competent advice and counsel as was necessary for it to form a full and
complete understanding of all rights and obligations herein. The language of this Agreement has
been agreed to by the Parties to express their mutual intent and no rule of strict construction shall be
applied against any Party hereto.
14.22 Estoppel Certificates. At any time and from time to time upon not less than thirty
(30) days’ prior notice, either Party shall execute, acknowledge, and deliver to the other requesting
Party, a written statement certifying the accuracy of, or any reason for the inaccuracy of, the
following statements: (a) this Agreement is in full force and effect; (b) this Agreement has not been
modified or amended (or if it has, identifying the modifications and amendments); (c) to such Party’s
knowledge, the Party requesting the certificate is not then in default under this Agreement; (d) to
such Party’s knowledge, the Party requesting the certificate has fully performed all of its respective
obligations hereunder (or, if it has not, identifying such failures to perform); and (e) such other
factual statements related to this Agreement as such requesting Party may reasonably request.
14.23 D.C. Human Rights Act. Developer shall comply with the District of Columbia
Human Rights Act, including its prohibitions on sexual harassment, consistent with 4 D.C.M.R.
1100, et seq.
14.24 Project Signage. District shall be identified where Developer’s name, trade name, or
logo is used on signage for the Project consistent with the same “level of identification” as
Developer’s name and logo or such lesser level as acceptable to District. District shall have the right
to approve the general template for use of District’s name, logo, or like identifiers.
14.25 Project Press Releases and Promotional Materials. Developer shall coordinate with
District all Project press releases and promotional materials that are prepared by Developer with
respect to the Project; provided, however, any press releases or promotional materials prepared by
Developer that reference the duties, obligations, or commitments of District with respect to the
Project shall be subject to District’s approval in its sole and absolute discretion, which shall be
obtained prior to publication of the press release or promotional materials.
14.26 Project Public Events. Developer shall coordinate with, invite, and provide notice to
District of all Project public events (i.e., community meetings, stakeholder meetings, presentations
to trade association groups, presentation to out-of-town dignitaries, and similar events). For any
event involving the immediate community or key public officials (such as Council members,
international ambassadors, members of Congress and their aides, officials of the Federal
government, and executives of regional organizations), Developer shall use reasonable efforts to
timely notify District and schedule such meetings so that District representatives may attend.
57

[Signature Pages Follow]
58

IN WITNESS WHEREOF, District and Developer have each caused this Agreement to
be signed, acknowledged, and delivered in its name by its duly authorized representative as of the
day and year first above written.
DISTRICT:
DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, by and through the
Office of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and
Economic Development pursuant to delegation of
authority contained in Mayor’s Order No. 2020-89
By: _____________________________
Name: ___________
Title: Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic
Development
Reviewed:
By:________________________
Office of the General Counsel
ODMPED
DEVELOPER:
REEVES CMC VENTURE LLC, a District of
Columbia limited liability company
By: [CSG Urban Partners, a District of
Columbia limited liability company,] its
Managing Member
By: _______________________________
Name: _____________________________
Title: ______________________________

JOINDER
This Joinder is attached to and made a part of the foregoing Agreement and all terms capitalized
but not defined herein shall have the respective meanings given to them in the Agreement. The
undersigned hereby executes this Agreement not as a Party, but solely to consent to rights and
obligations of NAACP Enterprises and NAACP Investments under and pursuant to the following
provisions of the Agreement:
Sections 4.15, 5.2.1(s), 5.3 and 6.2.3
The consent of NAACP Enterprises and NAACP Investments shall not be required to amend this
Agreement except in the event that such amendment directly affects the Sections of the LDDA
listed in this Joinder. Notwithstanding the foregoing, no consent shall be required if either NAACP
Enterprises and/or NAACP Investments is in material default of the NAACP Governing
Agreements to which they are a signatory.
NAACP 14th Street Enterprises, LLC, a
Delaware limited liability company
By: _______________________________
[Insert Name], Manager
NAACP 14th Street Investments, LLC, a
Delaware limited liability company
By: _______________________________
[Insert Name], Manager

11th

effectivedate ofCouncil's approvalofthedisposition.
+ Outside Closing — no later than three (3) years after the
effectivedate of Council’sapproval ofthedisposition (unless
Council approves an extensionofsuch three-year time).
+ Commencement of Construction — no later than thirty (30)
days after the applicable closing.
+ Substantial Completion — foreach parcel, anestimatedthirty
three (33) months after Commencement of Construction,
which shall include the period needed to demolish the
existing buildings on the Property.
+ Final Completion ~ for each parcel. an estimated three (3)
months after Substantial Completion.
Post-Closing + As required underthe LDDA, the Developershall execute at
Requirements the applicable closing the Construction Covenants and, if
applicable, the Affordable Housing Covenant and shall be
bound to comply with the requirements of the same for the
applicable durations identified therein.
+ As required under the LDDA, the Developer shall deliver to
the District at its closing on each parcel a Development and
Completion Guaranty executed by a guarantor approved by
DMPED.
Certified Business The Developer shall enter into a Certified Business Enterprise
Enterprise Utilization and Participation Agreement with the Department of
Small and Local Business Development governing certain
obligations of the Developer with respect to the Project under the
Small, Local and Disadvantaged Business Enterprise Development
and Assistance Act of 2005, as amended.
First Source The Developer shall enter into a First Source Agreement with the
Requirements Department ofEmployment Services that shall governobligationsof
the Developer pursuant to D.C. Official Code §§ 2-219.03,esteq,,
and Mayor’s Order 83-265 (November 9, 1983) regarding job
creation and employment generated as a resultof theconstruction of
the Project.

tothe Council shall not bind the District toexecutethe LDDA or toconvey the Property to
the Developer. The Developer further acknowledges that, notwithstanding Council
authorizing the conveyance ofthe Property, the District has no obligation to do so absent
the District and the Developer duly executing the LDDA and the satisfaction of the
conditions contained therein. In the event DMPED or the Mayor determine, in their sole
and absolute discretion, to withhold submission of this Term Sheet and supporting
documents to the Council or to otherwise decline to secure Council authorization for the
conveyance, DMPED may terminate negotiations with the Developerand the District shall
not be responsible for the Developer's costs and expenses incurred in relation to the
Propertyorthe Project.
. The Developeracknowledges that all approvals requiredofthe Council will be granted or
withheld in the sole and absolute discretion of the Council and that, absent Council
approvalofthe proposed transaction, DMPED has no authority to convey the Property to
the Developer. The Developer acknowledges that it is signing this Term Sheet prior to
obtainingall necessary Council approvals. In the absenceofsuch approvalsandexecution
of the LDDA, the Developer proceeds at its sole risk and expense with no recourse
whatsoeveragainst the District.
. The Developer and DMPED agree that upon receiptofall necessary Council approvals.
the Developer and DMPED intend to finalize and execute the LDDA governing all ofthe
termsand conditionsofthe conveyance ofthe Property.
|. Until the Developerand the District enter into the binding LDDA, both the Developerand
the District reserve the right to proceed with the proposed transaction in their sole and
absolute discretion. Upon the execution ofthe LDDA. the Developer and DMPED shall
proceed inaccordance with the terms ofthe LDDA;provided, however, that the Developer
and DMPED acknowledge and agree that any substantive change in the terms set forth in
this TermSheetshall be subject to further Councilreview and approval in accordancewith
D.C. Official Code §10-801(b-4).

IV: SOKSIGN ___—AETSEKVV‘A90SX958
Nina Albert
Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development
REEVES CMC VENTURE LLC,a District of Columbia
limited liabiity company

Exhibit A
Legal Description of Property
PROPERTY (Reeves Center Site)
Street Address 2000 14th Street NW, Washington, DC 20009
Square 0204
Lot 0844
Air Rights Parcel 7000 (to be included in the Residential Parcel in accordance
with the Agreement)
SSL 0204-0844
Current Owner District of Columbia
Total Land Area Approximately 97,600 SF (2.24 acres) with Air Rights Parcel
Approximately 81,213 SF (1.86 acres) without Air Rights Parcel
Current Zoning Lot 0844 zoned ARTS-4 (Mixed-Use Uptown Arts) and RA-2
Lot 7000 zoned RA-2
1

The Property is described below.
Part of Lot numbered Two Hundred and nine (209) in Square numbered Two Hundred and four (204)
in a subdivision made by the District of Columbia Redevelopment Land Agency, as per plat
recorded in Liber No. 175 at folio 147 in the O(cid:431)ice of the Surveyor for the District of Columbia, more
particularly described as follows:
Beginning for the same at the intersection of the south line of V Street, N.W. and the westerly line of
14th Street, N.W., said point being the northeastern corner of said Square 204, and proceeding
along said westerly line of 14th Street, S 0°03’40’ E, 320.0 feet to the north line of U Street, N.W.,
thence along said north line of U Street, N.W., due west, 305.17 feet to the east line of a public alley
15 feet wide, thence along said east line of said alley, due north, 320.0 feet to south line of said V
Street, N.W., thence, along said south line of V Street, N.W., due east, 304.83 feet to the point of
beginning, containing 97,600.0 square feet, more or less.
Note: At the date hereof, the above described land is designated on the Records of the Assessor of
the District of Columbia for assessment and taxation purposes as Lot 844 in Square 204.
Note: Said Lot 844 in Square 204 is shown on a plat of computation recorded in the O(cid:431)ice of the
Surveyor for the District of Columbia in Survey Book 197, page 147.
Note: Said Lot 844 in Square 204 is also shown on that certain Assessment and Taxation Plat No.
3731-N recorded in the O(cid:431)ice of the Surveyor for the District of Columbia.
AND BEING part of the same property conveyed to the District of Columbia, a municipal
corporation pursuant to that certain Deed from the District of Columbia Redevelopment Land
Agency, dated January 20, 1983 and recorded June 29, 1984 as Instrument No. 8600022966.
2

EXHIBIT A-1
Parcel Description
PROPERTY (Reeves Center Site)
Street Address 2000 14th Street NW, Washington, DC 20009
Square 0204
Lot 0844
Air Rights Parcel 7000 (to be included in the Residential Parcel in accordance
with the Agreement)
SSL 0204-0844
Current Owner District of Columbia
Total Land Area Approximately 97,600 SF (2.24 acres) with Air Rights Parcel
Approximately 81,213 SF (1.86 acres) without Air Rights
Parcel.
Current Zoning Lot 0844 zoned ARTS-4 (Mixed-Use Uptown Arts) and RA-2
Lot 7000 zoned RA-2
1

Proposed Lot Subdivision
The Property is proposed to be subdivided into two Assessment and Taxation lots1 pursuant to a
subdivision application to be filed with the DC Office of the Surveyor. The proposed subdivision is
described as follows:
Office Parcel Residential Parcel
Proposed A&T Lot 1 Proposed A&T Lot 2
Location Southern Portion of Square 0844 Northern Portion of Square 0844
Primary Street Frontage U Street NW (south); 14th Street V Street NW (north); 14th Street
NW (east) NW (east)
Approximate Land Area 45,000 SF (1.03 acres) Approximately 52,600 SF (1.21
acres) with Air Rights Parcel
Approximately 36,213 SF (0.83
acres) without Air Rights Parcel
Primary Use Office, Hotel, Arts, Public Plaza Residential, Retail, Public Plaza
Zoning – As of Right Lot 0844 zoned ARTS-4 Lot 0844 zoned ARTS-4 and Lot
7000 zoned RA-2
Zoning – Proposed ARTS-4 (Matter of Right) PUD (Planned Unit Development)
Max. Allowable Area 292,723 SF at 3.0x FAR 378,720 SF at 7.2x FAR
Proposed GFA 212,000 SF (excl. parking) 340,000 SF (excl. parking)
Shared Infrastructure Below-grade structure, parking Below-grade structure, parking
(108 spaces), utilities, and service (254 spaces), utilities, and service
corridors shared with Lot 2 corridors shared with Lot 1
Air Rights Parcel (Geno Baroni Apartments)
Air Rights Parcel
Street Address 1414 V Street NW, Washington, DC 20009
Square 0204
Lot 7000 (to be included in the Residential Parcel in accordance with the
Agreement)
Current Owner Horning Brothers (or affiliated entity – Parcel 13 Associates LP)
Approximate Land Area 16,387 SF
Zoning RA-2
NOTE: Air Rights Parcel to be included in the Residential Parcel in accordance with the Agreement.
1 Prior to Effective Date, Developer to update the Parcel maps and the legal description for the Parcels upon
approval of the lot subdivision.
2

Air Rights Parcel
That portion of the PUBLIC SPACE (defined below) above the existing subflooring slab extending
vertically from the top of the roof slab of the municipal office building garage below, elevation 103.25
feet to a point 100.00 feet above said top of municipal office building garage roof slab to an elevation
of 203.25 feet.
The PUBLIC SPACE is defined as:
Being part of Lot 209, Square 204 in the District of Columbia per plat recorded among the records of
the District Surveyor in Book 175 at Page 147 and being more particularly described as follows:
Beginning at a point due East 9.00 feet from the front corner common to Lots 208 and 209, Square
204, said point being on the southerly right-of-way line of "V" Street, N. W., and running thence due
East 71.00 feet with the said southerly right-of-way line of "V" Street, thence the three following
courses and distances across said Lot 209: due South 184.00 feet, thence due West 71.00 feet,
thence due North 184.00 feet to the place of beginning of this description, containing a calculated
horizontal area of 13,064 square feet, more or less.
(NOTE: Air Rights Parcel is described in detail in the Air Right Lease.)
3

EXHIBIT A-2
DEPICTION OF GARAGE
1

Garage is the existing below-grade parking structure located at 2000 14th Street NW, Washington,
DC 20009, which underlies the entirety of Square 0204, Lot 0844. The Garage constitutes a shared
infrastructure asset serving the Office Parcel, Residential Parcel and Air Rights Parcel. Garage will
be retained, upgraded, and integrated into the development program pursuant to the terms of the
Agreement.
2

Garage Description
Garage
OTR Designation Lot 0844, Square 0204
Location Below-grade, beneath the full footprint of Lot 0844
(Air Right Parcel shares the structural slab with Garage)
Structure Type Existing below-grade reinforced concrete parking structure
Number of Levels 2 below-grade levels
Total Parking Count Approximately 362 spaces
Bike Parking Approximately 10 slots
Approximate Area Garage on Office Parcel: approximately 44,319 SF
Garage on Residential Parcel: approximately 104,233 SF
Total Garage: approximately 148,552 SF
Vehicle Access Existing U Street NW curb cut to ramp
Shared Utilities Service corridors, utility runs, and structural grid extend beneath Office
Parcel, Residential Parcel and Air Rights Parcel
Ownership District of Columbia
Relationship to Office Parcel, Residential Parcel and Air Rights Parcel
The Garage underlies Office Parcel, Residential Parcel and Air Rights Parcel and will function as
shared infrastructure in accordance with the terms of this Agreement. Upon lot subdivision, Garage
will also be divided into Garage for Office Parcel, Residential Parcel and if applicable, Air Rights
Parcel separately. Per the Air Rights Lease, Air Rights Lessee is entitled to access and certain number
of parking spaces in the Garage.
Garage (Office Parcel) Garage (Residential Parcel
and Air Rights Parcel)
Below-Grade Area 44,319 SF 104,233 SF
Parking Spaces (approx.) 108 254
Structural Relationships Portion of the Garage slab Portion of the Garage slab
supports Office Parcel above- supports Residential Parcel and
grade structure Air Rights Parcel above-grade
structure
Shared Elements Structural grid, service corridors, utility runs, ramp access from U
Street NW
3

AFFORDABLE HOUSING COVENANT
[Add project name & address]
THIS AFFORDABLE HOUSING COVENANT (the “Covenant”) is made as of this
___day of __________, 20__ (“Effective Date”), by ___________________________, a
________________________________________ and its successors and assigns (the
“Developer”) having an address of ___________________________, for the benefit of the
District of Columbia, a municipal corporation, acting by and through the Office of the Deputy
Mayor for Planning and Economic Development (the “District”).
RECITALS
R-1. District is the fee simple owner of certain real property located in the District of
Columbia as further described in Exhibit A (the “Property”).
R-2. District has determined to further its public policy of increasing the affordable
housing stock in the District of Columbia and, in particular, on the Property.
R-3. District and Developer entered into that certain Land Disposition Agreement dated
________________________________, 20__, as the same may be amended (“Development
Agreement”) whereby District and Developer agreed upon the terms under which District agreed
to ground lease the Property to Developer and for Developer to develop and construct the Project
(defined below) and to or manage and lease the Affordable Units to be constructed in the Project.
R-4. In accordance with the Development Agreement and contemporaneously with the
execution of this Covenant, District has conveyed or will convey the Property to Developer.
R-5. District and Developer desire to set forth herein the terms, restrictions, and
conditions upon which Developer will construct, maintain, sell and/or lease the Affordable Units
in the Project.
NOW THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing and other good and valuable
consideration, the District and Developer hereby declare, covenant and agree as follows:
ARTICLE I
DEFINITIONS
For the purposes of this Covenant, the capitalized terms used herein shall have the
meanings ascribed to them below and, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, shall include
the plural as well as the singular.
Acknowledgment of Covenant: is that certain Acknowledgment of Covenant executed
by a Qualified Purchaser, in such form as the Agency requires.

Affirmative Fair Housing Marketing Plan: means Developer’s plan for marketing the
rental or initial sale of the Affordable Units, as approved by the Agency pursuant to Section 2.3.
Affordability Period: is defined in Article X.
Affordability Requirement: is the requirement that a minimum of 30% of the Residential
Units to be contained in the Project are to be Affordable Units and allocated as follows: (i) at least
25% of the Affordable Units shall be reserved for Households with an Annual Household Income
at or below 30% MFI and (ii) the remainder of the Affordable Units shall be reserved for
Households with an Annual Household Income at or below 50% MFI.1
Affordable Unit: means each Residential Unit that will be used to satisfy the Affordability
Requirement, all of which shall be identified in the Affordable Unit Index.
Affordable Unit Index: is an index of the Affordable Units contained in the Project that
identifies: (i) unit number (or similar identifier) and floor for each Affordable Unit and whether
each Affordable Unit is a Rental Affordable Unit or For Sale Affordable Unit; (ii) the Designated
Affordability Level of each Affordable Unit; (iii) the approximate square footage and number of
bedrooms of each Affordable Unit and a schematic drawing showing the layout of each Affordable
Unit; (iv) a listing or schedule of the standard and upgrade options of finishes, fixtures, equipment,
and appliances for all Residential Units; (v) a listing or schedule of the amenities, services,
upgrades, parking, and other facilities that will be offered as an option at an additional upfront or
recurring cost or fee to the Residential Units; and (vi) residential floor plans showing the location
of each Residential Unit.
Affordable Unit Owner: means a Qualified Purchaser who own(s) a For Sale Affordable
Unit.
Affordable Unit Tenant: means a Qualified Tenant who lease(s) a Rental Affordable
Unit.
Agency: means, as of the Effective Date, the D.C. Department of Housing and Community
Development, pursuant to Mayor’s Order 2009-112 (effective June 18, 2009), or such other agency
of the District of Columbia government that may subsequently be delegated the authority of the
Mayor to monitor, enforce, or otherwise administer the affordable housing requirements of the
District of Columbia government.
Annual Household Income: means the aggregate annual income of a Household as
determined by using the standards set forth in 24 CFR § 5.609, as may be amended, or as otherwise
set forth by the Agency.
1 Percentages are a placeholder for the Council package. Actual affordability requirements will be
identified in accordance with the Development Plan (Option A) and Affordable Housing
Plan (Option A) OR Development Plan (Option B) and Affordable Housing Plan (Option
B) prior to execution of this Covenant
2

Annual Report: has the meaning given in Section 4.10.
Business Day: means Monday through Friday, inclusive, other than holidays recognized
by the District of Columbia government.
Certification of Income, Affordability and Housing Size: means a certification made
by a Certifying Entity that verifies that (a) the Annual Household Income of a Household meets
the Designated Affordability Level for an applicable Affordable Unit, and (b) the Household meets
the requirements of Section 4.5 or Section 5.2.1, as applicable, in such form as the Agency
approves.
Certification of Inspection: means a certification by Developer that it has performed or
caused to be performed an inspection of a Rental Affordable Unit and that, to the best of
Developer’s knowledge, such Rental Affordable Unit is in compliance with all applicable statutory
and regulatory requirements, in such form as the Agency approves.
Certification of Residency: means a certification made by an Affordable Unit Owner that
states that the Affordable Unit Owner occupies the Affordable Unit as its principal residence, in
such form as the Agency approves.
Certifying Entity: means an entity or entities approved by the Agency pursuant to Section
2.4.
Conflict: is defined in Section 12.11.
Declaration of Eligibility: means a declaration executed by a Household prior to its
purchase, initial rental or subsequent rent renewal, as applicable, of an Affordable Unit, in a form
approved by the Agency, that shall be given to the Agency, Owner, and the Certifying Entity
representing and warranting the following: (a) the Household is a Qualified Purchaser or Qualified
Tenant and has disclosed all of its Annual Household Income to the Certifying Entity and has
provided reasonably satisfactory documentation evidencing such Annual Household Income, (b)
the Household’s Annual Household Income is at or below the Maximum Annual Household
Income for the applicable Affordable Unit, (c) the Household has been informed of its rights and
obligations under this Covenant, (d) the Household intends to occupy the Affordable Unit as its
principal residence, (e) the Household size meets the Occupancy Standard for the Affordable Unit,
(f) neither the Household, nor any person within the Household, has an ownership interest in any
other residential real property or residential cooperative or, if they do, they will divest such interest
and will provide satisfactory proof of the same to the Agency before closing on the purchase of or
signing lease for the Affordable Unit and (g) any other reasonable and customary representations
requested by the Agency.
Designated Affordability Level: means the percentage of MFI assigned to each
Affordable Unit and used to determine the Maximum Annual Household Income for prospective
Qualified Purchasers or Qualified Tenants, as applicable.
Developer: is identified in the preamble of this Covenant.
Federal Affordability Restrictions: is defined in Section 12.11.
3

For Sale Affordable Unit: means an Affordable Unit that shall be sold solely to a
Qualified Purchaser.
Hotel Project: means [a portion of the Project that will contain a _____ key hotel, and
which may be converted to Residential Units, if approved by District in accordance with the that
certain Ground Lease, dated of even date herewith, by and between District and Developer, at
which time the Developer will be required to comply with the Affordability Requirement for the
Hotel Project.]
Household(s): means all persons who will occupy the Affordable Unit, including the
purchaser’s or tenant’s, as applicable, spouse or domestic partner, all children under eighteen (18)
years of age, and all other persons over eighteen (18) years of age who will be occupying the
Affordable Unit. A Household may be a single family, one (1) person living alone, two (2) or
more families living together, or any other group of related or unrelated persons who share living
arrangements as allowable by this Covenant.
Household Selection Plan: means Developer’s plan for selecting Qualified Tenants or
Qualified Purchasers for the rental or initial sale of the Affordable Units, as approved by the
Agency pursuant to Section 2.3.
Housing Cost: means (a) for Rental Affordable Units, the total monthly payments for rent
and Utilities, less any rental subsidies paid on behalf of that Household, and (b) for For Sale
Affordable Units, the total monthly mortgage payments, property tax, hazard insurance, if
applicable, Utilities and condominium or homeowner fees required for purchase and occupancy.
Housing Locator Website: means a website established or designated by the Agency
pursuant to the Affordable Housing Clearinghouse Directory Act of 2008, effective August 15,
2008 (D.C. Law 17-215; D.C. Official Code § 42-2131, et seq.).
HUD: means the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.
Land Records: means the real property records for the District of Columbia located in the
Recorder of Deeds.
Market-Rate Unit: is each Residential Unit that is not an Affordable Unit.
Maximum Allowable Rent: as defined in Section 4.4.2.
Maximum Annual Household Income: is the maximum Annual Household Income of a
Household occupying an Affordable Unit as indicated on the then-current Rent and Price Schedule.
Maximum Resale Price: is the maximum resale price of a For-Sale Affordable Unit as
determined pursuant to the procedures contained in Schedule 1 attached hereto.
Maximum Sales Price: as defined in Section 5.1.1.
Median Family Income or MFI: means the median family income for a household of
four persons in the “Washington Metropolitan Statistical Area” as periodically published by HUD,
4

and adjusted for Household size without regard to any adjustments made by HUD for the purposes
of the programs it administers. MFI is also known as Area Median Income or AMI.
Minimum Annual Household Income: is the minimum Annual Household Income of a
Household occupying a Rental Affordable Unit as indicated on the then-current Rent and Price
Schedule.
Mortgage: means a mortgage, deed of trust, mortgage deed, or such other classes of
instruments as are commonly given to secure a debt under the laws of the District of Columbia.
Mortgagee: means the holder of a Mortgage.
OAG: means the Office of the Attorney General for the District of Columbia.
Occupancy Standard: means the minimum number of individuals in a Household
permitted to occupy any given Affordable Unit, as identified in the following chart:
Affordable Unit Size Minimum Number of
(Number of Bedrooms) Individuals in a Household
Studio/Efficiency 1
1 1
2 2
3 3
4 4
5 5
6 6
Over-Income Tenant: means a tenant of a Rental Affordable Unit who, at the time of
execution of the lease qualified as an Affordable Unit Tenant, but, at the time of lease renewal, has
an Annual Household Income greater than one hundred forty percent (140%) of the applicable
Maximum Annual Household Income for the applicable Rental Affordable Unit.
Owner: means, in the context of Rental Affordable Units, Developer, and in the context
of For Sale Affordable Units, Developer for so long as Developer owns the applicable For Sale
Affordable Unit, and then thereafter, the Affordable Unit Owner that owns such For Sale
Affordable Unit.
Person: means any individual, corporation, limited liability company, trust, partnership,
association, or other legal entity.
Project: means the structures, landscaping, hardscape, and site improvements to be
constructed or placed on the Property pursuant to the Development Agreement.
Property: is defined in the Recitals.
Qualified Purchaser: means a Household that (i) at the time of purchase, has an Annual
Household Income, as certified by the Certifying Entity, less than or equal to the Maximum Annual
5

Household Income for the applicable Affordable Unit, (ii) shall occupy the Affordable Unit as its
principal residence during its ownership of such Affordable Unit, (iii) shall not permit occupancy
of the Affordable Unit by any other Person, except with the prior written consent of the Agency,
(iv) shall use, occupy, hold, and sell the Affordable Unit as an Affordable Unit subject to the
Affordability Requirement (including the requirement to sell the Affordable Unit to a Qualified
Purchaser) and this Covenant, and (v) at the time of purchase, meets the Occupancy Standard for
the applicable Affordable Unit.
Qualified Tenant: means a Household that (i) at the time of leasing, has an Annual
Household Income, as certified by the Certifying Entity, less than or equal to the Maximum Annual
Household Income for the applicable Affordable Unit and at subsequent lease renewals, is not an
Over-Income Tenant, (ii) shall occupy the Affordable Unit as its principal residence during its
lease of such Affordable Unit, (iii) shall not permit occupancy of the Affordable Unit by any other
Person, except with the prior written consent of the Agency, (iv) shall use and occupy the
Affordable Unit as an Affordable Unit subject to the Affordability Requirement and this Covenant,
and (v) shall occupy the Affordable Unit within the Occupancy Standard.
Rent and Price Schedule: means the Rent and Price Schedule published in the D.C.
Register in accordance with the Inclusionary Zoning Implementation Amendment Act of 2006
(D.C. Law 16-275; D.C. Official Code § 6-1041.01 et seq.), as amended, which schedule sets forth,
among other things, the Maximum Sales Prices and Maximum Allowable Rent for inclusionary
zoning units and Affordable Units.
Rental Affordable Unit: means an Affordable Unit that shall be leased to a Qualified
Tenant.
Rental Affordable Unit Lease Rider: is that certain lease rider, which is attached to this
Covenant as Exhibit B and incorporated herein, as the same may be amended from time to time
with the written approval of the Agency.
Residential Unit: means an individual residential unit constructed as part of the Project.
Sale: is defined in Section 5.1.
Transferee: is defined in Section 5.7.
Utilities: means water, sewer, electricity, natural gas, trash, and any other fees required by
the Developer, property manager, or condominium or homeowners’ association in order to occupy
the Affordable Unit, including, but not limited to, mandatory amenity or administrative fees, which
amounts are included in the Rent and Price Schedule.
ARTICLE II
AFFORDABILITY REQUIREMENT
2.1 Requirement of Affordability. Developer shall construct, reserve, and either maintain
and lease as Rental Affordable Units, or sell as For Sale Affordable Units that number of
Affordable Units that are required by the Affordability Requirement.
6

2.2 Affordable Unit Standards and Location.
2.2.1 Affordable Unit Index. As of the Effective Date, District has approved the
Affordable Unit Index, which is attached hereto as Exhibit C. Developer shall not amend or
modify the Affordable Unit Index, except to the extent permitted under Section 4.6.6, without the
Agency’s prior written approval, which shall not be unreasonably withheld, conditioned, or
delayed. Any such approved amendment or modification as a result of re-designations of
Residential Units under Section 4.6.6 shall be recorded in the Land Records as an amendment to
this Covenant, at such time as determined by the Agency.
2.2.2 Unit Mix. The distribution of Affordable Units shall be proportional to that of the
Market-Rate Units (e.g., if the Market-Rate Units have a mix of 30% studios, 40% one-bedrooms,
and 30% two-bedrooms, the Affordable Units shall have a similar mix).
2.2.3 Size. The Affordable Units shall be of a size substantially similar to the Market-
Rate Units, provided that Affordable Units may be the smallest size of each market-rate type
(studio, 1-bedroom and 2-bedroom units) and have no luxury-scaled unit counterpart.
2.2.4 Exterior Finishes. Exterior finishes of Affordable Units will be substantially
similar to the appearance, finish, and durability of the exterior finishes of the Market-Rate Units.
2.2.5 Interior Finishes. Developer agrees that the interior base finishes, appliances, and
equipment in the Affordable Units shall be substantially similar to the Market-Rate Units.
2.2.6 Affordable Unit Location. Affordable Units shall be disbursed throughout the
Project and shall not be concentrated on any one floor or within a tier or section of the Project.
2.3 Marketing Affordable Units.
2.3.1 Marketing Plan. Developer shall submit to Agency an Affirmative Fair Housing
Marketing Plan and Household Selection Plan that set forth its plan for marketing the Affordable
Units and for selecting Households who may be Qualified Tenants or Qualified Purchasers, as
applicable. The Affirmative Fair Housing Marketing Plan and Household Selection Plan shall be
subject to the Agency’s prior written approval and shall be submitted to and approved by the
Agency prior to marketing any Affordable Units for sale or rent. Developer may contract with the
Certifying Entity to implement the Affirmative Fair Housing Marketing Plan and Household
Selection Plan.
2.3.2 Housing Locator. When an Affordable Unit becomes available for rent or for sale,
Owner shall register the Affordable Unit on the Housing Locator Website and indicate the
availability of such Affordable Unit and the application process for the Affordable Unit.
2.4 Certifying Entity. Each Owner shall select a Certifying Entity, which shall be subject to
the Agency’s prior written approval, not to be unreasonably withheld, conditioned, or delayed.
Owner may contact the Agency with questions and information about the selection of a Certifying
Entity. The Certifying Entity shall review documentation and verify a Household’s Annual
Household Income and Household’s size in order to determine whether that Household is a
Qualified Tenant or Qualified Purchaser, as applicable, for the subject Affordable Unit. If a
7

Household is determined to be a Qualified Tenant or Qualified Purchaser, as applicable, the
Certifying Entity shall issue a Certification of Income, Affordability and Housing Size for the
subject Household.
ARTICLE III
USE
3.1 Use. Except as provided herein, all Affordable Unit Owners and Affordable Unit Tenants
shall have the same and equal use and enjoyment of all of the amenities of the Property and services
provided at the Property as the owners or tenants of the comparable Market-Rate Units. No
restrictions, requirements, or rules shall be imposed on Affordable Unit Owners or Affordable Unit
Tenants that are not imposed equally on the owners or tenants of the comparable Market-Rate
Units. If amenities, services, upgrades, or ownership or rental of parking and other facilities are
offered as an option at an additional upfront and/or recurring cost or fee to the comparable Market-
Rate Units, such amenities, services, upgrades, or ownership or rental of parking and other
facilities shall be offered to the Affordable Unit Owners and Affordable Unit Tenants of
comparable Affordable Units at the same upfront and/or recurring cost or fee charged to the
Market-Rate Units. If there is no cost or fee charged to the owners or tenants of the comparable
Market-Rate Units for such amenities, services, upgrades, or ownership or rental of parking and
other facilities, there shall not be a cost or fee charged to Affordable Unit Owners or Affordable
Unit Tenants of comparable Affordable Units.
3.2 Demolition/Alteration. Owner shall maintain, upkeep, repair, and replace interior
components (including fixtures, appliances, flooring, and cabinetry) of the Affordable Unit with
interior components of equal or better quality than those interior components being replaced.
Owner shall not demolish or otherwise structurally alter an Affordable Unit or remove fixtures or
appliances installed in an Affordable Unit other than for maintenance and repair without the prior
written approval of the Agency, which approval shall be in the sole discretion of the Agency.
ARTICLE IV
RENTAL OF AFFORDABLE UNITS
4.1 Lease of Rental Affordable Units. In the event the Project contains Rental Affordable
Units, Developer shall reserve, maintain, and lease the Rental Affordable Units to Qualified
Tenants (a) in accordance with this Covenant and (b) at a rental rate at or below the Maximum
Allowable Rent.
4.2 Rental Affordable Unit Lease Requirements.
4.2.1 Form of Lease. To lease a Rental Affordable Unit to a Qualified Tenant, Developer
shall use a lease agreement to which is attached and incorporated a Rental Affordable Unit Lease
Rider. The Rental Affordable Unit Lease Rider shall be executed by Developer and each Qualified
Tenant prior to the Qualified Tenant’s occupancy of the Rental Affordable Unit. Any occupant of
the Rental Affordable Unit who is eighteen (18) years or older shall be a party to the lease
agreement and shall execute the Rental Affordable Unit Lease Rider.
8

4.2.2 Effectiveness of Lease. The lease of a Rental Affordable Unit shall only be effective
if a Rental Affordable Unit Lease Rider, a Certification of Income, Affordability and Housing Size
and a Declaration of Eligibility are attached as exhibits to the lease agreement. Failure to attach
the foregoing shall be deemed a default by Developer under this Covenant.
4.2.3 Developer to Maintain Copies. Developer shall maintain or cause to be maintained
copies of all initial and renewal leases executed with Qualified Tenants for a period of no less than
five (5) years from the expiration or termination of such lease.
4.3 Rental Affordable Unit Admissions Process.
4.3.1 Referrals. Developer may obtain referrals of prospective tenants of Rental
Affordable Units from federal and District of Columbia agencies, provided such referrals comply
with the requirements of this Covenant. In all events, before a prospective tenant leases a Rental
Affordable Unit, a Certifying Entity shall certify the prospective tenant’s Annual Household
Income, Household size and Housing Costs for the applicable Rental Affordable Unit.
4.3.2 Consideration of Applicants. For the initial occupancy of the Rental Affordable
Units, Developer shall select Qualified Tenants through a lottery system or other system as
otherwise approved by the Agency as shall be further provided in the Affirmative Fair Housing
Marketing Plan. Following the initial occupancy of the Affordable Units, Developer shall consider
each applicant in the order in which received by Developer, whether received pursuant to the
Affirmative Fair Housing Marketing Plan or referred pursuant to Section 4.3.1.
4.3.3 Rejection of Applicants. In connection with the leasing of a Rental Affordable Unit,
Developer may reject any applicant if, after diligent review of such applicant’s application,
Developer determines in good faith that such applicant does not meet Developer’s criteria to lease
or occupy a Rental Affordable Unit, provided such criteria do not violate applicable District of
Columbia and federal laws and is the same criteria used by Developer to lease or occupy the
Market-Rate Units. In the event any rejected applicant raises an objection or challenges
Developer’s rejection of such applicant, Developer shall be solely responsible for ensuring that its
rejection of such applicant is not in violation of federal law and/or the D.C. Human Rights Act,
D.C. Official Code § 2-1400 et seq. Developer shall provide the Agency with all documents
evidencing Developer’s review and rejection of an applicant, upon the request of the Agency.
4.3.4 Determination of Eligibility. Each tenant seeking to occupy a Rental Affordable
Unit shall have its Annual Household Income and Household eligibility verified by, and shall
obtain a Certification of Income, Affordability and Housing Size from, the Certifying Entity prior
to leasing such unit.
4.4 Initial Rental Affordable Unit Lease Terms.
4.4.1 Term. The term of any Rental Affordable Unit lease agreement shall be for a period
of one (1) year.
9

4.4.2 Establishment of Maximum Rent. The maximum allowable monthly rent
(“Maximum Allowable Rent”) for each Rental Affordable Unit shall be determined by the then-
current Rent and Price Schedule.
4.5 Determination of Income and Household Size. The Annual Household Income for a
prospective tenant of a Rental Affordable Unit shall be determined as of the date of the lease and
any lease renewals for such Rental Affordable Unit. The Certifying Entity shall verify that (a) the
Household’s Annual Household Income is less than the Maximum Annual Household Income for
the applicable Rental Affordable Unit; (b) the Household will not expend more than fifty percent
(50%) of its monthly Annual Household Income on Housing Cost for the applicable Rental
Affordable Unit; and (c) the Household meets the Occupancy Standard for the applicable Rental
Affordable Unit.
4.6 Subsequent Lease Years
4.6.1 Establishment of Maximum Allowable Rent. The Maximum Allowable Rent for
lease years after the first lease year shall be determined by the then-current Rent and Price
Schedule.
4.6.2 Renewal by Affordable Unit Tenant. For each Affordable Unit Tenant who intends
to renew its residential lease, Developer shall obtain the following: (i) a Declaration of Eligibility
from each such Affordable Unit Tenant and (ii) a Certification of Income, Affordability and
Housing Size completed by the Certifying Entity, each dated no earlier than ninety (90) days prior
to the anniversary of the first day of the applicable residential lease. Developer shall not permit a
renewal of an Affordable Unit Tenant’s lease unless the Affordable Unit Tenant has provided
Developer with these documents as required herein and the tenant is determined to be a Qualified
Tenant. If the Affordable Unit Tenant fails to provide such documents, Developer shall treat such
tenant as an Over-Income Tenant and charge market-rate rent, and Developer shall designate
another Residential Unit as a Rental Affordable Unit in accordance with Section 4.6.6.
4.6.3 Annual Recertification of Tenants. Within fifteen (15) days after receipt of an
Affordable Unit Tenant’s renewal documents at annual recertification, the Certifying Entity shall
determine the Affordable Unit Tenant’s eligibility pursuant to Section 4.5 for the subject Rental
Affordable Unit and notify Affordable Unit Tenant of the same. Any Affordable Unit Tenant who
meets the income and Household size requirements for the Affordable Unit at recertification will
be eligible to remain in the Rental Affordable Unit and to renew his/her lease at the then-current
lease rate for the particular Rental Affordable Unit.
4.6.4 Annual Recertification of Under Income Tenants. Upon annual recertification, any
Affordable Unit Tenant whose Annual Household Income is less than the Minimum Annual
Household Income for the subject Rental Affordable Unit, may elect either to (i) remain in the
Rental Affordable Unit paying rent, as established by the Owner, up to the then-current Maximum
Allowable Rent for the subject Rental Affordable Unit or (ii) vacate the Rental Affordable Unit at
the end of the tenant’s lease term.
4.6.5 Annual Recertification of Over-Income Tenants. Upon annual recertification, if an
Affordable Unit Tenant is an Over-Income Tenant, then the Over-Income Tenant may elect to
10

remain in the Rental Affordable Unit and pay the rent applicable to (a) a higher Designated
Affordability Level, if a higher Designated Affordability Level exists for the Property, for which
the Over-Income Tenant’s Annual Household Income qualifies, whereupon Developer shall
change the Designated Affordability Level of the Rental Affordable Unit to the higher Designated
Affordability Level pursuant to Section 4.6.6, or (b) a like-sized Market-Rate Unit, if the Over-
Income Tenant’s Annual Household Income does not qualify for a higher Designated Affordability
Level or if a higher Designated Affordability Level does not exist at the Property, but qualifies for
a like-sized Market-Rate Unit, whereupon Developer shall designate a Market-Rate Unit as a
Rental Affordable Unit pursuant to Section 4.6.6.
4.6.6 Changes to Unit Location. Developer may only change the designation of a
Rental Affordable Unit to a new Designated Affordability Level or to a Market-Rate Unit as
necessary to allow an Over-Income Tenant to remain in the unit. Following any change in
designation of a Rental Affordable Unit to a higher Designated Affordability Level or to a Market-
Rate Unit, as applicable, Developer shall designate, as expeditiously as possible, the next available
Rental Affordable Unit at that same higher Designated Affordability Level or Market-Rate Unit
of similar size and location in the Property to the lower Designated Affordability Level from which
the original Rental Affordable Unit had been changed in order to bring the Property in conformity
with the Affordability Requirement. Developer shall notify the Agency of any such redesignation
as expeditiously as possible.
4.6.7 Rent from Subsidies. Nothing herein shall be construed to prevent Developer from
collecting rental operating subsidy or rental-related payments from any federal or District of
Columbia agency paid to Developer and/or an Affordable Unit Tenant, or on behalf of an
Affordable Unit Tenant, to the extent receipt of such payment is otherwise in compliance with the
requirements of this Covenant. So long as Developer is in compliance with the requirement that a
Qualified Tenant is paying no more than fifty percent (50%) of its Annual Household Income
toward Maximum Allowable Rent, any rental operating subsidy or rental-related payments
received by Developer, together with the Qualified Tenant’s payment, may exceed the Maximum
Allowable Rent for the applicable Affordable Unit.
4.7 No Subleasing of Rental Affordable Units. An Affordable Unit Tenant may not sublease
any portion of its Rental Affordable Unit or assign its lease to any other Household and Developer
shall not knowingly allow such Rental Affordable Unit to be subleased, except with the Agency’s
prior written consent, in the Agency’s sole and absolute discretion. This prohibition includes short-
term renting to, or permitting occupancy by, Persons who are not included in an Affordable Unit
Tenant’s Household, of all or a portion of the Affordable Unit, either directly or through services
such as AirBnb or other rental agency providers.
4.8 Representations of Affordable Unit Tenant. By execution of a lease for a Rental
Affordable Unit, each Affordable Unit Tenant shall be deemed to represent and warrant to the
Agency and Developer, each of whom may rely thereon, that the Affordable Unit Tenant meets,
and will continue to meet, all eligibility requirements contained in this Covenant for the rental of
a Rental Affordable Unit.
11

4.9 Representations of Developer. By execution of a lease for a Rental Affordable Unit,
Developer shall be deemed to represent and warrant to the Agency, which may rely on the
following, that: (i) the Household is determined to be a Qualified Tenant by the Certifying Entity,
and (ii) Developer is not collecting more than the Maximum Allowable Rent.
4.10 Annual Reporting Requirements. Beginning with the first occupancy of any Affordable
Unit, Developer shall provide an annual report (“Annual Report”) to the Agency regarding the
Rental Affordable Units, which shall be submitted on each anniversary date of the Effective Date
of this Covenant. The Annual Report shall include the following:
(a) the number and identification of the Rental Affordable Units, including identifying any
Rental Affordable Units that had been redesignated during the previous year in accordance with
Section 4.6.6, by bedroom count, that are occupied;
(b) the number and identification of the Rental Affordable Units, including identifying any
Rental Affordable Units that had been redesignated during the previous year in accordance with
Section 4.6.6, by bedroom count, that are vacant;
(c) for each Rental Affordable Unit that is vacant or that was vacant for a portion of the
previous year, the manner in which the Rental Affordable Unit became vacant (e.g. eviction or
voluntary departure) and the progress in re-leasing that unit;
(d) for each occupied Rental Affordable Unit, the names and ages of all persons in the
Household, the Household size, date of initial occupancy, and total Annual Household Income as
of the date of the most recent Certification of Income, Affordability and Housing Size;
(e) a sworn statement that, to the best of Developer’s information and knowledge, the
Household occupying each Rental Affordable Unit meets the eligibility criteria of this Covenant;
(f) a copy of each Certification of Income, Affordability and Housing Size received by
Developer during the previous year for each Household renting a Rental Affordable Unit;
(g) a copy of each Declaration of Eligibility received by Developer during the previous
year for each Household renting a Rental Affordable Unit;
(h) a copy of each inspection report and Certification of Inspection for each Rental
Affordable Unit; and
(i) a copy of all forms, policies, procedures, and other documents reasonably requested by
the Agency related to the Rental Affordable Units.
12

The Annual Reports shall be retained by Developer for a minimum of five (5) years after
submission and shall be available, upon reasonable notice, for inspection by the Agency or its
designee. Notwithstanding anything contained herein to the contrary, in the event that Developer
provides a report to an agency within the District government with content substantially similar to
the content of the Annual Reports described in this section, subject to the Agency’s prior written
approval, then the reporting requirements under this section shall be satisfied upon Developer’s
delivery of such report to the Agency. The Agency may request Developer to provide additional
information in support of its Annual Report.
4.11 Confidentiality. Except as may be required by applicable law, including, without
limitation to, the District of Columbia Freedom of Information Act of 1976, D.C. Code § 2-531 et
seq., Developer, the Certifying Entity and the Agency shall not disclose to third parties the personal
information of the Households, including the identity of the Households, submitted as a part of the
Annual Report.
4.12 Inspection Rights. The Agency or its designee shall have the right to inspect the Rental
Affordable Units, upon reasonable advance notice to Developer. If Developer receives such
notice, Developer shall, in turn, give reasonable advance notice of the inspection to the tenant(s)
occupying the specific Rental Affordable Unit(s). The Agency or its designee shall have the right
to inspect a random sampling of the Rental Affordable Units to confirm that the units are in
compliance with applicable statutory and regulatory housing requirements and as otherwise
permitted under this Covenant. The Agency or its designee shall have the right to conduct audits
of a random sampling of the Rental Affordable Units and associated files and documentation to
confirm compliance with the requirements of this Covenant.
ARTICLE V
SALE OF AFFORDABLE UNITS
5.1 Sale of For Sale Affordable Units. In the event the Project contains For Sale Affordable
Units, the Owner shall comply with the provisions of this Article V for the sale of such Affordable
Units. Owner shall not convey all or any part of its fee interest (“Sale”), whether or not for
consideration, in a For Sale Affordable Unit to any Person other than a Qualified Purchaser.
Developer and each Affordable Unit Owner of such For Sale Affordable Unit shall only sell to a
buyer who has obtained a Certification of Income, Affordability and Housing Size from a
Certifying Entity and who is a Qualified Purchaser.
5.1.1 Maximum Sales Price. The sale price of each For Sale Affordable Unit upon an initial
Sale shall not exceed the amount (the “Maximum Sales Price”) in the then-current Rent and Price
Schedule. The Developer shall submit to the Agency the proposed sales price for each For Sale
Affordable Unit for approval prior to the marketing and sale of such For Sale Affordable Unit.
5.1.2 Maximum Resale Price. The Maximum Resale Price for each Sale subsequent to
the initial Sale shall be calculated in accordance with Schedule 1 attached hereto and incorporated
herein. The Agency shall approve the Maximum Resale Prices for each For Sale Affordable Unit
prior to the marketing and resale of such For Sale Affordable Unit.
13

5.1.3 Housing Purchase Assistance Program and other subsidized funding. The
Maximum Sales Price and Maximum Resale Price of a For Sale Affordable Unit shall be
determined as described in Sections 5.1.1 and 5.1.2, regardless of the prospective buyer’s use of
Housing Purchase Assistance Program and/or other subsidized funding for the purchase of the For
Sale Affordable Unit.
5.2 Procedures for Sales. The following procedures shall apply to (i) Developer with respect
to the initial Sale of a For Sale Affordable Unit, and (ii) an Affordable Unit Owner of a For Sale
Affordable Unit desiring to sell his or her For Sale Affordable Unit.
5.2.1 Income Eligibility. For any Qualified Purchaser, the Annual Household Income
shall be determined within thirty (30) days of the date of the sales contract for such For Sale
Affordable Unit. Each Qualified Purchaser shall have its Annual Household Income verified by
and obtain a Certification of Income, Affordability and Housing Size from the Certifying Entity
prior to entering into the contract. To the extent closing on the sale of a For Sale Affordable Unit
will not occur within one hundred twenty (120) days after the date of the sales contract, the Annual
Household Income of the prospective Qualified Purchaser shall be determined again, so that the
Certification of Income, Affordability and Housing Size is dated no more than one hundred twenty
(120) days prior to the closing. The Certifying Entity shall determine a Household’s eligibility to
purchase a For Sale Affordable Unit by verifying that (a) the Household’s Annual Household
Income is less than the Maximum Annual Household Income for the applicable For Sale
Affordable Unit; (b) the Household will not expend more than fifty percent (50%) of its monthly
Annual Household Income on Housing Cost for the applicable For Sale Affordable Unit; and (c)
the Household meets the Occupancy Standard for the applicable For Sale Affordable Unit.
5.2.2 Sale. A Sale of a For Sale Affordable Unit shall only be effective if (a) a
Declaration of Eligibility submitted by a Household to Owner and dated no more than one hundred
twenty (120) days prior to the closing of such Sale is recorded prior to or contemporaneous with
the deed conveying the Affordable Unit and (b) a Certification of Income, Affordability and
Housing Size is completed by a Certifying Entity within one hundred twenty (120) days before
closing of such Sale. Owner, Mortgagee(s), District and any title insurer shall each be a third party
beneficiary of each such Declaration of Eligibility and Certification of Income, Affordability and
Housing Size.
5.2.3 Resale. Prior to a Sale of a For Sale Affordable Unit by an Affordable Unit Owner,
the Affordable Unit Owner intending to sell such unit shall (i) contact the Agency to obtain the
Maximum Resale Price and (ii) refer the prospective purchaser to the Agency to initiate the process
of determining their Household’s eligibility to purchase the For Sale Affordable Unit.
5.3 Closing Procedures and Form of Deed.
5.3.1 Owner to Provide Copy of Covenant. Owner shall provide the Qualified Purchaser
with a copy of this Covenant at least thirty (30) days prior to the closing on the Sale of the For
Sale Affordable Unit. Qualified Purchasers shall execute an Acknowledgment of Covenant on or
before the date of closing on such Sale.
14

5.3.2 Form of Deed. All deeds used to convey a For Sale Affordable Unit must have a
fully executed Declaration of Eligibility attached and shall include the following statement in
twelve (12) point or larger type, in all capital letters, on the front page of the deed:
THIS DEED IS DELIVERED AND ACCEPTED SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS
AND CONDITIONS SET FORTH IN THAT CERTAIN AFFORDABLE HOUSING
COVENANT, DATED AS OF ___________, 20_ RECORDED AMONG THE LAND
RECORDS OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA AS INSTRUMENT NUMBER
_________________, ON _______________ 20___, WHICH AMONG OTHER THINGS
IMPOSES RESTRICTIONS ON THE SALE AND CONVEYANCE OF THE SUBJECT
PROPERTY.
5.3.3 Deed for For Sale Affordable Unit. A deed for a For Sale Affordable Unit shall not
be combined with any other property, including parking spaces or storage facilities, unless the
price of such other property is included in the Maximum Sales Price (for initial Sales) or Maximum
Resale Price (for subsequent Sales).
5.3.4 Post-Closing Obligations. The purchaser of a For Sale Affordable Unit shall
submit to the Agency within thirty (30) days after the closing a copy of the final executed Closing
Disclosure, a copy of the deed recorded in the Land Records, the executed Declaration of
Eligibility, the executed Certification of Income, Affordability and Housing Size, and the executed
Acknowledgment of Covenant.
5.4 Representations of Owner. By execution of a deed for a For Sale Affordable Unit,
Developer (for initial Sales) and the Affordable Unit Owner (for subsequent Sales) shall be deemed
to represent and warrant to, and agree with, the Agency and, if applicable, the title company, each
of whom may rely on the following: that (i) the Household has been determined to be a Qualified
Purchaser of the applicable For Sale Affordable Unit by the Certifying Entity, and (ii) the sale
price satisfies the terms of this Covenant.
5.5 Annual Certification of Residency. During the Affordability Period, the Affordable Unit
Owner shall submit to the Agency annually on the anniversary of the closing date for a For Sale
Affordable Unit, a Certification of Residency. The Certification of Residency shall be submitted
on or with such form as may be prescribed by Agency.
5.6 Leasing For Sale Affordable Units. An Affordable Unit Owner shall not lease, or permit
a sublease of, a For Sale Affordable Unit, or any portion thereof, without the Agency’s prior
written approval, in the Agency’s sole and absolute discretion. If the Agency approves the lease
of a For Sale Affordable Unit, then that Affordable Unit shall be leased in compliance with District
(e.g. rental unit registration) and federal laws, and any applicable corporate governing documents
(e.g. condominium, cooperative or home owners’ association bylaws or rules) and any Mortgage
or other loan documents applicable to the Affordable Unit. This prohibition includes short-term
renting to, or permitting occupancy by, Persons who are not included in an Affordable Unit
Owner’s Household, of all or a portion of the Affordable Unit, either directly or through services
such as AirBnb or other rental agency providers.
15

5.7 Transfers.
5.7.1 Except as provided in Article VIII, in the event an Affordable Unit Owner
voluntarily or involuntarily transfers all or part of the For Sale Affordable Unit pursuant to
operation of law, court order, divorce or death to a transferee, heir, devisee, or other personal
representative of such owner of a For Sale Affordable Unit (each a “Transferee”), such Transferee
shall be automatically bound by all of the terms, obligations, and provisions of this Covenant; and
shall either: (i) occupy the For Sale Affordable Unit if he or she is a Qualified Purchaser or (ii) if
the Transferee is not a Qualified Purchaser, or does not wish to, or is unable to, occupy the For
Sale Affordable Unit, he or she shall promptly sell it in accordance with this Covenant.
5.7.2 In no event shall a Transferee who is not a Qualified Purchaser reside in a For Sale
Affordable Unit for longer than ninety (90) days.
5.8 Progress Reports. Until all initial Sales of For Sale Affordable Units are completed,
Developer shall provide Agency with annual progress reports, or more frequently upon request,
on the status of its sale of Affordable Units.
ARTICLE VI
DEFAULT; ENFORCEMENT AND REMEDIES
6.1 Default; Remedies. In the event Owner, Affordable Unit Tenant, a Person or a Household
defaults under any term of this Covenant and does not cure such default within thirty (30) days
following written notice of such default from the Agency, the District shall have the right to seek
specific performance, injunctive relief and/or other equitable remedies, including compelling the
re-sale or re-leasing of an Affordable Unit and the disgorgement of rents and sale proceeds in
excess of the rental rates and sale prices permitted hereunder plus ten percent (10%) of such excess
amount, for defaults under this Covenant.
6.2 No Waiver. Any delay by the Agency in instituting or prosecuting any actions or
proceedings with respect to a default hereunder, in asserting its rights or pursuing its remedies
hereunder shall not operate as a waiver of such rights.
6.3 Right to Attorney’s Fees. If the District shall prevail in any such legal action to enforce
this Covenant, then Owner, Affordable Unit Tenant, Person or Household against whom the
District prevails, shall pay District all of its costs and expenses, including reasonable attorney fees,
incurred in connection with District efforts to enforce this Covenant. If OAG is counsel for the
District in such legal action, the reasonable attorney fees shall be calculated based on the then
applicable hourly rates established in the most current adjusted Laffey matrix prepared by the Civil
Division of the United States Attorney’s Office for the District of Columbia and the number of
hours employees of OAG prepared for or participated in any such action.
ARTICLE VII
COVENANTS BINDING ON SUCCESSORS AND ASSIGNS
This Covenant is and shall be binding upon the Property and each Affordable Unit and
shall run with the land as of the Effective Date through the Affordability Period. The rights and
obligations of District, Developer, Affordable Unit Owner, and their respective successors, heirs,
16

and assigns shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the foregoing parties and their
respective successors, heirs, and assigns; provided however that all rights of District pertaining to
the monitoring and/or enforcement of the obligations of Developer or Affordable Unit Owner
hereunder shall be retained by District, or such designee of the District as the District may so
determine. No Sale, transfer, or foreclosure shall affect the validity of this Covenant, except as
provided in Article VIII.
ARTICLE VIII
MORTGAGES
8.1 Subordination of Mortgages. All Mortgages placed against the Property, or any portion
thereof, shall be subject and subordinate to this Covenant, except as provided in Section 8.3.3.
8.2 Amount of Mortgage. In no event shall the aggregate amount of all Mortgages placed
against a For Sale Affordable Unit exceed an amount equal to one hundred five percent (105%) of
the Maximum Resale Price for such unit. Prior to obtaining any Mortgage or refinancing thereof,
the Affordable Unit Owner shall request from the Agency the then-current Maximum Resale Price
for its For Sale Affordable Unit.
8.3 Default of Mortgage and Foreclosure.
8.3.1 Notice of Default. The Mortgagee shall provide the Agency written notice of any
notice of default and notice of intent to foreclose under the Mortgage on the For Sale Affordable
Unit. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in no event shall failure to provide such notices preclude the
Mortgagee’s right to proceed with its remedies for default under the Mortgage.
8.3.2 Right of Purchase by the District. The Agency shall have the right to purchase a
For Sale Affordable Unit in the event a notice of default or notice of intent to foreclose for a
Mortgage in first position was recorded in the Land Records. The purchase price shall be an
amount that is the greater of (a) the amount of the debt secured by all Mortgages recorded against
the subject For Sale Affordable Unit, including commercially reasonable costs and expenses, if
any, incurred by Mortgagee as a result of a default and due and payable by the Affordable Unit
Owner under the terms of the Mortgage or (b) the Maximum Resale Price. The Agency shall have
thirty (30) days from the date a notice of default or a notice of foreclosure sale was recorded in the
Land Records to exercise its option and to purchase the For Sale Affordable Unit. The Agency’s
right to purchase shall automatically expire upon the transfer of the For Sale Affordable Unit by
foreclosure or deed in lieu thereof. The Agency may designate another District of Columbia
agency or third party to take title to the For Sale Affordable Unit.
8.3.3 Termination Upon Foreclosure and Assignment. In the event title to a For Sale
Affordable Unit is transferred following foreclosure by, or deed in lieu of foreclosure to a
Mortgagee in first position, or a Mortgage in first position is assigned to the Secretary of HUD,
the terms of this Covenant applicable to such unit shall automatically terminate subject to Sections
8.3.4 and 8.4.
8.3.4 Apportionment of Proceeds. In the event title to a For Sale Affordable Unit is
transferred according to the provisions of Section 8.3.3, the proceeds from such foreclosure or
transfer shall be apportioned and paid as follows: first, to the Mortgagee, in the amount of debt
17

secured under the Mortgage, including commercially reasonable costs and expenses, if any,
incurred by Mortgagee and due and payable by the Affordable Unit Owner under the terms of the
Mortgage; second, to any junior Mortgagees, in the amount of the debt secured under such
Mortgages; third, to the Affordable Unit Owner, up to the amount of the Maximum Resale Price
as of the date of such sale or transfer; and fourth, to the District.
8.3.5 Effect of Foreclosure on this Covenant. Except as provided in Section 8.3.3, in the
event of foreclosure or deed in lieu thereof, this Covenant shall not be released or terminated and
the Mortgagee or any Person who takes title to an Affordable Unit through a foreclosure sale shall
become a Transferee in accordance with Section 5.7.
8.4 Assignment of Mortgage to the Secretary of HUD. In the event a Mortgage recorded in
the first position against a For Sale Affordable Unit is assigned to the Secretary of HUD, the
following shall occur upon the date of assignment: (a) the District’s right to purchase, whether or
not such right has been triggered, shall automatically expire and (b) the terms of this Covenant
applicable to such unit shall automatically terminate pursuant to Section 8.3.3, except that upon
sale of such unit by the For Sale Affordable Owner or foreclosure or deed in lieu thereof, the
proceeds of such sale shall be apportioned as provided in Section 8.3.4.
ARTICLE IX
AMENDMENT OF COVENANT
Except as otherwise provided herein, neither this Covenant, nor any part hereof, can be
amended, modified or released other than as provided herein by an instrument in writing executed
by a duly authorized official of the Agency on behalf of the District, and by a duly authorized
representative of Owner of such Affordable Unit affected by such amendment. Any amendment
to this Covenant that alters the terms and conditions set forth herein shall be recorded among the
Land Records before it shall be deemed effective.
ARTICLE X
AFFORDABILITY PERIOD
All Affordable Units in the Project shall be sold or leased in accordance with the terms of
this Covenant for the “Affordability Period.” The “Affordability Period” for each Affordable Unit
shall run for 99 years. Notwithstanding the foregoing, this Covenant may be released and
extinguished upon the approval of the Agency, in its sole and absolute discretion.
ARTICLE XI
NOTICES
Any notices given under this Covenant shall be in writing and delivered by certified mail
(return receipt requested, postage pre-paid), by hand, or by reputable private overnight commercial
courier service to the applicable Person at the addresses specified in this Article, or to such other
persons or locations as may be designated by the Agency or the Developer from time to time. All
notices to be sent to the Agency shall be sent to the following address:
18

Director
Department of Housing and Community Development
1909 Martin Luther King Jr. Avenue, SE
Washington, DC 20020
Re: Housing Regulation Administration, Affordable Dwelling Unit Monitoring
With a copy emailed to: iz.adu@dc.gov
All notices to be sent to Developer shall be sent to the address given in the preamble. All
notices to be sent to the Affordable Unit Owner shall be sent to the address on record with the
District of Columbia Office of Tax and Revenue. All notices to be sent to any Affordable Unit
Tenant shall be sent to the unit number referenced in its lease. It shall be the responsibility of the
applicable Person and any successor to the applicable Person to provide the Agency with a current
address. The failure of the applicable Person to provide a current address shall be a default under
this Covenant.
Notices shall be deemed delivered as follows: (i) if hand delivered, then on the date of
delivery or refusal thereof; (ii) if by overnight courier service, then on the next business day after
deposit with the overnight courier service; and (iii) if by certified mail (return receipt requested,
postage pre-paid), then on the date of actual delivery or refusal thereof.
ARTICLE XII
MISCELLANEOUS
12.1 Applicable Law: Forum for Disputes. This Covenant shall be governed by, interpreted
under, and construed and enforced in accordance with the laws of the District of Columbia, without
reference to the conflicts of laws provisions thereof. Owner, Affordable Unit Tenants and the
District irrevocably submit to the jurisdiction of the courts of the District of Columbia (including
the Superior Court of the District of Columbia) for the purposes of any suit, action, or other
proceeding arising out of this Covenant or any transaction contemplated hereby. Owner,
Affordable Unit Tenants, and the District irrevocably and unconditionally waive any objection to
the laying of venue of any action, suit, or proceeding arising out of this Covenant or the
transactions contemplated hereby in the courts of the District of Columbia (including the Superior
Court of the District of Columbia), and hereby further waive and agree not to plead or claim in any
such court that any such action, suit or proceeding brought in any such court has been brought in
an inconvenient forum.
12.2 Counterparts. This Covenant may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of
which shall be an original but all of which shall together constitute one and the same instrument.
12.3 Time of Performance. All dates for performance (including cure) shall expire at 5:00
p.m. (Eastern Time) on the performance or cure date. A performance date which falls on a
Saturday, Sunday or District holiday is automatically extended to the next Business Day.
12.4 Waiver of Jury Trial. TO THE EXTENT PERMITTED BY LAW, ALL PARTIES
HERETO WAIVE THE RIGHT TO TRIAL BY JURY IN CONNECTION WITH ANY
19

LITIGATION ARISING IN RESPECT OF THIS COVENANT OR THE TRANSACTIONS
CONTEMPLATED HEREBY.
12.5 Further Assurances. Each party agrees to execute and deliver to the other party such
additional documents and instruments as the other party reasonably may request in order to fully
carry out the purposes and intent of this Covenant; provided that such additional documents and
instruments do not materially increase the obligations or burdens upon the second party.
12.6 Severability. If any provision of this Covenant is held to be unenforceable or illegal for
any reason, said provision shall be severed from all other provisions. Said other provisions shall
remain in effect without reference to the unenforceable or illegal provision, unless this construction
would constitute a substantial deviation from the general intent of the parties as reflected in this
Covenant.
12.7 Limitation on Liability. Provided that Owner has exercised reasonable due diligence in
the performance of its obligations and duties herein, no Owner shall be liable in the event a
Household submits falsified documentation, commits fraud, or breaches any representation or
warranty contained in this Covenant. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Owner shall be liable if
Owner has knowledge, or should have knowledge, that a Household submitted falsified
documentation, committed fraud, or breached any representation or warranty contained in this
Covenant.
12.8 Agency Limitation on Liability. Any review or approval by the District or the Agency
shall not be deemed to be an approval, warranty, or other certification by the District or the Agency
as to compliance of such submissions, the Project, any Affordable Unit, or the Property with any
building codes, regulations, standards, laws, or any requirements contained in this Covenant or
any other covenant granted in favor of the District that is filed among the Land Records; or
otherwise contractually required. The District shall incur no liability in connection with the
Agency’s review of any submissions required under this Covenant as its review is solely for the
purpose of protecting the District’s interest under this Covenant.
12.9 No Third Party Beneficiary. Except as expressly set forth in this Covenant, there are no
intended third party beneficiaries of this Covenant, and no Person other than District shall have
standing to bring an action for breach of or to enforce the provisions of this Covenant.
12.10 Representations of Developer. As of the date hereof, Developer hereby represents and
warrants to District as follows:
(a) This Covenant has been duly executed and delivered by Developer, and constitutes the
legal, valid, and binding obligation of Developer, enforceable against Developer, and its
successors and assigns, in accordance with its terms;
(b) Neither the entering into of this Covenant nor performance hereunder will constitute
or result in a violation or breach by Developer of any agreement or order which is binding on
Developer; and
(c) Developer (i) is duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws
of its jurisdiction of organization and is qualified to do business and is in good standing under the
20

laws of the District of Columbia; (ii) is authorized to perform under this Covenant; and (iii) has all
necessary power to execute and deliver this Covenant.
12.11 Federal Affordability Restrictions. In the event the Property is encumbered by other
affordability restrictions (“Federal Affordability Restrictions”) as a result of federal funding or
the issuance of Low-Income Housing Tax Credits for the Project, it is expressly understood and
agreed that in the event the requirements in this Covenant would cause a default of or finding of
non-compliance (“Conflict”) with the Federal Affordability Restrictions during the compliance
period for the Federal Affordability Restrictions, then the requirements of the Federal Affordability
Restrictions shall control to the extent of the Conflict. In all other instances, the requirements of
this Covenant shall control.
[Signatures on Following Pages]
21

IN TESTIMONY WHEREOF, Developer has caused these presents to be signed,
acknowledged and delivered in its name by________________, its duly authorized
____________, witnessed by _________________________________, its
___________________
WITNESS DEVELOPER
By: By: [SEAL]
Name:
Name: ______________________________ Title: _______________________________
Title: _______________________________
CITY OF WASHINGTON
ss.
DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
I, __________________________________, a Notary Public in and for the District of
Columbia, DO HEREBY CERTIFY THAT ___________ who is personally known to be (or
proved by oaths of credible witnesses to be) the person named as _________________ for
________________________________ in the foregoing and annexed Affordable Housing
Covenant, bearing the date of the ______________ personally appeared before me in said District
of Columbia, and as ____________, acting on behalf of _______________________________,
as aforesaid, acknowledged the same to be his/her free act and deed.
Given under my hand and seal this ____ day of_____________.
Notary Public
My Commission Expires: ___________________
22

APPROVED AND ACCEPTED THIS ______ DAY OF ______________, 20__:
DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, by and through
the Office of the Deputy Mayor for Planning
and Economic Development
By:
Name:
Title: Deputy Mayor
LEGAL REVIEW
By: ___________________________
Office of the General Counsel
District of Columbia, ss:
I, ___________________, a Notary Public in and for the District of Columbia, do hereby
certify that _________________________, the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic
Development, on behalf of the District of Columbia, personally appeared before me in said
jurisdiction, and, being personally known to me (or satisfactorily proven) to the person whose
name is subscribed to the foregoing Affordable Housing Covenant, and that he/she, in such
capacity, being authorized to do so, executed the foregoing instrument for the purposes therein
contained, and acknowledged the same to be the act and deed of the District of Columbia.
Given under my hand and seal this _______ day of __________________, 20____.
______________________________
Notary Public, D.C.
My commission expires: _______________________
23

EXHIBIT A
Legal Description of Property
[See attached]

EXHIBIT B
Rental Affordable Unit Lease Rider
This Rental Affordable Unit Lease Rider (“Rider”) is attached to and incorporated into the lease dated
(“Lease”) between (“Resident” or “You”) and , as Management Agent (“Manager”)
for (“Owner”) for Affordable Unit number (“Premises”), located at , Washington DC
.
In consideration of the mutual covenants set forth in the Lease and below, you agree that your use and
possession of the Premises is subject to the terms and conditions set forth in the Lease and the following
terms and conditions, which are in addition to and supplement the Lease:
AFFORDABLE UNIT: Resident acknowledges that the Premises is subject to that certain Affordable
Housing Covenant between Owner and the District of Columbia dated ___________________, 20__, as
may be subsequently amended, (the “Affordable Housing Covenant”). The Premises is currently designated
as an Affordable Unit, which requires the Resident’s household income to be less than or equal to [____]
of the median family income (MFI) or area median income (AMI).
DEFINED TERMS: Those terms not specifically defined herein shall be assigned the definition provided
in the Affordable Housing Covenant.
ELIGIBILITY: In order for you, as Resident, to be eligible to rent an Affordable Unit, you must be and
remain an “Affordable Unit Tenant” as defined in the Affordable Housing Covenant.
INCOME RECERTIFICATION: No more than ninety (90) days and no less than forty-five (45) days
before each anniversary of the first day of the lease, the Manager shall request that the Resident provide the
Certifying Entity with the following:
(i) an executed Declaration of Eligibility that states that Resident is not an Over-Income Tenant and
is and will continue to occupy the Premises as his/her/their principal residence,
(ii) all information pertaining to the Resident’s household composition and documentation of income
for all household members,
(iii) a release authorizing third party sources to provide relevant information regarding the Resident’s
eligibility for the Affordable Unit, as well as how to contact such sources, and
(iv) any other reasonable and customary representations, information or documents requested by the
Certifying Entity.
Resident shall submit the foregoing listed documentation to the Certifying Entity within fifteen (15) days
of Manager’s request. Within ten (10) days of Certifying Entity’s receipt of the foregoing documentation
and based on the results of the annual income recertification review, Certifying Entity will determine
whether the Resident remains income eligible for the Premises and notify the Resident of his or her
household’s MFI percentage, and (a) if the Resident is no longer income eligible for the Premises, the
income category for which the Resident is income eligible to lease a unit in the apartment community, or
(b) if the Resident is income eligible for the Premises, provide a Certification of Income, Affordability and
Housing Size completed by the Certifying Entity, verifying that the income of the Resident meets income
eligibility for the Premises.
25

Upon annual recertification, if the Resident remains income eligible for the Premises, the Resident will be
eligible to remain in the Premises at the time of lease renewal and to renew his/her lease at the then-current
lease rate for the Premises. If the Resident’s Annual Household Income is determined to exceed 140% of
the Maximum Annual Household Income applicable to the Premises, then the Resident shall be deemed an
“Over-Income Tenant” as provided in the Covenant and may either (a) remain in the Premises and pay the
rent applicable to an Affordable Unit at a higher Designated Affordability Level for which the Resident’s
Annual Household Income qualifies, if available at the Property, or (b) if an Affordable Unit at a higher
Designated Affordability Level is not available at the Property, remain in the Premises and pay the rent
applicable to a market-rate unit of like size and location.
Manager will notify Resident of all options (i.e., an Affordable Unit at a different Designated Affordability
Level or a market rate unit) for which Resident is income eligible at least __ days prior to the expiration of
the Resident’s lease term. Prior to the expiration of the Resident’s lease term, the Resident shall notify
Manager in writing of the Resident’s election to either (i) remain in the Premises and pay the rental rate
applicable to the Resident’s then current Designated Affordability Level if the Resident is not an Over-
Income Tenant, (ii) remain in the Premises paying the market rate rent for that unit if the Resident is an
Over-Income Tenant, or (iii) vacate the Premises at the end of the Resident’s Lease term. Resident’s failure
to notify Manager of Resident’s election prior to the expiration of the lease term will be deemed by Manager
as Resident’s election to vacate the Premises.
In the event that Resident fails to pay the applicable rental rate or vacate the Premises upon expiration of
the lease term, Manager may pursue an action for eviction of Resident. Resident’s agreement to pay the
applicable rental rate or vacate was a condition precedent to Manager’s initial acceptance of Resident’s
eligibility and Manager has relied on Resident’s agreement. Resident acknowledges and agrees that the
criteria to be income eligible to occupy the Premises is and serves as a District policy and objective, and
that failure to vacate the Premises or pay the applicable rental rate is both a default under the Lease and in
violation of the Affordable Housing Covenant.
PROHIBITION ON SUBLETS AND ASSIGNMENTS: Resident may not sublease all or any portion
of the Premises or assign its lease to any other person, except with the prior written consent of the D.C.
Department of Housing and Community Development, in its sole and absolute discretion. This prohibition
includes short-term renting to, or permitting occupancy by, persons who are not members of Tenant’s
household, of all or a portion of the Premises, either directly or through services such as “AirBnb” or other
rental agency providers.
LEASE EFFECTIVE: The Lease of the Premises shall only be effective if this executed Rider, a
Certification of Income, Affordability and Housing Size, a Declaration of Eligibility are attached as exhibits
to the lease agreement.
____________________________ ________________
Resident Signature Date
____________________________ ________________
Resident Signature Date
____________________________ ________________
Resident Signature Date
26

EXHIBIT C
Affordable Unit Index
27

SCHEDULE 1
Provisions Governing Calculation of Maximum Resale Price
1. The Maximum Resale Price (“MRP”) for a subsequent sale of a For Sale Affordable Unit
shall be determined through use of the formula MRP = P x ( F) + V (“Formula”), where:
(a) P = the price Owner paid for the Affordable Unit;
(b) V = the sum of the value of the Eligible Capital Improvements and Eligible
Replacement and Repair Costs, as determined by the Agency pursuant to this
section; and
(c) F = the average of the Ten Year Compound Annual Growth Rates of the Median
Family Income (“MFI”) from the first year of ownership of the For Sale
Affordable Unit to the year of the sale of the For Sale Affordable Unit by the
Affordable Unit Owner. This average may be expressed:
(1) As the result of the formula F = (1 + [((MFI Year m /MFI Year m-10) ^
(1/10) -1) +…((MFI Year k /MFI year k-10) ^ (1/10) -1) / n]) ^ n, where
m = the year after the Affordable Unit was purchased by Owner, k = the
year in which the Affordable Unit is sold by Owner, and n = the number
of years the Affordable Unit is owned by Owner; or
(2) As published by the Agency.
2. For the purposes of determining the value of “V” in the Formula, the following
improvements made to a For Sale Affordable Unit after the date of purchase may be included at
the percentage of cost indicated, to the extent they are permanent in nature and add to the market
value of the property:
(a) Eligible Capital Improvements, which will be valued at 100% of reasonable
cost, as determined by the Agency; and
(b) Eligible Replacement and Repair Costs, which shall be valued at 50% of
reasonable cost, as determined by the Agency.
3. Ineligible costs shall not be included in the determining the value of “V” in the Formula.
4. The value of improvements may be determined by the Agency based upon documentation
provided by the Affordable Unit Owner or, if not provided, upon a standard value established by
the Agency.
5. The Agency may disallow an Eligible Capital Improvement or Eligible Replacement and
Repair Cost if the Agency finds that the improvement diminished or did not increase the fair market
value of the For Sale Affordable Unit or if the improvements make the Affordable Unit
unaffordable to all Qualified Purchasers at the Designated Affordability Level .
28

6. The Agency may reduce the value of a capital improvement if there is evidence of abnormal
physical deterioration of, or abnormal wear and tear to, the capital improvement.
7. Owner shall permit a representative of the Agency to inspect the For Sale Affordable Unit
upon request to verify the existence and value of any capital improvements that are claimed by
Owner.
8. No allowance shall be made in the Maximum Resale Price for the payment of real estate
brokerage fees associated with the sale of the For Sale Affordable Unit.
9. The value of personal property transferred to a purchaser in connection with the resale of
a For Sale Affordable Unit shall not be considered part of the sales price of the For Sale Affordable
Unit for the purposes of determining whether the sales price of the For Sale Affordable Unit
exceeds the MRP.
10. Any capitalized terms used in this Schedule that are not defined herein shall have the
meanings set forth in the Covenant. As used in this Schedule, the following capitalized terms shall
have the meanings indicated below:
Eligible Capital Improvement: major structural system upgrades, special assessments, new
additions, and improvements related to increasing the health, safety, or energy efficiency of an
Affordable Unit. Such improvements generally include: (i) major electrical wiring system
upgrades; (ii) major plumbing system upgrades; (iii) room additions; (iv) installation of additional
closets and walls; (v) alarm systems; (vi) smoke detectors; (vii) removal of toxic substances, such
as asbestos, lead, mold, or mildew; (viii) insulation or upgrades to double-paned windows or glass
fireplace screens; and (ix) upgrade to Energy Star built-in appliances, such as furnaces, water
heaters, stoves, ranges, dishwashers, and microwave hoods. Improvements that meet these criteria
will be given 100% credit by the Agency.
Eligible Replacement and Repair Cost: in-kind replacement of existing amenities and repairs
and general maintenance that keep an Affordable Unit in good working condition. Such
improvements generally include: (i) electrical maintenance and repair, such as switches and
outlets; (ii) plumbing maintenance and repair, such as faucets, supply lines, and sinks;
(iii) replacement or repair of flooring, countertops, cabinets, bathroom tile, or bathroom vanities;
(viii) non-Energy Star replacement of built-in appliances, including furnaces, water heaters, stoves,
ranges, dishwashers, and microwave hoods; (ix) replacement of window sashes; (x) fireplace
maintenance or in-kind replacement; (xi) heating system maintenance and repairs; and (xii)
lighting system. Costs that meet these criteria will be given 50% credit for repairs as determined
by the Agency.
Ineligible Costs: means costs of cosmetic enhancements, installations with limited useful life
spans and non-permanent fixtures not eligible for capital improvement credit as determined by the
Agency. These improvements generally include: (i) cosmetic enhancements such as fireplace tile
and mantel, decorative wall coverings or hangings, window treatments (blinds, shutters, curtains,
etc.), installed mirrors, shelving, refinishing of existing surfaces; (ii) non-permanent fixtures, such
as track lighting, door knobs, handles and locks, portable appliances (refrigerator, microwave,
29

stove/ oven, etc.); and (iii) installations with limited useful life spans, such as carpet, painting of
existing surfaces, window glass and light bulbs.
30

EXHIBIT C
AFFORDABLE HOUSING PLAN
Developer will comply with all affordable housing requirements of D.C. Official Code §10-
801, and the requirements of District of Columbia’s Inclusionary Zoning program.
The size, location, and distribution of the Affordable Units throughout the Project shall
comply with the requirements contained in the Affordable Housing Covenants.
OPTION A - Residential Parcel Development Plan
(PUD option with Air Rights Parcel)
Total
Total
≤30% >30% and Market
Option A ADU
MFI ≤50% MFI Rate
Units
Units
7 17
Studio 3 4
39 90
Junior 1-Bedroom 10 29
29 68
1 Bedroom 7 22
10 24
1 Bedroom + Den 2 8
11 24
2 Bedroom 3 8
1 2
3 Bedroom 0 1
- -
4 Bedroom - -
TOTAL (per MFI band) 25 72 97 225
1

OPTION B - Residential Parcel Development Plan
(PUD option without Air Rights Parcel)
Total
Total
≤30% >30% and Market
Option B ADU
MFI ≤50% MFI Rate
Units
Units
7 14
Studio 3 4
34 80
Junior 1-Bedroom 9 25
26 60
1 Bedroom 6 20
9 21
1 Bedroom + Den 2 7
9 22
2 Bedroom 2 7
1 2
3 Bedroom 0 1
- -
4 Bedroom - -
TOTAL (per MFI band) 22 64 86 199
2

CBE AGREEMENT – Reeves Center Redevelopment / 2000 14th Street NW
CERTIFIED BUSINESS ENTERPRISE
UTILIZATION AND PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT
THIS CERTIFIED BUSINESS ENTERPRISE UTILIZATION AND
PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT (this “Agreement”) is made by and between the DISTRICT
OF COLUMBIA (the “District”), a municipal corporation acting by and through the DISTRICT
OF COLUMBIA DEPARTMENT OF SMALL AND LOCAL BUSINESS
DEVELOPMENT (“DSLBD”) and Reeves CMC Venture, LLC, a District of Columbia limited
liability company, or its designees, successors or assigns (the “Developer”).
RECITALS
A. Pursuant to a Land Disposition and Development Agreement entered into between the
Developer and the District, by and through the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic
Development, Developer intends to provide for the development of a mixed-use development
comprised of multiple uses including approximately: 322 residential mixed-income rental units;
108,000 square foot office space; 116-key hotel; 22,500 square feet of retail area including a
restaurant, comedy club, and child development center; 44,000 square feet of theater, rehearsal
and arts space; 17,000 square foot outdoor plaza space inclusive of a built-in amphitheater; and
366 underground parking spaces (the “Project”).
B. Pursuant to the Land Disposition and Development Agreement, the Developer
covenants that it has executed and will comply in all respects with this Agreement.
C. Capitalized terms not defined herein shall have the meaning assigned to them in the
Land Disposition and Development Agreement.
NOW, THEREFORE, for and in consideration of the mutual covenants and agreements
contained herein, the receipt and adequacy of which is hereby acknowledged by both parties
hereto, DSLBD and the Developer agree, as follows:
ARTICLE I
UTILIZATION OF CERTIFIED BUSINESS ENTERPRISES
Section 1.1 CBE Utilization. Developer, on its behalf and/or on behalf of its successors and
assigns (if any), shall hire and contract with Small Business Enterprises (“SBE”) certified
pursuant to the Small and Certified Business Enterprise Development and Assistance Act of
2014, as amended, (D.C. Law 20-108; D.C. Official Code § 2-218.01 et seq.) (the “Act”), in
connection with the predevelopment and development phases of the Project, including but not
limited to, design, professional and technical services, construction management and trade work,
development, renovation and suppliers. Developer shall expend funds contracting and procuring
goods and services from SBEs in an amount equivalent to no less than thirty-five percent (35%)
of the adjusted development budget (“Adjusted Development Budget” or “Adjusted Budget”)
detailed in Attachment 1 (the “CBE Minimum Expenditure”). If there are insufficient qualified
SBEs to fulfill the 35% requirement, the requirement may be satisfied by subcontracting 35% to
qualified Certified Business Enterprises certified pursuant to the Act. SBE and Certified

CBE AGREEMENT – Reeves Center Redevelopment / 2000 14th Street NW
Business Enterprises collectively referred to herein as “CBE.” The Adjusted Development Budget
is $213,694,253. The CBE Minimum Expenditure is therefore $74,792,989.
Section 1.2 Time Period. Developer shall achieve its CBE Minimum Expenditure no later than
thirty (30) days after the issuance of a final Certificate of Occupancy by the District
(“Expenditure Period”). If within three (3) years of the execution of this Agreement the
Developer has not achieved the CBE Minimum Expenditure and has not obtained a final
Certificate of Occupancy, the Developer shall meet with DSLBD to provide a status of the
Project as related to this Agreement.
Section 1.3 Adjustments to the Total Development Budget or CBE Minimum Expenditure. If
the Total Development Budget or the CBE Minimum Expenditure increases or decreases by an
amount greater than 5%, within ten (10) business days Developer shall submit to DSLBD to review
and determine if there is a greater than 5% adjustment to the Adjusted Development Budget or the
CBE Minimum Expenditure (”Adjustment”). The CBE Minimum Expenditure shall be
automatically increased in the case of an increase, or decreased in the case of a decrease, by an
identical percentage of the Adjustment. A modified Attachment 1, approved by DSLBD, shall
become a part of this Agreement and be provided to the Developer and the Office of the District of
Columbia Auditor (“ODCA”).
ARTICLE II
CBE OUTREACH
Section 2.1 Outreach Efforts. Developer shall utilize the resources of DSLBD, including
DSLBD’s website (http://dslbd.dc.gov). In particular, Developer shall submit all contracting
opportunities for this Project to DSLBD for publication. Developer may identify individuals or
businesses that could qualify as CBEs and is encouraged to refer any such firms to DSLBD’s
Certification unit to apply for certification. In the event that Developer develops a website for the
Project, such website shall (i) advertise upcoming bid packages, (ii) present instructions on how to
bid, and (iii) directly link to DSLBD’s website.
ARTICLE III
QUARTERLY REPORTING
Section 3.1 Quarterly Report.
(a) Throughout the Expenditure Period, regardless of whether the CBE Minimum Expenditure is
achieved before the end of the Expenditure Period, Developer will submit quarterly contracting
and subcontracting expenditure reports (“Quarterly Report”) for the Project.
(b)The Quarterly Report shall be submitted to DSLBD and ODCA no later than thirty (30) days
after the end of each quarter. The Quarterly Report shall be submitted on a form provided by
DSLBD (a prototype of this form is included as Attachment 4). However, DSLBD reserves the
right to amend this form.
(c) If the Developer fails to submit a Quarterly Report by the date required in sub-section (b) of
this section, the Developer shall pay a penalty to DSLBD.
2

CBE AGREEMENT – Reeves Center Redevelopment / 2000 14th Street NW
(i) The penalty the Developer shall pay to DSLBD for each Quarterly Report that the
Developer fails to submit by the date required in sub-section (b) of this section shall be
$5,000 for the first offense, $15,000 for the second offense, and $25,000 for each offense
thereafter.
(d) Companies that may be eligible for certification, but are not yet certified, or whose
certification is pending before DSLBD shall not be included in the Quarterly Report unless
and until the company is certified by DSLBD as a CBE.
(i) In order to obtain credit towards the CBE Minimum Expenditure requirement, a
contractor/ subcontractor that is utilized by the Developer must have an active CBE
certification at the time the goods or services are provided (contract/ subcontract
performed) and at the time payment is made to the contractor/ subcontractor.
CREDIT WILL ONLY BE GIVEN FOR THE PORTION OF THE CONTRACT/
SUBCONTRACT PERFORMED BY A CBE USING THEIR OWN ORGANIZATION
AND RESOURCES.
(ii) The Developer will not receive credit towards the CBE Minimum Expenditure if the
Developer’s utilized contractor/ subcontractor:
(1) is not certified by DSLBD as a CBE at the time the goods or services are
provided (contract/ subcontract performed) and at the time payment is made to
the contractor/ subcontractor;
(2) has a pending application before DSLBD seeking CBE certification;
(3) has an expired CBE certification;
(4) has a CBE certification application that DSLBD denied; or
(5) has a CBE certification that has been revoked by DSLBD.
(iii) CBE certification must be valid to receive credit towards the CBE Minimum
Expenditure . If not renewed, the CBE certification will expire. To determine whether a
contractor/ subcontractor has a valid and/or current CBE certification, before goods/
services are provided and payment made, Developer must check the DSLBD website:
https://dslbd.secure.force.com/public/.
(e) Developer must require every CBE that it contracts or subcontracts with to maintain its CBE
certification through the term of and final payment of the contract/ subcontract. If Developer
pays a contractor/ subcontractor that is not certified as a CBE for goods/ services provided when
the contractor/ subcontractor was not a CBE, those payments will not be applied towards the
CBE Minimum Expenditure requirement and the expenditures shall not be included on the
Quarterly Report.
3

CBE AGREEMENT – Reeves Center Redevelopment / 2000 14th Street NW
(f)Concurrently with the submission of the Quarterly Report, Developer shall also submit
vendor verification forms (each, a “Vendor Verification Form”) substantially in the form of
Attachment 5 for each expenditure listed in the Quarterly Report. However, DSLBD reserves
the right to amend this form. If a completed Vendor Verification Form is not submitted for each
contract/subcontract performed by a CBE, or portion thereof, the Developer will not receive
credit towards the CBE Minimum Expenditure for that contract/subcontract.
(g)Concurrently with the submission of the Quarterly Report, Developer shall also submit a
copy of each fully executed contract/subcontract with each CBE contractor/subcontractor
identified in the Quarterly Report. If a fully executed contract/subcontract is not submitted,
the Developer will not receive credit towards the CBE Minimum Expenditure for that
contract/subcontract.
(h)Once the CBE Minimum Expenditure has been achieved, the subsequent Quarterly Report
shall contain the caption “CBE MINIMUM EXPENDITURE ACHIEVED.” Additionally, the
final Quarterly Report shall contain the caption “FINAL QUARTERLY REPORT” and be
accompanied by a copy of the final Certificate of Occupancy issued by the District.
Section 3.2 Mandatory Meeting with DSLBD. Within ten (10) business days of executing this
Agreement, the Developer and CBE Equity and Development Participant(s), as described in
Article V, shall meet with DSLBD to discuss this Agreement’s reporting requirements and
participation, respectively. In the event that DSLBD is unavailable to meet within 10 business
days, Developer shall schedule the meeting on the earliest mutually agreeable date. The
individuals identified below respectively are the reporting point of contacts for the Developer,
CBE Equity and Development Participant(s), and DSLBD.
Charles King
Authorized Party for the Developer
Reeves CMC Venture, LLC
c/o CSG Urban Partners, LLC
875 N Street NW, Suite 202
Washington, DC 20001
(202)347-8257
cking@csgurban.com
Matthew Robinson
Authorized Party for the Developer
Reeves CMC Venture, LLC
c/o MRP Realty
3050 K Street, NW, Suite 125
Washington, DC 20010
(202)997-8355
mrobinson@mrprealty.com
4

CBE AGREEMENT – Reeves Center Redevelopment / 2000 14th Street NW
Charles King
Principal for CBE Equity and Development Participant
CSG Urban Partners
875 N Street, NW, Suite 202
Washington, DC 20001
(202)347-8257
cking@csgurban.com
Charles Cooper
Manager Compliance & Enforcement Division
Department of Small and Local Business Development
441 4th Street, NW, Suite 850N
Washington, DC 20001
(202)727- 3900
Charles.Cooper@dc.gov
ARTICLE IV
PROJECT MANAGERS AND GENERAL CONTRACTORS/CONSTRUCTION
MANAGERS
Section 4.1 Adherence to CBE Minimum Expenditure. For each component of the Project,
Developer shall require in its contractual agreements with the Project Manager (“PM”), or with
the general contractor and/or construction manager for the Project (the “General Contractor” or
“GC”), as applicable, that the PM or GC comply with the relevant obligations and
responsibilities of Developer contained in this Agreement with respect to achieving the
applicable CBE Minimum Expenditure. In the event that the Developer and PM or GC have
already entered a contractual agreement prior to the execution of this Agreement, the Developer
shall work with the PM or GC to assure that the PM or GC will assist the Developer in achieving
the applicable CBE Minimum Expenditure. Developer further agrees to inform the PM or GC
and subcontractors of the other obligations and requirements applicable to the Developer under
this Agreement. Developer shall inform the PM or GC that non-compliance with this Agreement
may negatively impact future opportunities with the District for the Developer and the PM or GC
respectively. Specifically, Developer will require in its contractual agreement with its PM or
GC, or if the Developer and PM or GC have already entered a contractual agreement prior to the
execution of this Agreement, work with its PM or GC, to achieve the following actions in
contracting efforts, in connection with the Project, undertaken after the effective date of this
Agreement:
(i) When soliciting bids for products or services for this Project, the PM or GC shall
allow a reasonable time (e.g., no less than 20 business days) for all bidders to
respond to the invitations or requests for bids.
(ii) The PM or GC will make full use of DSLBD’s website, found at
http://dslbd.dc.gov, for subcontracting opportunities and for compliance
5

CBE AGREEMENT – Reeves Center Redevelopment / 2000 14th Street NW
monitoring.
(iii) The PM or GC will provide a CBE bidder, who is not the low bidder, an
opportunity to provide its final best offer before contract award, provided the
CBE bid price is among the top 3 bidders.
(iv) The PM or GC will not require that CBEs provide bonding on contracts with a
dollar value less than $100,000, provided that in lieu of bonding the PM or GC
may accept a job specific certificate of insurance.
(v) The PM or GC will include in all contracts and subcontracts with CBEs, a process
for alternative dispute resolution. This process shall afford an opportunity for
CBEs to submit documentation of work performed and invoices regarding
requests for payments. Included in the subcontract/contract shall be a mutually
agreed upon provision for mediation (to be conducted by DSLBD) or arbitration
in accordance with the rules of the American Arbitration Association.
(vi) The PM or GC and subcontractors shall strictly adhere to their contractual
obligations to pay all CBE contractors and subcontractors in accordance with the
contractually agreed upon schedule for payments. In the event that there is a
delay in payment to the PM or GC, the PM or GC is to immediately notify the
CBE contractor/subcontractor and advise as to the date on which payment can be
expected.
(vii) The PM or GC commits to pay all CBEs within seven (7) days following the
PM’s or GC’s receipt of a payment, which includes funds for such
contractors/subcontractors, from the Developer. Developer also agrees to
establish a procedure for giving notice to the CBE contractors/subcontractors of
the Developer’s payment to the PM or GC.
(viii) The PM or GC commits to verify a contractor/ subcontractor’s CBE certification
status prior to entering a contract/ subcontract with, accepting goods or services
from, and making payment to a CBE contractor/ subcontractor, in accordance
with Article III of this Agreement.
ARTICLE V
EQUITY PARTICIPATION AND DEVELOPMENT PARTICIPATION
Section 5.1 CBE Equity Participation and Development Participation Requirements:
(i) Minimum CBE Equity Participation and Development Participation
Requirements. Developer acknowledges and agrees that Certified Business
Enterprises as defined in Section 2302 of the Act, D.C. Official Code § 2-218.02,
(“CBEs”) shall receive no less than twenty percent (20%) in sponsor Developer
equity participation (“Equity Participation”) and no less than twenty percent
6

CBE AGREEMENT – Reeves Center Redevelopment / 2000 14th Street NW
(20%) in development participation (“Development Participation”) in the Project,
in accordance with D.C. Official Code § 2-218.49a;
(ii) Pari Passu Returns for CBE Equity Participant(s). Developer agrees that the
CBE Equity Participant(s) shall receive a return on investment in the Project that
is pari passu with all other sources of sponsor Developer equity. In addition, if
CBE Equity Participant(s) elect to contribute additional capital to the Project, they
will receive the same returns as Developer with respect to such additional capital.
However, a CBE Equity Participant’s equity interests shall not be diluted over the
course of the Project, including for failure to contribute additional capital;
(iii) CBE Equity Participation maintained for duration of Project. Developer
agrees that the CBE Equity Participation shall be maintained for the duration of
the Project. Culmination of the Project shall be measured by the issuance of a
certificate of occupancy in accordance with the Expenditure Period as defined in
Section 1.2 herein;
(iv) CBE Equity Participant’s Risk Commensurate with Equity Position. The
CBE Equity Participant(s) shall not bear financial or execution requirements that
are disproportionate with its equity position in the Project;
(v) Management Control and Approval Rights. Equity Participant(s) and
Development Participant(s) shall have management control and approval rights in
line with their equity positions; and
(vi) Representing the entity to the public. Equity Participant(s) and Development
Participant(s) shall be consistently included in representing the entity to the public
(e.g., through joint naming, advertising, branding, etc.).
Section 5.2 Sweat Equity Contribution. No more than 25% of the total 20% equity
participation requirement (“equal to 5%”) set forth in Section 5.1 of this Section may be met by a
CBE providing development services in lieu of a cash equity investment that will be
compensated by the Developer in the future at a date certain (“sweat equity contribution”). The
Developer and the CBE shall sign, and provide to the DSLBD, a service agreement describing
the following:
(i) A detailed description of the scope of work that the CBE will perform;
(ii) The dollar amount that the CBE will be compensated for its services and the
amount the CBE is forgoing as an investment in the Project;
(iii) The date or time period when the CBE will receive compensation;
(iv) The return, if any, the CBE will receive on its sweat equity contribution; and
7

CBE AGREEMENT – Reeves Center Redevelopment / 2000 14th Street NW
(v) An explanation of when the CBE will receive its return as compared to other team
members or investors.
Section 5.3 CBE Inclusion, Recognition, Access and Involvement. Developer acknowledges
that a priority of the District is to ensure that CBE partners on development projects are granted
and encouraged to maintain active involvement in all phases of the development effort, from
initial-pre-development activities through development completion and ongoing asset
management. To assist CBE partners in gaining the skills necessary to participate in larger
development efforts, Developer agrees to provide all CBE partners full and open access to
information utilized in project execution, including, for example, market studies, financial
analyses, project plans and schedules, third-party consultant reports, etc. Developer agrees to
consistently represent and include CBE partners of Developer as team members through such
actions as joint naming (if applicable), advertising, and branding opportunities that incorporate
CBE partners. CBE partners of Developer shall not be precluded from selling services back to
Developer. The CBE partners shall participate in budget, schedule, and strategy meetings. CBE
partners may also participate in the negotiation of development agreements, creating a site plan,
managing design development, hiring and managing consultants, seeking and securing zoning
and entitlements, developing and monitoring budgets, apply for and securing financing,
performing due diligence, marketing and sales of all units, and any other tasks necessary to the
development and construction of the Project.
Section 5.4 No Changes in CBE Equity Participation and Development Participation.
(i) Once the selection of Equity Participant(s) and Development Participant(s) in the
Project have been approved by DSLBD, there can be no change in the Equity
Participation and Development Participation and no dilution of the participants’
Equity Participation and Development Participation without the express written
consent of DSLBD’s Director (the “Director”); and
(ii) Once DSLBD has approved the determination of returns for Equity Participant(s)
in the Project, the determination of returns for Equity Participant(s) shall not be
materially altered or adjusted from that previously presented to DSLBD without
the Director’s express written consent.
Section 5.5 Closing Requirements for CBE Equity Participation and Development
Participation.
(i) The closing documents executed in connection with the Project shall contain
provisions indicating there can be no change of the CBE Equity Participation and
Development Participation, no dilution of a participants’ Equity Participation and
Development Participation, and no material alteration of the determination of
returns for the CBE Equity Participant(s) without the Director’s express written
consent;
(ii) The closing documents shall expressly covenant and agree that DSLBD shall have
third-party beneficiary rights to enforce the provisions, for and in its own right;
8

CBE AGREEMENT – Reeves Center Redevelopment / 2000 14th Street NW
(iii) The agreements and covenants in the closing documents shall run in favor of
DSLBD for the entire period during which the agreements and covenants shall be
in force and effect, without regard to whether the District was or is an owner of
any land or interest therein or in favor of which the agreements and covenants
relate; and
(iv) DSLBD shall have the right, in the event of a breach of the agreement or covenant
in the closing documents, to exercise all the rights and remedies, and to maintain
any actions or suits, at law or in equity, or other proceedings to enforce the curing
of the breach of agreement or covenant to which it may be entitled.
Section 5.6 CBE Equity Participation and Development Participation Restrictive
Covenant.
(i) If there is a transfer of title to any District-owned land that will become part of
the Project, DSLBD may require a restrictive covenant be filed on the land requiring
compliance with the Equity Participation and Development Participation requirements of
the Act; and
(ii) A restrictive covenant requiring compliance with the Equity Participation and
Development Participation shall run with the land and otherwise remain in effect until
released by DSLBD following the completion of construction and of the issuance of
certificates of occupancy for the Project. A release of the restrictive covenant shall be
executed by DSLBD only after either the Developer and the Equity Participant(s) and
Development Participant(s) submit a sworn certification together with documentation
demonstrating to the satisfaction of DSLBD that, or DSLBD otherwise determines that:
(a) The CBE Development Participant(s) received at least 20% of the
development fees for the Project based on the final development
expenditures for such Project; and
(b) The CBE Equity Participant(s) maintained at least a 20% ownership
interest in the sponsor Developer equity in the Project throughout its
development.
Section 5.7 CBE Equity Participation and Development Participation Reports. Developers
must submit quarterly reports to DSLBD and ODCA regarding the fulfillment of the Equity
Participation and Development Participation Program requirements on such forms that may be
determined, and amended, by DSLBD. The reports shall be submitted in accordance with
Section 3.1 of this Agreement and shall include information regarding:
(i) Changes in ownership interest of the owners/partners;
(ii) Additions or deletions of an owner/partner;
9

CBE AGREEMENT – Reeves Center Redevelopment / 2000 14th Street NW
(iii) Changes in the legal status of an existing owner/partner;
(iv) Changes in the percentage of revenue distribution to an owner/partner;
(v) A description of team member activities; and
(vi) The amount of development fees paid to each team member, participant, partner,
or owner.
Section 5.8 Article V of this Agreement Controls.
(i) Article V of this Agreement is incorporated by reference and made a part of the
Operating Agreement or any other similar agreement between the Developer and
the undersigned CBE Equity Participant(s) and Development Participant(s).
(ii) To the extent that Article V of this Agreement shall be deemed to be inconsistent
with any terms or conditions of the Operating Agreement or any other similar
agreement or any exhibits or attachments thereto between the Developer and the
undersigned CBE Equity Participant(s) and Development Participant(s), the terms
of Article V of this Agreement shall govern.
As it relates to or affects the CBE Equity Participant(s) and Development
Participant(s), neither the Operating Agreement or any other similar agreement
between the Developer and the undersigned CBE Equity Participant(s) and
Development Participant(s), nor this Agreement shall be amended to decreased
the participation percentage to less than 20% as mandated by D.C. Official Code
§2-218.49a.
Section 5.9 Equity Participation Unmet. If the Developer is unable to meet the 20% Equity
Participation requirement, including sweat equity contribution and cash equity investment, the
Developer shall pay to the District the outstanding cash equity amount as a fee in lieu of the
unmet Equity Participation requirement.
ARTICLE VI
PENALTIES
Section 6.1 Penalties for Failure to Meet CBE Minimum Expenditure. At the end of the
Expenditure Period as defined herein, DSLBD shall measure the difference between the CBE
Minimum Expenditure and Developer’s actual CBE expenditures. If Developer fails to meet its
CBE Minimum Expenditure as provided in Section 1.1 herein (a “Shortfall”), the Developer
shall pay a penalty equal to 10% of the Adjusted Development Budget ($21,369,425), which
shall be paid to the District of Columbia in the time and in a manner to be determined by
DSLBD.
(i) If the Developer’s Shortfall is less than 10% of the Adjusted Development
Budget, and Developer has taken all actions reasonably necessary (as reasonably
determined by DSLBD based on Developer’s reports and other verifiable
10

CBE AGREEMENT – Reeves Center Redevelopment / 2000 14th Street NW
evidence) to achieve the CBE Minimum Expenditure, the Developer may not be
required to pay a penalty. The Developer may meet its burden to demonstrate it
has taken all actions reasonably necessary to achieve its CBE Minimum
Expenditure by (1) fulfilling all CBE outreach and recruitment efforts identified
in Article II of this Agreement; (2) complying with Article IV of this Agreement;
(3)providing evidence of the General Contractors’ compliance with the
commitments set forth in Article IV of this Agreement, and (4) by taking the
following actions, among other things1:
a. In connection with the preparation of future bid packages, if any, develop a
list of media outlets that target CBEs and potential CBEs hereafter referred to
as “Target Audience” based on D.C. certification criteria;
b. During the initial construction of the Project, place advertisements in media
outlets that address the Target Audience on a regular basis (i.e., each time a
new bid package is sent out) and advertise the programmatic activities
established pursuant to the Agreement on an as needed basis;
c. Mail and/or email new procurement opportunity alerts to targeted CBEs
according to trade category;
d. In connection with the preparation of future bid packages, if any, develop a
list of academic institutions, business and community organizations that
represent the Target Audience so that they may provide updated information
on available opportunities to their constituents;
e. Make presentations and conduct pre-bid conferences advising of contracting
opportunities for the Target Audience either one-on-one or through targeted
business organizations;
f. Provide up to ten (10) sets, in the aggregate, of free plans and specifications
related to the particular bid for business organizations representing Target
Audiences upon request; and
g. Commit to promoting opportunities for joint ventures between non-CBE and
CBE firms to further grow CBEs and increase contract participation.
(ii) If the Developer’s Shortfall is less than 10% of the Adjusted Development
Budget, but Developer has not taken all actions reasonably necessary (as
reasonably determined by DSLBD based on Developer’s reports and other
verifiable evidence) to achieve the CBE Minimum Expenditure, Developer shall
pay a penalty that is equal to the Shortfall.
In the event a CBE hired as part of the Project goes out of business, loses its certification during
the Project, or otherwise cannot perform in accordance with customary and acceptable standards
for the relevant industry, the Developer may identify and hire a substitute CBE capable of
1 See Attachment 6 for a list of additional suggested outreach activities.
11

CBE AGREEMENT – Reeves Center Redevelopment / 2000 14th Street NW
performing in accordance with customary and acceptable standards for the relevant industry. If
the Developer cannot identify and hire a substitute CBE, the Developer may request in writing
that the Director identify a list of substitute CBEs capable of performing in accordance with
customary and acceptable standards for the relevant industry (“Request”). Only if, within ten
(10)business days after receiving the Request, the Director fails to send written notice to the
Developer identifying a list of substitute CBEs to perform the work (and the Developer
determines for an amount no greater than 5% above the remaining balance of the original CBE
contracted amount) may the Developer contract with a non-CBE to perform the work, provided
that the non-CBE contracted amount shall not exceed the balance of the original CBE contracted
amount by greater than 5% (“Approved Deduction”), and the Approved Deduction shall be
deducted from the CBE Minimum Expenditure.
Section 6.2 Failure to Meet Equity and Development Participation Requirements. Failure
to comply with the equity and development participation requirements of Article V of this
Agreement shall constitute a material breach of this Agreement and of the Land Disposition and
Development Agreement.
Section 6.3 Other Remedies. Failure to pay any required penalties in the time and manner
specified by DSLBD shall be a material breach of this Agreement. In the event that the
Developer breaches any of its obligations under this Agreement, in addition to the remedies
stated herein, DSLBD does not waive its right to seek any other remedy against the Developer,
the general contractor of the Project and any manager of the Project that might otherwise be
available at law or in equity, including specific performance.
Section 6.4 Waiver of Penalties. Any Penalties required under this Section may be rescinded
or modified by the Director upon consideration of the totality of the circumstances affecting such
noncompliance.
ARTICLE VII
MISCELLANEOUS
Section 7.1 Primary Contact. The Director’s designee shall be the primary point of contact for
Developer for the purposes of collecting or providing information, or carrying out any of the
activities under this Agreement.
Section 7.2 Notices. Any notice, payment or instrument required or permitted by this
Agreement to be given or delivered to either party shall be deemed to have been received when
personally delivered, mailed, or emailed (with email confirmation), and addressed as follows:
To DSLBD: Department of Small and Local Business Development
441 4th Street NW, Suite 850 North
Washington, DC 20001
Attention: Director
Tel: (202) 727-3900
Fax: (202) 724-3786
and Office of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic
12

CBE AGREEMENT – Reeves Center Redevelopment / 2000 14th Street NW
Development Government of the District of Columbia
John A. Wilson Building
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue NW, Suite 317
Washington, DC 20004
Attention: Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic
Development
Tel: (202) 727-6365
Fax: (202) 727-6703
With a copy to: Office of the Attorney General
John A. Wilson Building
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue NW, Suite 407
Washington, DC 20004
Attention: Attorney General
Tel: (202) 724-3400
Fax: (202) 347-8922
To ODCA: Office of the District of Columbia Auditor
717 14th Street NW, Suite 900
Washington, DC 20005
Attention: District of Columbia Auditor
Tel: (202) 727-3600
To Developer: Reeves CMC Venture, LLC
c/o CSG Urban Partners
875 N Street NW, Suite 202
Washington, DC 20001
Attention: Charles King
Tel: (202) 347-8257
Email: cking@csgurban.com
with a copy to: Reeves CMC Venture, LLC
c/o MRP Realty
3050 K Street, N.W., Suite 125
Washington, DC 20010
Attention: J. Richard Saas and Matt Robinson
Tel: (202) 719-9000
Email: rsaas@mrprealty.com and mrobinson@mrprealty.com
Each party may change its address for delivery of notice by delivering written notice of
such change of address to the other party.
Section 7.3 Severability. If any part of this Agreement is held to be illegal or unenforceable by
a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of this Agreement shall be given effect to the
fullest extent possible.
13

CBE AGREEMENT – Reeves Center Redevelopment / 2000 14th Street NW
Section 7.4 Successors and Assigns. This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the
benefit of any permitted successors and assigns of the parties hereto. This Agreement shall not
be assigned by the Developer without the prior written consent of the DSLBD, which consent
shall not be unreasonably withheld or delayed. In connection with any such consent of DSLBD,
DSLBD may condition its consent upon the acceptability of the financial condition of the
proposed assignee, upon the assignee’s express assumption of all obligations of the Developer
hereunder or upon any other reasonable factor which DSLBD deems relevant in the
circumstances. In any event, any such assignment shall be in writing, shall clearly identify the
scope of the rights and obligations assigned and shall not be effective until approved by the
DSLBD. DSLBD shall have no right to assign this Agreement except to another District agency.
Section 7.5 Amendment; Waiver. This Agreement may be amended from time to time by
written supplement hereto and executed by DSLBD and Developer. Any obligations hereunder
may not be waived, except by written instrument signed by the party to be bound by such waiver.
No failure or delay of either party in the exercise of any right given to such party hereunder or
the waiver by any party of any condition hereunder for its benefit (unless the time specified
herein for exercise of such right, or satisfaction of such condition, has expired) shall constitute a
waiver of any other or further right nor shall any single or partial exercise of any right preclude
other or further exercise thereof or any other right. The waiver of any breach hereunder shall not
be deemed to be a waiver of any other or any subsequent breach hereof.
Section 7.6 Governing Law. This Agreement shall be governed by the laws of the District of
Columbia.
Section 7.7 Counterparts. This Agreement may be executed in counterparts, each of which
shall be deemed an original.
Section 7.8 Entire Agreement. All previous negotiations and understandings between the
parties hereto or their respective agents and employees with respect to the transactions set forth
herein are merged into this Agreement, and this Agreement alone fully and completely expresses
the parties’ rights, duties and obligations with respect to its subject matter.
Section 7.9 Captions, Gender, Number and Language of Inclusion. The captions are
inserted in this Agreement only for convenience of reference and do not define, limit, or describe
the scope or intent of any provisions of this Agreement. Unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the singular includes the plural, and vice versa, and the masculine, feminine and
neuter adjectives include one another. As used in this Agreement, the word “including” shall
mean “including but not limited to.”
Section 7.10 Attachments. The following exhibits shall be deemed incorporated into this
Agreement in their entirety (THERE ARE NO ATTACHMENTS 2 AND 3 FOR THIS
PROJECT):
Attachment 1: CBE Minimum Expenditure
Attachment 4: Quarterly Report
Attachment 5: Vendor Verification Forms
Attachment 6: Suggested Outreach Activities
14

CBE AGREEMENT – Reeves Center Redevelopment / 2000 14th Street NW
Equity and Development Participation Overview Attachment
DSLBD reserves the right to amend the templates for all Attachments.
Section 7.11 Collected Penalty/Fines. Any and all fines imposed and collected by DSLBD
pursuant to this Agreement will be deposited into the fund established by D.C. Official Code § 2-
218.75.
Section 7.12 Binding Effect. This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of
the parties hereto and their respective successors, assigns, heirs, and personal representatives.
Section 7.13 Recitals. The Recitals set forth on the first page are incorporated by reference and
made a part of this Agreement.
[Signatures to follow]
15

CBE AGREEMENT – Reeves Center Redevelopment / 2000 14th Street NW
Approved as to legal sufficiency for the District of Columbia Department of Small and Local
Business Development:
By:
Lorenzo McRae
General Counsel, DSLBD
AGREED TO AND EXECUTED THIS __1_4____ DAY OF __F_e_b_r_ua_r_y__________ 2024
DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA DEPARTMENT OF SMALL AND LOCAL BUSINESS
DEVELOPMENT
By: ____________________________
Rosemary Suggs-Evans
Acting Director
DEVELOPER, REEVES CMC VENTURE, LLC,
a District of Columbia limited liability company
By: ____________________________
Charles King
Authorized Party
16

CBE AGREEMENT – Reeves Center Redevelopment / 2000 14th Street NW
ACKNOWLEDGED AND AGREED TO, AS TO ARTICLE V, BY CBE
DEVELOPMENT PARTICIPANT(S):
By: ______________________________
Charles King, Principal
CSG Urban Partners, LLC
20% of Development Participation
CBE #LSDZRE19699072024
ACKNOWLEDGED AND AGREED TO, AS TO ARTICLE V, BY CBE EQUITY
PARTICIPANT(S):
By: ______________________________
Charles King, Principal
CSG Urban Partners, LLC
20% of Equity Participation
CBE #LSDZRE19699072024
17

1st Amendment to the Reeves Center Redevelopment CBE Agreement
FIRST AMENDMENT
TO CERTIFIED BUSINESS ENTERPRISE
UTILIZATION and PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT
This First Amendment (this “Amendment”) to the Certified Business Enterprise
Utilization Agreement between the DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA (the “District”), a
municipal corporation acting by and through the DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
DEPARTMENT OF SMALL AND LOCAL BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT
(“DSLBD”) and the REEVES CMC VENTURE LLC, a Delaware limited liability
company, or its designees, successors or assigns (the “Developer”) (the “CBE Agreement”)
is made by and between DSLBD and Developer (together “Parties”).
Recitals
A. On February 14, 2024, DSLBD entered into the Certified Business
Enterprise Utilization and Participation Agreement with Reeves CMC Venture, LLC
(“CBE Agreement”).
B. The Parties desire to amend the CBE Agreement.
C. Capitalized terms used and not defined herein have the meaning set forth in
the CBE Agreement.
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing, and for such other good
and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby
acknowledged, the Parties agree as follows:
1. In compliance with District law, the second sentence of the preamble to
Section 6.1 of the CBE Agreement is amended to reflect that the ten percent shortfall
payment does not apply to the Adjusted Development Budget but applies to the CBE
Minimum Expenditure, as amended:
If Developer fails to meet its CBE Minimum Expenditure as
provided in Section 1.1 herein (a “Shortfall”), the Developer shall
pay a shortfall payment equal to 10% of the CBE Minimum
Expenditure $11,182,637 (Eleven Million One Hundred Eighty-two
Thousand Six Hundred Thirty-seven Dollars) (or as further amended
by Attachment 1), which shall be paid to the District of Columbia in
the time and in a manner to be determined by DSLBD.
2. Except as expressly set forth herein, the CBE Agreement remains
unamended and in full force and effect.
3. This Amendment may be executed in counterparts, each of which shall be
deemed an original and all of which, taken together, shall constitute one agreement.

1st Amendment to the H Reeves Center Redevelopment CBE Agreement
[Signatures to follow]
Approved as to legal sufficiency for the District of Columbia Department of Small and
Local Business Development:
BY:
Lorenzo McRae
General Counsel, DSLBD
AGREED TO AND EXECUTED THIS __1_4_th_ __ DAY OF ______Ju_l_y__________ 2026
DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA DEPARTMENT OF SMALL AND LOCAL
BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT
BY: ____________________________
Rosemary Suggs-Evans
Director
DEVELOPER – REEVES CMC VENTURE LLC
BY: ____________________________
Simone A. Goring Devaney
Authorized Party
2

1st Amendment to the H Reeves Center Redevelopment CBE Agreement
ACKNOWLEDGED AND AGREED TO, AS TO ARTICLE V, BY CBE
DEVELOPMENT PARTICIPANT(S):
By: ______________________________
Simone A. Goring Devaney
Managing Principal, CSG Urban Partners, LLC
CBE License # LSDZRE19699072024
ACKNOWLEDGED AND AGREED TO, AS TO ARTICLE V, BY CBE EQUITY
PARTICIPANT(S):
By: ______________________________
Simone A. Goring Devaney
Managing Principal, CSG Urban Partners, LLC
CBE License # LSDZRE19699072024
3

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
DEPARTMENT OF SMALL AND LOCAL BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT
Reeves Center Redevelopment
2000 14th Street, NW
Square 0204 Lots 0844 & 7000
WASHINGTON, D.C.
Attachment 1 - Revised
Date Submitted: July 10, 2026
PROJECT OVERVIEW
Project Name: Reeves Center Redevelopment
Project Owner/Sponsor: Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Suite 317
Developer & Managing Member: Reeves CMC Venture, LLC & Capri Investment Group and CSG
Urban Partners
Local Ownership Partners: CSG Urban Partners, LLC
Lead Architect: Michael Marshall Design, Michael Graves Design
Civil Engineer: Bohler Engineering
Landscape Architect: Bradley Site Design Inc
Structural Engineer: TBD
Traffic Planner: TBD
Zoning Counsel: Holland & Knight
ANC: ANC 1B07
Project Location: 2000 14th Street, NW, Washington DC
Phase & Development Scenario: Phase 1 + Phase 2 | Option A (PUD with Geno Baroni)
PRELIMINARY BUDGET ESTIMATE OF DEVELOPMENT COSTS
SOURCES OF FUNDS % Total
Sponsor Equity $93,870,605 21%
LIHTC – Federal $22,163,735 5%
LIHTC – District $4,432,747 1%
Tax Increment Financing (TIF) $63,500,000 14%
New Market Tax Credits (NMTC) $15,000,000 3%
Philanthropic Grants $5,000,000 1%
Construction Loan $192,059,243 43%
EB-5 Financing $30,000,000 7%
DC Tax Exempt Bonds $10,000,000 2%
District Gap Funding (HPTF) $12,600,000 3%
Total Sources of Funds: $448,626,330 100%
JUSTIFICATION FOR
USES OF FUNDS TOTAL BUDGET EXCLUSIONS ADJUSTED BUDGET EXCLUSION
Uses - Acquisition
Purchase price paid to a third-party
Geno Baroni Purchase Price $10,000,000 $10,000,000 - property owner.
Acquisition Fees $3,000,000 - $3,000,000
Title Expenses $504,781 - $504,781
Recordation Tax $1,304,423 $1,304,423 - Tax paid to the District.
Lot Subdivision Costs $190,795 - $190,795
Uses - Financing Costs
Fees paid to a financial institution for a
Lender Financing Fee $2,020,592 $2,020,592 - loan.
Mortgage Recordation Costs $4,893,185 $4,893,185 - Tax paid to the District.
Broker Origination Fee $1,467,955 - $1,467,955
Title Expenses $489,318 - $489,318
Guaranty Fee $938,706 $938,706 - Fee paid to a developer loan guarantor.
Expenses paid to, or reimbursed to the
Lender Expenses $857,722 $857,722 - lender.
Legal fees incurred by the lender and
reimbursed by Developer; the
Developer does not control the vendor
Lender Legal $980,254 $980,254 - selection.
Capitalized Interest $35,390,326 $35,390,326 - Carrying cost on the construction loan.
Uses - Soft Costs
Professional Fees (A&E)
A&E $15,629,897 - $15,629,897
Project & Cost Management $2,718,243 - $2,718,243
Consultants $3,171,283 - $3,171,283
Surveyor $226,520 - $226,520
Special Inspector $226,520 - $226,520
Expeditor $226,520 - $226,520
Lobbyist $453,040 - $453,040
Other Soft Costs
Filing Fees $3,397,804 $3,397,804 - Government fees paid to the District.
Excluded amount pertains only to
permit fees paid to the District and
utility fees paid to the utilitiy
Planning, Permitting, Testing, Inspection $5,663,006 $2,000,000 $3,663,006companies.

Soft cost contingency and cost
escalation reserves. If expended, costs
will be spent with CBE's to the extent
Soft Cost Contingency/Escalations $1,471,683 $1,471,683 - possible, and documented accordingly.
Commercial TI & Leasing
Allowance paid to the tenant for their
TI Allowance $19,415,000 $19,415,000 - own build-out.
Office Brokerage Commissions $2,610,000 $2,610,000
Leasing Legal $178,300 $178,300
Arts Consultant $100,000 $100,000
Expenses During Construction -
Real Estate Tax Allocation $5,140,393 $5,140,393 - Real Estate taxes paid to the District.
Condo Expenses $300,000 $300,000
Equity Placement Fee $1,126,182 $1,126,182
Legal & Zoning Legal $875,690 $875,690
Owner Construction Mgmt $4,523,195 $4,523,195
Construction Auditing $140,110 $140,110
Project Accounting $350,276 $350,276
Insurance premium paid to a
carrier/underwriter. CBE-certified
carriers may not be available or have
General & Environmental Liability $469,370 $469,370 - capacity for this coverage.
Condo Sale Transfer Costs $750,000 $750,000 - Transfer tax paid to the District.
Fee paid to, or reimbursed to the
Lender Admin Fee $140,110 $140,110 - construction/permanent lender.
Miscellaneous $175,138 $175,138
Other Soft Costs
Development Fee $14,933,741 $14,933,741
Carrying cost for pro forma lease-up
Operating Reserve $629,910 $629,910 - shortfall until stabilization.
Uses - Construction Hard Costs
Hard Costs $262,223,389 - $262,223,389
Hard cost contingency reserve. If
expended, costs will be spent with
CBE's to the extent possible, and
Hard Cost Contingency $20,926,911 $20,926,911 - documented accordingly.
Hard cost excalation reserve. If
expended, costs will be spent with
CBE's to the extent possible, and
Hard Cost Escalations $18,396,039 $18,396,039 - documented accordingly.
TOTAL USES $ 448,626,331 $ 129,122,428 $ 319,503,903
Total Project Budget $448,626,331 Acquisition Exclusions $11,304,423
Total Exclusions $129,122,428 Financing Exclusion $45,080,785
Adjusted Budget $319,503,903 Soft Costs Exclusions $33,414,270
CBE Minimum Expenditure (35%) $111,826,366 Hard Costs Exclusions $39,322,949
Shortfall Penalty – 10% of CBE Minimum Expenditure $11,182,637 Total Exclusions $129,122,428
Check -
Approved by: Rosemary Suggs-Evans, Director, Department of Small and Local Business Development Date: (cid:26)(cid:18)14(cid:18)(cid:21)(cid:19)(cid:21)(cid:25)

DEVELOPMENT AND COMPLETION GUARANTY
THIS DEVELOPMENT AND COMPLETION GUARANTY (this “Guaranty”) is made
as of ____________, 20__ (“Effective Date”), by _____________________ (the “Guarantor”),
for the benefit of the District of Columbia, a municipal corporation, acting by and through the
Office of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development (“District”).
RECITALS:
WHEREAS, District and ____________________ (“Developer”) have entered into a
certain Land Disposition and Development Agreement, dated as of ____________, 20__ (the
“Development Agreement”), pursuant to which, among other things, District has agreed to sell
or lease, as applicable, the Property to Developer on or about the Effective Date, and Developer
has agreed to develop the Project on the Property.
WHEREAS, the continuing obligations of Developer to develop and construct the Project
as contemplated by the Development Agreement are set forth in those certain Construction (and
Use) Covenants dated as of the Effective Date between District and Developer (collectively, and
as may be amended from time to time, the “Construction Covenants”) being recorded among the
land records of the District of Columbia as an encumbrance on Developer’s leasehold estate to the
Property or fee interest in the Property, as applicable.
WHEREAS, to induce District to proceed to Closing and execute that certain Ground Lease
Agreement dated as of the Effective Date (the “Ground Lease”), or that certain quitclaim deed
dated as of the Effective Date (the “Deed”), as applicable, Guarantor has agreed to deliver this
Guaranty to District to guaranty the performance of the Guaranteed Obligations (as defined
below).
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises, the mutual covenants contained
herein and other good and valuable consideration in hand paid, the receipt and sufficiency of which
are hereby acknowledged, Guarantor hereby agrees as follows:
1. Recitals; Definitions.
1.1 The foregoing recitals are true and correct and are incorporated into this Guaranty
by this reference and made a material part of this Guaranty.
1.2 Capitalized terms used and not defined in this Guaranty shall have the meanings
attributed to them in the Construction Covenants.
2. Representations and Warranties.
2.1 Guarantor represents and warrants to District as follows:
(a) the making and performance of this Guaranty by Guarantor will not result
in any breach of any term, condition, or provision of, or constitute a default under, any contract,
agreement, or other instrument to which Guarantor is a party or by which it is bound, or result in
a breach of any regulation, order, writ, injunction, or decree of any court or any commission, board,
1

or other administrative agency entered in any proceeding to which Guarantor is a party or by which
it is bound;
(b) Guarantor has reviewed, with the advice and benefit of its legal counsel, the
terms and provisions of the Ground Lease or Deed, as applicable, this Guaranty, the Construction
Covenants, the Schedule of Performance, the Approved Plans and Specifications, and the
documents referenced in each of the foregoing;
(c) Guarantor (if Guarantor is not a natural person) is duly organized, validly
existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its organization and is duly
qualified to do business, and is in good standing, in the District of Columbia;
(d) Guarantor has been duly authorized to carry on its business, and to hold title
to and own the property it owns, to execute, deliver, and perform this Guaranty, and to consummate
the transactions contemplated hereby and thereby;
(e) this Guaranty has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by
Guarantor, and this Guaranty, and each term and provision hereof are the legal, valid and binding
obligation of Guarantor enforceable against Guarantor in accordance with its terms;
(f) no actions, suits, or proceedings are pending or, to Guarantor’s knowledge,
threatened against or affecting Guarantor before any governmental authority which could, if
adversely decided, result in a material adverse change in the financial condition of Guarantor (in
comparison to any state of affairs existing before the Effective Date) or adversely affects the ability
of Guarantor to perform, or of District to enforce, any provision of this Guaranty;
(g) no consent, approval, or authorization of, or registration, declaration, or
filing with, any governmental authority or any other Person is required that has not been obtained
in writing by Guarantor, in connection with the execution, delivery, and performance by Guarantor
of this Guaranty and the transactions contemplated by this Guaranty;
(h) Guarantor is not insolvent (as such term is defined or determined for
purposes of the Bankruptcy Reform Act of 1978 (11 U.S.C. § 101-1330), as amended or
recodified, or any other bankruptcy law (collectively, the “Bankruptcy Code”), and the execution
and delivery of this Guaranty will not make Guarantor insolvent;
(i) neither this Guaranty nor any financial information, certificate, or statement
furnished to District by or on behalf of Guarantor contains any untrue statement of a material fact
or intentionally, or knowingly, omits to state a material fact necessary to make the statements
herein and therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they are made, not misleading;
(j) no conditions exist which would prevent Guarantor from complying with
the provisions of this Guaranty within the time limits set forth herein and/or in the Construction
Covenants, as may be extended or deemed extended pursuant to the terms thereof;
(k) Guarantor has filed all tax returns and reports required by law to have been
filed by it, and has paid all taxes, assessments, and governmental charges levied upon it or any of
2

its assets which are due and payable, except any such taxes or charges which are being contested
in good faith by appropriate proceedings and for which adequate reserves have been set aside;
(l) there are no conditions precedent to the effectiveness of this Guaranty;
(m) Guarantor is not a Prohibited Person;
(n) Guarantor is deriving a material financial benefit from District entering into
the Ground Lease, Deed, and Construction Covenants with Developer; and
(o) all financial statements delivered to District at any time by or on behalf of
Guarantor (i) are true and correct in all material respects, (ii) fairly present in a manner consistent
with prior statements submitted to District the respective financial conditions of the subjects
thereof and for the periods referenced therein, and (iii) have been prepared in accordance with
generally accepted accounting principles, or other accounting principles as District may agree,
consistently applied, and there has been no material adverse change in the financial position of
such Guarantor since the respective dates of (or periods covered by) such statements, and without
limiting the foregoing, all assets shown on such financial statements, unless clearly designated to
the contrary on such financial statements, (A) are free and clear of any exemption or any claim of
exemption of Guarantor or any other Person, (B) accurately reflect all debt and prior pledges or
encumbrances (direct or indirect) of or on any of Guarantor’s assets at the date of the financial
statements and at all times thereafter, and (C) are owned individually by Guarantor and not jointly
with any spouse or other Person.
2.2 Guarantor agrees that all of the representations and warranties of Guarantor in this
Guaranty are made and shall be true as of the Effective Date and shall survive the execution and
delivery of this Guaranty. Guarantor shall inform District in writing within five (5) Business Days
upon it discovering any breach of such representations or warranties.
2.3 Guarantor acknowledges that District is consummating the Closing in reliance upon
the representations, warranties, and agreements contained in this Guaranty. District shall be
entitled to such reliance notwithstanding any investigation which has been made, has not been
made, or may be conducted by District or on District’s behalf.
3. Guaranteed Obligations. Guarantor hereby absolutely and unconditionally guarantees to
District and its successors and assigns: (i) the Commencement of Construction and prosecution of
construction through Final Completion of the Project pursuant to the terms and conditions of the
Construction Covenants and within the time period allotted therefor in the Schedule of
Performance; (ii) the Property, the Improvements, and Developer’s leasehold estate in the Property
or fee interest in the Property, as applicable, shall be kept free and clear of all liens (other than
liens in favor of a mortgagee as permitted under the Ground Lease or as otherwise approved by
the District), claims of lien and other claims connected with or arising out of the construction or
completion of the Project; (iii) the payment in full of all amounts due to any contractor,
subcontractor, materialman, laborer, any employee or other Person who is engaged at any time in
work or supplying materials in connection with the Project if and to the extent not paid by
Developer; (iv) any obligation of the Developer under the Construction Covenants to indemnify,
defend, and hold harmless District; and (v) the enforcement of this Guaranty by District (including,
3

without limitation, reasonable attorneys’ fees), which obligations shall survive the release of this
Guaranty (collectively, the “Guaranteed Obligations”).
4. Liens. If any mechanic's or materialmen's liens should be filed, or should attach, against
the Property with respect to the Project and if such mechanic's or materialmen's liens have not been
removed by Developer or released or waived by the party filing same as required by the terms of
the Construction Covenants, within thirty (30) days after Guarantor is advised by District of the
filing of such liens, Guarantor shall take, or cause to be taken, action to cause the removal, release
or waiver of such liens, including, if necessary, the posting of a bond or other security against the
consequences of their possible judicial enforcement. So long as Guarantor timely complies with
the immediately preceding sentence, Guarantor shall have the right to contest in good faith any
claim, lien, or encumbrance, provided that Guarantor does so diligently and without prejudice to
District.
5. Financial Statements.
5.1 Within ninety (90) days after the end of each of Guarantor’s fiscal year (or each
calendar year if Guarantor is a natural person), Guarantor shall deliver to District a copy of such
Guarantor’s balance sheet, income statement, and statement of changes in financial position for
such fiscal year (collectively, the “Guarantor Financial Statements”). The Guarantor Financial
Statements shall (a) include a schedule of all material contingent liabilities and all other notes and
schedules relating thereto, (b) be in a form reasonably satisfactory to District, (c) be prepared in
accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (or other accounting principles as
District may agree) consistently applied, (d) be audited by an independent, certified public
accountant who is a member of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and
otherwise acceptable to District, and (e) be accompanied by a certification of Guarantor to District
(made by the chief financial officer in the case of any corporate Guarantor) that such Guarantor
Financial Statements (i) have been prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting
principles (or other accounting principles as District may agree) consistently applied, (ii)
accurately present the financial condition of such Guarantor as of the respective dates thereof, and
(iii) show all direct and contingent material liabilities of Guarantor as of such dates.
5.2 From time to time promptly after District’s request, Guarantor shall deliver to
District such additional information, reports and statements regarding its business operations
reasonably related to the Project or the financial condition of Guarantor as District may reasonably
request.
6. Nature of Guaranty; Independent Obligation. This is a direct, absolute, and
unconditional, guaranty of completion, and is a guaranty of payment and performance, not of
collection. The obligations of Guarantor under this Guaranty are independent and primary, and
District shall not be required to take any action against Developer, any mortgagee, or any other
Person or resort to any other collateral or security given for the performance of Developer as a
precondition to the obligations of each Guarantor under this Guaranty. Guarantor hereby waives
any rights it may have to compel District to proceed against Developer, or any security, or to
participate in any security for Guarantor’s obligations hereunder, even though any rights which
such Guarantor may have against Developer or others may be destroyed, diminished or otherwise
affected by such action or lack thereof. Neither the declaration of a Developer Default, nor the
4

exercise of any remedies against Developer, shall in any way affect Guarantor’s responsibility for
the obligations guaranteed hereunder, even though any rights which Guarantor may have against
Developer or others may be destroyed, diminished or otherwise affected by such action. To the
fullest extent permitted by law, this Guaranty shall be construed as a continuing, absolute, and
unconditional guaranty of performance without regard to: (a) the legality, validity, or
enforceability of any provisions of the Construction Covenants, or any of the obligations of
Developer evidenced thereby; (b) any defense, setoff, or counterclaim that may be available at any
time to Developer or any other Person against District or any other Person and any right of setoff
at any time held by District or any other Person (including, without limitation, any defense, setoff,
or counterclaim by Guarantor under this Guaranty); or (c) any other circumstances whatsoever
(with or without notice to or knowledge of Guarantor), whether or not similar to any of the
foregoing, that constitutes or might be construed to constitute an equitable or legal discharge of
Developer or any other Person in bankruptcy or in any other instance.
7. No Release or Waiver of Obligations; Consents.
7.1 No action which Developer or District may take, or omit to take, in connection with
the Project, nor any course of dealing with Developer or any other Person, shall release Guarantor’s
obligations hereunder or affect this Guaranty in any way, even if any such action may otherwise
be deemed a legal or equitable discharge of a guarantor or surety.
7.2 By way of example, but not in limitation of the foregoing, Guarantor hereby
expressly agrees that District may, from time to time, and without notice to Guarantor, but with
the written prior agreement of Developer, which shall not, in any case, discharge or impair
Guarantor’s obligations or any rights against Guarantor:
(a) amend, change, or modify, in whole or in part, the Construction Covenants;
(b) waive any terms, conditions, or covenants of the Construction Covenants,
or grant any extension of time or forbearance for performance of the same;
(c) compromise or settle any amount or any matter in dispute under the
Construction Covenants or other document;
(d) surrender, release, or subordinate any or all security for the Construction
Covenants, or accept additional or substituted security therefor;
(e) extend, accelerate, or otherwise change the time of payment or performance
of any obligations under the Construction Covenants or any other document;
(f) exercise its rights and remedies under the Construction Covenants or any
other document;
(g) approve, disapprove, inspect, review, or fail to inspect or review, the
progress, status, or quality of construction or any costs, expenses, financing, contracts, or other
matters relating thereto;
5

(h) accept new or additional instruments, documents, or agreements in
exchange for, or relative to, the Construction Covenants, or any part thereof or performance
pursuant thereto; and
(i) release, substitute, or add guarantors to guaranty performance of the
obligations under the Construction Covenants or any other document.
7.3 Guarantor consents and agrees that District may, at any time and from time to time,
without notice or demand, and without affecting the enforceability or continuing effectiveness
hereof: (a) supplement, modify, amend, waive, or enter into or give any agreement, approval, or
consent with respect to the Project, or any additional security or guaranties, or any condition,
covenant, default, remedy, right, representation, or term with respect thereto; (b) accept partial
payments on, or performance of, the obligations owed to District and apply any and all payments
and/or recoveries from Developer or any other Person to such of the obligations owed to District
as District may elect in its sole discretion; (c) receive and hold additional security or guaranties for
the obligations owed to District or any part thereof; (d) release, reconvey, terminate, waive,
abandon, fail to perfect, subordinate, exchange, substitute, transfer, or enforce any security or
guaranties, and apply any security and direct the order or manner of sale thereof, as District may
elect in its sole and absolute discretion may determine; (e) release any Person from any personal
liability with respect to the obligations owed to District or any party thereof; (f) settle, release on
terms satisfactory to District, as the case may be, or by operation of applicable law or otherwise,
liquidate or enforce any obligations owed to District and any security or guaranty in any manner,
consent to the transfer of any security and bid and purchase at any sale (other than by reason of
the timely and full payment and performance of all obligations owed to District); (g) consent to
the merger, change of any other restructuring or termination of the corporate existence of
Developer or any other Person and correspondingly restructure the obligations owed to District,
and any such merger, change, restructuring, or termination shall not affect the liability of such
Guarantor or the continuing effectiveness hereof, or the enforceability thereof with respect to all
or any part of the obligations owed to District; (h) assign the rights to this Guaranty to another
Person; or (i) otherwise deal with Developer or any other Person as District may elect in its sole
discretion.
8. Bankruptcy; Relief from Automatic Stay.
8.1 The release or discharge of Developer, Guarantor, or any other Person from any
obligation in any receivership, bankruptcy, winding-up or other creditor proceeding shall not affect
the validity of this Guarantor or of Guarantor’s obligations hereunder.
8.2 If (i) a Developer Default has occurred under the Construction Covenants and
(ii) the automatic stay imposed by the applicable provisions of the Bankruptcy Code, or under any
other applicable law, against the exercise of the rights and remedies otherwise available to creditors
of Developer is deemed by the court having jurisdiction to apply to Guarantor who is not in
bankruptcy so that Guarantor is not permitted to perform its obligations under this Guaranty and/or
District may not immediately enforce the terms of this Guaranty or exercise such other rights and
remedies against Guarantor as would otherwise be provided by law, District shall immediately be
entitled, and Guarantor hereby consents, to relief from such stay, and Guarantor hereby authorizes
6

and directs District to present this Guaranty to the applicable court to evidence such agreement
and consent.
9. Waivers.
9.1 To the fullest extent the Guarantor may do so under applicable law, Guarantor
expressly waives notice of acceptance of this Guaranty or the right to enforce any of the terms of
the Construction Covenants, or any liability under this Guaranty. District shall not be required to
give any notice to Guarantor hereunder in order to preserve or enforce District’s rights hereunder
(including, without limitation, notice of any Developer Default under the Construction Covenants
or other documents evidencing and securing the obligations of Developer thereunder), any such
notice being expressly waived by Guarantor.
9.2 Guarantor agrees that District shall have no duty to disclose to Guarantor any
information it receives, or has reasonably available to it, regarding the financial status of
Developer, or any contractor, subcontractor or materialmen involved in the construction of the
Project, or any information relating to the Project, whether or not such information indicates that
the risk that Guarantor may be required to perform hereunder has been or may be increased.
Guarantor assumes full responsibility for being and keeping informed of all such matters.
9.3 In addition to the foregoing, Guarantor expressly waives the following defenses:
(a) lack of validity, genuineness, or enforceability of any provision of any of
the Ground Lease or Deed, as applicable, the Construction Covenants, or any other agreement
between District, Developer, Guarantor or any other Person;
(b) the incapacity, lack of authority, death, or disability of any Person or the
failure of District to file or enforce a claim against the estate of any Person in any administrative,
bankruptcy, or other proceeding;
(c) the election of remedies by District, whether or not such election may affect
in any way the recourse, subrogation, or other rights of Guarantor against Developer or any other
Person in connection with the Guaranteed Obligations;
(d) the negligence of District in administering or overseeing the Project or any
part thereof, or taking or failing to take any action in connection therewith;
(e) any change to the Approved Plans and Specifications, the Ground Lease or
Deed, as applicable, the Schedule of Performance, the Construction Covenants, or any of the
documents referenced in any of the foregoing made without the consent or knowledge of
Guarantor;
(f) the unenforceability or invalidity of any security or guaranty for the
Guaranteed Obligations or the lack of perfection or continuing perfection or failure of priority of
any security for the Guaranteed Obligations;
(g) the failure of District to marshal assets in favor of Developer or any other
Person;
7

(h) the failure of District to give notice of sale or other disposition of any
collateral (now or hereafter securing the obligations of any Person) to Developer or any other
Person, as applicable, or any defect in any notice that may be given in connection with any sale or
disposition of collateral or to comply with applicable law or other requirements in connection with
the sale or other disposition of any collateral or other security for any obligation owed to District;
(i) any act or omission of District, or others, that directly or indirectly results
in or aids the discharge or release of Developer or any other Person, or the Guaranteed Obligations
or any security or guaranty therefor by operation of law or otherwise (other than by reason of the
timely performance of all Guaranteed Obligations);
(j) any applicable law or other laws or requirements of the District of Columbia
or other jursidictions which provides that the obligation of a surety or guarantor must neither be
larger in amount nor in other respects more burdensome than that of the principal or which reduces
a surety's or guarantor's obligation in proportion to the principal obligation, including, without
limitation, all rights and benefits under the laws of the District of Columbia purporting to reduce
Guarantor's obligation in proportion to the obligation of the principal;
(k) the avoidance of any lien in favor of District for any reason;
(l) all rights or defenses Guarantor may have by reason of protection afforded
to a principal with respect to the Guaranteed Obligations pursuant to applicable law or other laws
of the District of Columbia or other jurisdictions limiting or discharging the principal's obligations;
and
(m) any defense based on any other circumstances whatsoever (with or without
notice to or knowledge of Guarantor), whether or not similar to any of the foregoing, that
constitutes or might be construed to constitute an equitable or legal discharge of Developer or any
other Person in bankruptcy or in any other instance.
10. Rights Upon Default.
10.1 Upon the occurrence and during the continuance of (a) any failure by Guarantor in
the performance of the Guaranteed Obligations, (b) the dissolution or insolvency of Guarantor, (d)
the inability of Guarantor to pay its debts as they mature, (d) a general assignment by Guarantor
for the benefit of creditors, (e) the institution of any proceeding by or against Guarantor in
bankruptcy or for a reorganization or an arrangement with creditors, or for the appointment of a
receiver, trustee, or custodian for Guarantor or its properties that is not dismissed or stayed within
one hundred twenty (120) days after Guarantor's receipt of notice of filing, (f) the falsity in any
material respect of or any material omission in any representation made to District by Guarantor,
or (g) any other default by Guarantor of any other obligations owed to District by Guarantor under
this Guaranty (a “Guarantor Default”), District shall have such rights and remedies available to
it as permitted by law and in equity and may enforce this Guaranty in accordance with the terms
hereof, independently of any other remedy or security District at any time may have or hold in
connection with the Guaranteed Obligations as to Developer, and it shall not be necessary for
District to marshal assets in favor of Developer, Guarantor, or any other Person or to proceed upon
or against and/or exhaust any security or remedy before proceeding to enforce this Guaranty in
8

accordance with the terms hereof. Additionally, Guarantor agrees that during the continuance of
any Guarantor Default, District may, without the consent of or notice to Guarantor, take or refrain
from taking such other action to enforce the provisions of this Guaranty against Guarantor as it
may from time to time determine in its sole discretion as to any obligations then unperformed.
10.2 Guarantor absolutely, irrevocably and unconditionally, and jointly and severally,
agrees to the fullest extent permitted by law, to indemnify, defend, and hold harmless District from
any and all loss, cost, liability, and expense arising out of or in connection with (a) any Guarantor
Default and (b) the enforcement of this Guaranty by District (including, without limitation,
reasonable attorneys’ fees).
10.3 Guarantor shall immediately, upon demand therefor, reimburse District for any and
all expenditures incurred by District under this Section 10, plus interest thereon at the rate of fifteen
percent (15%) per annum until all sums are paid to District.
10.4 Guarantor agrees that District and Developer or any other Person may deal with
each other in connection with the Guaranteed Obligations, or otherwise, or alter any contracts or
agreements now or hereafter existing between them, in any manner whatsoever, all without in any
way altering or affecting the security of this Guaranty. District's rights hereunder shall be reinstated
and revived and the enforceability of this Guaranty shall continue with respect to any amount at
any time paid on account of the Guaranteed Obligations, which thereafter shall be required to be
restored or returned by District upon the bankruptcy, insolvency, or reorganization of Developer
of any other Person, or for any other reason, all as though such amount had not been paid. The
rights of District created or granted herein and the enforceability of this Guaranty at all times shall
remain effective even though the Guaranteed Obligations, including any part thereof or any other
security or guaranty therefor, may be or hereafter may become invalid or otherwise unenforceable
as against Developer.
11. Cumulative Rights. The exercise by District of any right or remedy hereunder, under the
Construction Covenants, any other documents executed by District and Developer, or at law or in
equity, shall not preclude the concurrent or subsequent exercise of any other right or remedy.
District shall have all rights, remedies, and recourses afforded to District by reason of this
Guaranty, the Construction Covenants, any other documents executed between District and
Developer, or by law or equity or otherwise, and the same (a) shall be cumulative and concurrent;
(b) may be pursued separately, successively, or concurrently against Guarantor or others obligated
for the Guaranteed Obligations, or any part thereof, or against any one or more of them, at the sole
and absolute discretion of District; (c) may be exercised as often as occasion therefor shall arise,
it being agreed by Guarantor that the exercise of, discontinuance of the exercise of, or failure to
exercise any of such rights, remedies, or recourses shall in no event be construed as a waiver or
release thereof or of any other right, remedy, or recourse; and (d) are intended to be and shall be
nonexclusive. No waiver of any default on the part of Guarantor or of any breach of any of the
provisions of this Guaranty or of any other document shall be considered a waiver of any other or
subsequent default or breach, and no delay or omission in exercising or enforcing the rights and
powers granted herein or in any other document shall be construed as a waiver of such rights and
powers, and no exercise or enforcement of any rights or powers hereunder or under any other
document shall be held to exhaust such rights and powers, and every such right and power may be
exercised from time to time. The granting of any consent, approval, or waiver by District shall be
9

limited to the specific instance and purpose therefor and shall not constitute consent or approval
in any other instance or for any other purpose. No notice to, or demand on, Guarantor in any case
shall of itself entitle such Guarantor to any other or further notice or demand in similar or other
circumstances.
12. Statute of Limitations and Other Laws. Until the Guaranteed Obligations have been
irrevocably paid and/or performed in full, all of the rights, privileges, powers, and remedies
granted to District hereunder shall continue to exist and may be exercised by District at any time
and from time to time, irrespective of the fact that any of the Guaranteed Obligations may have
become barred by any statutes of limitations. Guarantor expressly waives the benefit of any and
all statutes of limitations, and any and all laws providing for exemption of property from execution
or for valuation and appraisal upon foreclosure, and any and all rights and benefits, if any, arising
under the laws of the District of Columbia. Furthermore, Guarantor acknowledge that any claims
brought by District that arise under, or as a result of, this Guaranty are not subject to the statute of
limitations contained in D.C. Official Code § 12-301, as amended.
13. Indemnification. Guarantor agrees to indemnify and hold harmless District for all
reasonable, direct, and out-of-pocket costs and expenses, including, without limitation, all court
costs, reasonable attorneys’ fees and expenses, and costs of collection incurred or paid by District
arising out of or in connection with (a) the Guaranteed Obligations and (b) the enforcement of this
Guaranty by District. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Guarantor shall not have any obligation to
indemnify District for any costs and expenses, including, without limitation, all court costs,
reasonable attorneys’ fees and expenses, if Guarantor should prevail in an enforcement action;
provided, further, the immediately preceding proviso clause shall not be deemed to release
Guarantor from its indemnification obligations under this Guaranty if District prevails against
Guarantor in any enforcement action notwithstanding the fact that District may not have prevailed
against Guarantor in a previous enforcement action.
14. No Limitation of Obligations. To the fullest extent Guarantor may do so under applicable
law, Guarantor agrees that it shall make no claim or setoff, defense, recoupment, or counterclaim
of any sort whatsoever, nor shall Guarantor seek to impair, limit, or defeat in any way its
obligations hereunder. To the fullest extent Guarantor may do so under applicable law, Guarantor
hereby waives any right to such a claim in limitation of its obligations hereunder.
15. No Right of Subrogation. Until all of the Guaranteed Obligations are fully paid,
performed and/or fulfilled, Guarantor agrees solely with respect to itself that it: (i) shall have no
right of subrogation against Developer by reason of any payments or acts of performance by
Guarantor in compliance with the obligations of Guarantor under this Guaranty; (ii) waives any
right to enforce any remedy which Guarantor now or hereafter shall have against Developer by
reason of any payment or act of performance in compliance with the obligations of Guarantor
hereunder; and (iii) subordinates any present or future, liquidated or unliquidated, liability,
indebtedness, or obligation of Developer to Guarantor, irrespective of the respective dates of the
incurrence, accrual, or maturity thereof, to the indebtedness and obligations of Developer to
District under the Construction Covenants.
16. No Assignment or Delegation; Merger. Except in connection with an assignment of the
Construction Covenants permitted pursuant to the terms thereof or otherwise approved by District,
10

Guarantor shall not assign or delegate its obligations under this Guaranty. If Guarantor is not a
natural person and is merged into or with any other company, firm or corporation, the resulting
merged company, firm or corporation shall become liable as a Guarantor under this Guaranty to
the same extent as the original named Guarantor hereunder.
17. Choice of Law and Consent to Jurisdiction. This Guaranty shall, in all respects, be
governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the District of Columbia, without
reference to its conflicts of law principles. Guarantor hereby consents to jurisdiction of the federal
or local jurisdiction courts within the District of Columbia for purposes of such litigation and waives
any right it may have to seek a change of venue of such proceedings. Guarantor further agrees not to
assert in any action, suit or proceeding arising out of or relating to the Construction Covenants that
Guarantor is not personally subject to the jurisdiction of such courts, that the action, suit, or other
proceeding is brought in an inconvenient forum, or that the venue of the action, suit, or other
proceeding is improper. Guarantor agrees that service of process may be made, and personal
jurisdiction over Guarantor obtained, by serving a copy of the summons and complaint upon
Guarantor at the notice address set forth below in accordance with the applicable laws of the District
of Columbia. Nothing herein contained, however, shall prevent District from bringing any action or
exercising any right against Guarantor within any other jurisdiction or state. Initiating such
proceeding or taking such action in any other jurisdiction or state shall not, however, constitute a
waiver of the agreement herein contained that the laws of the District of Columbia shall govern the
rights and obligations of the parties hereunder. Guarantor agrees that District may, and Guarantor
agrees not to oppose District’s attempts to, consolidate any litigation arising out of or relating to this
Guaranty with any action(s), suit(s), or proceeding(s) against Developer or any other individual or
entity and/or the property of any of the foregoing arising out of or relating to the Construction
Covenants.
18. Notices. Any notice, demand, statement, or request required under this Guaranty shall be in
writing and delivered by certified mail (return receipt requested, postage pre-paid), by hand, or by
reputable private overnight commercial courier service, at the following respective addresses:
IF TO DISTRICT:
Office of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Suite 317
Washington, DC 20004
Attention: Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development
With a copy to:
Office of the General Counsel
for the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Suite 317
Washington, DC 20004
Attention: General Counsel
11

IF TO GUARANTOR:
__________________________________
__________________________________
__________________________________
With a copy to:
__________________________________
__________________________________
__________________________________
Notices served upon District or Guarantor in the manner aforesaid shall be deemed to have
been received for all purposes under this Guaranty as follows: (i) if hand delivered to a party
against receipted copy, when the copy of the notice is receipted; (ii) if given by nationally
recognized overnight delivery service, on the next Business Day after the notice is deposited with
the overnight delivery service; or (iii) if given by certified mail, return receipt requested, postage
prepaid, on the date of actual delivery or refusal thereof. If notice is tendered under the terms of
this Guaranty and is refused by the intended recipient of the notice, the notice shall nonetheless be
considered to have been received and shall be effective as of the date provided in this Guaranty.
19. Severability. In the event that any provision of this Guaranty is held to be void or
unenforceable, all other provisions shall remain unaffected and be enforceable, unless this
construction would constitute a substantial deviation from the general intent of the Parties as
reflected in this Guaranty.
20. Waiver of Jury Trial. TO THE EXTENT PERMITTED BY LAW, EACH PARTY
HEREBY: (I) COVENANTS AND AGREES NOT TO ELECT TRIAL BY JURY OF ANY ISSUE
HEREUNDER TRIABLE OF RIGHT BY A JURY AND (II) WAIVES ANY RIGHT TO TRIAL
BY JURY OF ANY ISSUE FULLY TO THE EXTENT THAT ANY SUCH RIGHT SHALL NOW
OR HEREAFTER EXIST. THIS WAIVER OF RIGHT TO TRIAL BY JURY IS SEPARATELY
GIVEN, KNOWINGLY AND VOLUNTARILY, BY GUARANTOR, AND THIS WAIVER IS
INTENDED TO ENCOMPASS INDIVIDUALLY EACH INSTANCE AND EACH ISSUE AS TO
WHICH THE RIGHT TO A JURY TRIAL WOULD OTHERWISE ACCRUE. EACH PARTY
ACKNOWLEDGES THAT THIS WAIVER IS A MATERIAL INDUCEMENT FOR THE
OTHER PARTY TO PROVIDE OR ACCEPT THIS GUARANTY, AS APPLICABLE. FOR THE
PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION 20, THE TERM “PARTY” IS DEEMED TO MEAN DISTRICT,
AS WELL AS GUARANTOR.
21. Time is of the Essence. Time is of the essence with respect to all matters set forth in this
Guaranty.
22. No Amendment. Neither this Guaranty nor any provision hereof may be modified,
amended, waived, terminated, or changed orally, but only by an agreement in writing signed by
District and Guarantor.
23. Irrevocable Survival. This Guaranty shall be irrevocable by the Guarantor until this
Guaranty is released by District.
12

[SIGNATURE PAGE FOLLOWS]
13

SIGNATURE PAGE TO
DEVELOPMENT AND COMPLETION GUARANTY
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, each Guarantor has executed this Guaranty as of the Effective
Date.
GUARANTOR:
___________________
14

GOVERNMENTOF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
Departmentof Employment Services
x kw
————
SS
MURIEL BOWSER Dr.UNIQUEMorrts-HUGHES
Mayor DIRECTOR
July 27, 2026
Simone GoringDevaney
Managing Principal/AuthorizedParty
ReevesCMCVentureLLC
1328 Florida Ave NW
Washington, DC 20009
Re: First SourceEmploymentAgreement
Dear Simone,
Enclosed isyourcopy ofthesignedFirstSourceEmployment Agreement between theD.C. Department
ofEmployment Services (DOES)andReevesCMCVentureLLC_ {I Developer, GeneralContractor
Dor SubcontractorLJ. Underthe termsof theAgreement,you arerequiredtouse DOESasthefirst
source to fill all newjobscreatedas aresultofProject: ReevesCenterRedevelopment
You must registerand post yourjob vacanciesto the Department of Employment Services’ Virtual One-
Stop (VOS) atwww.denetworks.org.
In addition, youare required tohavethe following percentage ofhours worked by District residents: 20%
ofjourney worker hours; 60% of apprentice hours; 51% of skilled laborer hours; and 70% of common
laborer hours. Further, District residents registered in programs approved by the District of Columbia
ApprenticeshipCouncil shall work 35% ofall apprenticeship hours worked inconnection with the Project
or60% where applicable.
Reminder: All General Contractors must invite their subcontractors that are subject to the First Source
Employment Agreement requirements, to join the project using the First Source Online Registration &
Reporting System (FORRS), website http:/firstsource.de.gov. Additionally, contractors are required to
report hours worked throughout the duration ofyourcontract. Contact the monitor listed belowregarding
LCPTrackersubmission.
Ifyou have anyquestions orneed additional information, pleasecontact DeCarloWashington,
(202) 698- $772, decarlo.washington@dc.gov
Sincerely,
odo
fer
Daniel King
Associate Director
OfficeofFirst SourceCompliance
Enclosure
4058Minnesota Ave,N.E. +Suite$000*Washington,D.C. 20019 +Office: 202.671.1900

*** ***
GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
FIRST SOURCE EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT FOR
CONSTRUCTION PROJECl'S ONLY
GOVERNMENT-ASSISTED PROJECT/CONTRACT INFORMATION
CONTRACT/SOLICITATION NUMBER: __________________
DISTRICT CONTRACTING AGENCY: 01b ot 1tie Deputy Mayor 1br Planning em1 Economic: 0eve1opmen1
CONTRACTING OFFICER:
----Kata-n G-ad-a -----------------
-------------------------
TELEPHONE NUMBER: 202-727-6365
TOTAL CONTRACT AMOUNT:�S26=2.=22=3,-38=9�------------------
ffllS SECTION TO BE COMPLETED BY mE BENEFICIARY ONLY:
TOTAL GOVERNMENT ASSISTED FUNDED AMOUNT: $27,500,000 DATE._TB_o_ __ _
□ □ □ □ □
CONTRACT GRANT LOAN TAXABATEMENTOREXEMPTION LANDTRANSFER
� LAND DISPOSIDON AND DEVELOPMENT AGREEMENT la TAX INCREMENI' FINANCING
□
ANY ADDITIONAL LEGISLATION, IF YES_ ________________
D.C. CODE#
GENERAL CONTRACTOR WILL MEET THE HIRING OR HOURS WORKED PERCENTAGES
O
REQUIREMENTS FOR ENTIRE PROJECT OR PER EACH SUBCONTRACTOR�
PROJECT NAME: Reeves Center Redevelopment
PROJECT ADDRESS: - 200 - 0 14t - h S - t - reet. NW -= =- __ -: =-:c=---------____ _ _ _ -= �=9 _____
CITY: Washington sTATE: D ZIP CODE: 2000
P E R MP OJ L E O CT YE S R T S A T R A T R D T A D T A E TE : _est. : _ eat. 411_ 41 l2029_ •120 _ 29 ____ P E R MP OJE L C O T Y E E R N D E N D D A T D E A : TE es _ l :_ 11 - 3 _ 1/20 ,- .113 3 _ 5 _1 12-035 _ ___
EMPWYER INFORMATION
EMPWYER NAME: Reaves CMC Venture LLC
EMPWYER ADDRESS: 1328 Florida Avenue, NW, Second Floor
CITY: Washington STATE: DC ZIP CODE: _20009__ ____
TELEPHONE NUMBER: 202-276•7005 FEDERAL IDENTIFICATION NO.: _____ _
CONT ACT PERSON: Simone Goring Devaney
TITLE: Managing Principal f Aulhorized Party
E-MAIL: sgoring@csgurban.com TELEPHONE NUMBER: 202-276-7005
CERTIFIED BUSINESS ENTERPRISES CERTIFICATION NUMBER:_Nl_A_ _______
D.C. APPRENTICESHIP COUNCIL □REGISTRATION NUMBER: NIA
121
ARE YOU A SUBCON1RACTOR YES NO IF YES, NAME OF PRIME CONTRACTOR:
This First Source Employment Agreement (Agreement), in accordance with Workforce Intermediary
Establishment and Refonn of the First Source Amendment Act of2011 (D.C. Official Code §§ 2-219.01
-2.219.05), and relevant provisions of the Apprenticeship Requirements Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C.
Official Code § 2-219.03 and § 32-1431) is a required agreement between the District of Columbia
Department of Employment Services (DOES) and EMPLOYER.
EMPWYER, which includes the Beneficiary and all contractors and subcontractors, is worlcing on a
contract or project that has received:
D
D.C. Government assistance valued between $300,000 and $5 million dollars, required to make a
good faith effort to ensure that 51 % of all new hires are District residents. (D.C. Official Code § 2-
219(e )(l )(A))
0
D.C. Government assistance valued at $5 million or more, required to have the following percentage
of hours worked in each classification by DC residents; 20% of journey worker hours; 60% of apprentice
hours; 51% of skilled laborer holD'S; 70% of common laborer hours for all jobs created by the Project.
(D.C. Official Code §2-219.03 (IA)(A))
Page 1 ofll R,stSotaff Employ,wnt �I, Rlvllcd Fdnuary JS, 1018

DOES is the first source for recruitment, referral, and placement of new hires or employees for all jobs
created by the Government Assisted Project or Contract (Project).
The Parties agree to the terms and conditions of the Agreement as follows:
I. DEFINITIONS
The following definitions shall govern the terms used in this Agreement.
A. Apprentice means a worker who is employed to learn an apprenticeable occupation under the
tenns and comlitions of approved apprenticeship standards.
B. Beneficiary means:
1. The signatory to a contract executed by the Mayor which involves any District of
Columbia government funds, or funds which, in accordance with a federal grant or
otherwise, the District government administers and which details the number and
description of all jobs created by a government-assisted Project for which the
beneficiary is required to use the First Source Register;
2. A recipient of a District government economic development action including
contracts, grants, loans, tax abatements, land transfers for redevelopment, or tax
increment financing that results in a financial benefit of $300,000 or more from an
agency, commission, instrumentality, or other entity of the District government,
including a financial or banking institution which serves as the repository for $1
million or more of District of Columbia funds.
C. Contracting Agency means any District of Columbia agency that awarded a government
assisted Project totaling $300,000 or more.
D. Direct labor costs means all costs, including wages and benefits, associated with the hiring
and employment of personnel assigned to a process in which payroll expenses are traced to
the units of output and are included in the cost of goods sold.
E. EMPLOYER means any entity awarded a government assisted Project totaling $300,000 or
more, including alt individual contractor and subcontractor entities at any tier who work
on the Project.
F. First Source Employer Portal is a website consisting of a connected group of static and
dynamic web pages with the ability for Employers to enter data using the internet. The
website is accessible by a Uniform Resource Locator (URL) and is maintained by DOES.
The website provides reporting information to First Source EMPLOYERS.
G. First Source Register means the DOES Automated Applicant Files, which consists of the
names of DC residents registered with DOES.
H. Good faith effort means an EMPLOYER has exhausted all reasonable means to comply with
any affirmative action, hiring, or contractual goal(s) pursuant to the First Source Jaw and
Agreement.
I. Government-assisted project or contract (Project) means any construction or non­
construction Project that receives funds or resources, valued at $300,000 or more, from the
District of Columbia, or funds or resources which, in accordance with a federal grant or
otherwise, the District of Columbia government administers, including contracts, grants,
loans, tax abatements or exemptions, land transfers, land disposition and development
agreements, tax increment financing, or any combination of the aforementioned.
Page 2 of 11 Fim Source Employment Ag,fflnOII, Rm.ml F�bn,o;y IS. 1 018

J. Hard to employ means a District of Columbia resident who is confirmed by DOES as:
1. An ex-offender who has been released from prison within the last 10 years;
2. A participant of the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program;
3. A participant of the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program;
4. Living with a permanent disability verified by the Social Security Administration or
District vocational rehabilitation program;
5. Unemployed for 6 months or more in the last 12-month period;
6. Homeless;
7. A participant or graduate of the Transitional Employment Program established by.§
32-1331; or
8. An individual who qualified for inclusion in the Work Opportunity Tax Credit
Program as certified by the Department of Employment Services.
K. Indirect labor costs means all costs, including wages and benefits, that are part of operating
expenses and are associated with the hiring and employment of personnel assigned to tasks
other than producing products.
L. Jobs means any union and non-union managerial, non-managerial, professional,
nonprofessional, technical or nontechnical position including: clerical and sales occupations,
service occupations, processing occupations, machine trade occupations, bench work
occupations, structural work occupations, agricultural, fishery, forestry, and related
occupations, and any other occupations as the Department of Employment Services may
identify in the Dictionary of Occupational Titles, United States Department of Labor.
M. New Hire: lndividual(s) newly hired by the EMPLOYER to perform work on a government
assisted Project.
N. Transfer: Existing EMPLOYER employee who has been moved from one Project to another
Project.
0. Journeyman means a worker who has attained a level of skill, abilities and competencies
recognimd within an industry as having mastered the skills and competencies required for the
occupation.
P. Revised Employment Plan means a docwnent prepared and submitted by the EMPLOYER
that includes the following:
I. A projection of the total nwnber of hours to be worked on the Project by trade;
2. A projection of the total number of journey worker hours, by trade, to be worked on
the Project and the total number of journey work.er hours, by trade, to be worked by
DC residents;
3. A projection of the total number of apprentice hours, by trade, to be worked on the
Project and the total number of apprentice hours, by trade, to be worked by DC
residents;
4. A projection of the total number of skilled laborer hours, by trade, to be worked on
the Project and the total number of skilled laborer hours, by trade, to be worked by
DC residents;
S. A projection of the total nwnber of common laborer hours to be worked on the
Page 3 of 11 Finl Soiur:e Employ,,,nl A�tmvil. Rmsm Fdmuuy H, 2 018

Project and the total number of common laborer hours to be worked by DC residents;
6. A timetable outlining the total hours worked by trade over the life of the Project and
an associated hiring schedule;
7. Descriptions of the skill requirements by job title or position, including industry­
recognized certifications required for the different positions;
8. A strategy to fill the hours required to be worked by DC residents pursuant to this
paragraph, including a component on communicating these requirements to
contractors and subcontractors and a component on potential community outreach
partnerships with the University of the District of Columbia, the University of the
District of Columbia Community College, the Department of Employment Services,
Jointly Funded Apprenticeship Programs, the District of Columbia Workforce
Intermediary, or other government-approved, community-based job training
providers;
9. A remediation strategy to ameliorate any problems associated with meeting these
hiring requirements, including any problems encountered with contractors and
subcontractors;
IO. The designation of a senior official from the EMPLOYER(S) or general contractor
who will be responsible for implementing the hiring and reportingrequirements;
1 l. Descriptions of the health and retirement benefits that will be provided to DC
residents working on the Project;
12. A strategy to ensure that District residents who work on the Project receive ongoing
employment and training opportunities after they complete work on the job for which
they were initially hired and a review of past practices in continuing to employ DC
residents from one Project to the next;
13. A strategy to hire graduates of District of Columbia Public Schools, District of
Columbia pubJic charter schools, and community-based job training providers, and
hard-to-employ residents; and
14. A disclosure of past compliance with the Workforce Act and the Davis-Bacon Act.
where applicable, and the bidder or offeror's general DC resident hiring practices on
projects or contracts completed within the last 2 years.
Q. Tier Subcontractor means any subcontractor selected by the primary contractor to perform
portion(s) or all work related to the trade or occupation area(s) on a Project subject to this
First Source Agreement.
R. Washington Metropolitan Statistical Area means the District of Columbia; Virginia Cities
of Alexandria, Fairfax, Falls Church, Fredericksburg, Manassas, and Manassas Park; the
Virginia Counties of Arlington, Clarke, Fairfax, Fauquier, Loudon, Prince William,
Spotsylvania, Stafford, and Warren; the Maryland Counties of Calvert, Charles, Frederick.
Montgomery and Prince Georges; and the West Virginia County of Jefferson.
S. Workforce Intermediary Pilot Program means the intermediary between employers and
training providers to provide employers with qualified DC resident job applicants. See DC
Official Code§ 2-219.04b.
Page4ofl1 Finl Sauret! E loy,nent JlgnfflfCIII, Rmud Fd,n,ary I 5, :Z 018
mp

II. GENERAL TERMS
A. Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, DOES will receive the Agreement from
the Contracting Agency no less than 7 calendar days in advance of the Project start date. No
work associated with the relevant Project can begin until the Agreement has been accepted by
DOES.
B. The Beneficiary and/or EMPLOYER shalJ require all Project contractors and subcontractors,
under a Project receiving government assistance or benefits valued at $300,000 or more, to
enter into an Agreement with DOES.
C. Agreement will take affect once beneficiary/Employer awarded contract and start work on
the government assisted Project and no work can begin prior to execution of the Agreement
and will be fully effective through the duration, any extension or modifications of the Project
and until such time as construction is complete and a certificate of occupancy is issued.
D. If an EMPLOYER began work prior to the execution of a First Source Employment
Agreement, the EMPLOYER shall cease work on the Project and sign a First Source
Employment Agreement to be bound by the applicable First Source Employment Agreement
requirements, retroactively, from the start of work throughout the duration of the contract.
E. DOES will provide recruitment, referral, and placement services to the EMPLOYER, subject
to the limitations in this Agreement
F. DOES and the EMPLOYER agree that, for purposes of this Agreement, new hires and jobs
created for the Project (both union and nonunion) include all of EMPLOYER'S job openings
and vacancies in the Washington Metropolitan Statistical Area created for the Project as a
result of internal promotions, tenninations, and expansions of the EMPLOYER'S workforce,
as a result of this Project.
G. This Agreement includes apprentices as defined in D.C. Official Code§§ 32-1401-1431.
DOES will make every effort to work within the terms of all collective bargaining
agreements to which the EMPLOYER is a party. The EMPLOYER will provide DOES with
written documentation that the EMPLOYER has provided the representative of any collective
bargaining unit involved with this Project a copy of this Agreement and has requested
comments or objections. If the representative has any comments or objections, the
EMPLOYER will promptly provide them to DOES.
The EMPLOYER who contracts with the District of Columbia government to perform
construction, renovation work, or information technology work with a single contract, or
cumulative contracts, of at least $500,000, within a 12-rnonth period will be required to
register an apprenticeship program with the District of Columbia Apprenticeship Council as
required by DC Code 32-1431.
H. If, during the term of this Agreement, the EMPLOYER should transfer possession of all or a
portion of its business concerns affected by this Agreement to any other party by lease, sale,
assignment, merger, or otherwise this First Source Agreement shall remain in full force and
effect and transferee sha11 remain subject to all provisions herein. In addition, the
EMPLOYER as a condition of transfer shall:
I. Notify the party taking possession of the existence of this EMPLOYER'S First
Source Employment Agreement.
2. Notify DOES within 7 business days of the transfer. This notice will include the
PageS ofll l'"lnt SDllrll Employ,rcnl Agn:elMIII, Rr,tud l'"ebn,a,y I J, 2 0/IJ

a TRAINING
A. DOES and the EMPLOYER may agree to develop skills training and on-the-job training
Programs asapprovedby DOES;the training specifications andcostforsuchtraining will be
mutually agreed upon by the EMPLOYER and DOES and will be set forth in a separate
TrainingAgreement,
RECRUITMENT
‘A. The EMPLOYER shall complete theattached Revised Employment Plan that will include the
informationoutlinedin Section LP.
B. The EMPLOYER shall register and post all job vacancies with the Job Bank Services of
DOES at www.denetworks.org a minimum of 10 days. Should you need assistance posting
job vacancies, pleasecontactJobBank Servicesat(202)698-6001.
C. The EMPLOYER shall notify DOES ofall newjobs created forthe Project within at least 7
business days (Monday - Friday) of the EMPLOYERS? identification/creation of the new
jobs. The Notice ofNew Job Creation shall include the number ofemployees needed byjob
title, qualifications and specific skills required to perform thejob, hiring date, rate ofpay,
hours ofwork, duration ofemployment, anda description ofthe work to be performed, This
mustbe donebeforeusinganyotherreferral source.
D. Job openings to be filled by internal promotion from the EMPLOYER'S current workforce
shall be reported to DOES for placement and referral, if the jobis newly created.
EMPLOYER shall provide DOES aNotice ofNew JobCreation that details such promotions
in accordancewith SectionIV.C.
E, The EMPLOYER will submit to DOES, prior to commencing work on the Project, a list of
Current Employees that includesthe name, social security number, and residencystatusofall
currentemployees, includingapprentices, trainees,andlaid-offworkerswhowill beemployed
on the Project. All EMPLOYER information reviewed or gathered, including social security
numbers,as aresult ofDOES’ monitoringandenforcement activitieswill be heldconfidential
in accordancewith all District and federal confidentiality and privacy lawsand used only for
thepurposesthat itwasreviewedorgathered.
V. REFERRAL
‘A. DOES will screen applicants through carefully planned recruitment and training events and
provide the EMPLOYER with a list of qualified applicants according to the number of
employees needed by job title, qualifications and specific skills required to perform the job,
hiringdate, rateofpay, hours ofwork, duration ofemployment, and a descriptionofthe work
to be performed as supplied by the EMPLOYER in its Notice of New Job Creation set forth
aboveinSectionIV.C.
Page6of11 PratSourceEmploymentAgreementRevisedFebruary 18.2018

B. DOES will notify the EMPLOYER of the number of applicants DOES will refer, prior to the
anticipated hiring dates.
VJ. PLACEMENT
A. EMPLOYER shall in good faith, use reasonable efforts to select its new hires or employees
from among the qualified applicants referred by DOES. All hiring decisions are made by the
EMPLOYER
B. In the event that DOES is unable to refer qualified applicants meeting the EMPLOYER'S
established qualifications, within 7 business days (Monday - Friday) from the date of
notification from the EMPLOYER, the EMPLOYER will be free to directly fill remaining
positions for which no qualified applicants have been referred. However, the EMPLOYER shall
still be required to meet the First Source hiring requirements or hours worked percentages for
all jobs created by the Project.
C. After the EMPLOYER has selected its employees, DOES is not responsible for the employees'
actions and the EMPLOYER hereby reJeases DOES, and the Government of the District of
Columbia, the District of Columbia Municipal Corporation, and the officers and employees of
the District of Columbia from any liability for employees' actions.
VII, REPORTING REQUIREMENTS
A. EMPLOYER with a single contract valued at $300,000 or more on a Project that received
government assistance totaling between $300,000 and $5,000,000, a provision that at least Slo/o of
the new employees hired to work on the Project shall be District residents.
B. EMPLOYER sha11 register in the First Source Online Registration and Reporting System for
electronic submission of all monthly Contract Compliance data, weekly certified payrolls and
any other documents required by DOES for reporting and monitoring.
C. EMPLOYER shalt submit to the Department of Employment Services each month following the
start of the Project a hiring compliance report for the Project that includes the:
I. Number of new job openings created/available;
2. Number of new job openings listed with DOES, or any other District Agency;
3. Number of DC residents hired for new jobs;
4. Number of employees transferred to the Project;
5. Number of DC residents transferred to the Project;
6. Direct or indirect labor cost associated with the project;
7. Each employee's name, job title, social security number, hire date, residence,
and referral somce; and
8. Workforce statistics throughout the entire project tenure.
D. EMPLOYER with a single contract valued at $300,000 or more on a Project that received
government assistance totaling $5 million or more shall meet the following hours worked
percentages for all jobs created by the Project:
1. At least 20% of journey worker hours by trade shall be performed by DC residents;
2. At least 60% of apprentice hours by trade shall be performed by DC residents;
3. At least 51% of the skilled laborer hours by trade shall be performed by DC
residents; and
4. At least 70% of common laborer hours shall be performed by DC residents.
Page7 ofll First SallrCe E.,,,,,taymenl Agrumo,I, Reviud Felmuuy 15, l 018

E. EMPLOYERS shall provide the following cwnulative statistics, that will be used to create
the monthly report, by uploading certified payroUs or payro11 data into the LCPtracker
reporting system:
1. Number of journey worker hours worked by DC residents by trade;
2. Number of how-s worked by all journey workers by trade;
3. Number of apprentice hours worked by DC residents by trade;
4. Nmnber of hours worked by al1 apprentices by trade;
S. Number of skilled laborer worker hours worked by DC residents by trade;
6. Number of hours worked by all skilled laborers by trade;
7. Number of common laborer hours worked by DC residents by trade; and
8. Number of hours worked by all common laborers by trade.
F. EMPLOYER may "double count" hours for the "hard to employ" up to I 5% of total hours
worked by DC Residents; however, a collective bargaining agreement shall not be a basis for
waiver of this requirement
G. For construction Projects that are not subject to Davis-Bacon law in which certified payroll
records do not exist, EMPLOYER shaJl submit monthly docmnents of workers employed on
the Project to DOES, including DC residents and all employment classifications of hours
worked.
H. EMPLOYER may also be required to provide verification of hours worked or hiring
percentages of DC residents, such as internal payroll records for construction Projects that are
not subject to Davis-Bacon.
I. Monthly, EMPLOYER sha11 submit weekly certified payrolls from all subcontractors at any tier
working on the Project to the Contracting Agency. EMPLOYER is also required to make
payroll records available to DOES as a part of compliance monitoring, upon request at job sites.
VIII, FINAL REPORT AND GOOD FAim EFFORTS
A. With the submission of the final request for payment from the Contracting Agency,
the Beneficiary and/or EMPLOYER shaJI:
1. Report to DOES its compliance with the hiring or hours worked percentage
requirements for all jobs created by the Project, and report the hours that DC
residents worked for each trade classifications in each area of the Project; or
2. Submit to DOES a request for a waiver of the hiring or hours worked percentage
requirements for all jobs created by the Project that will include the following
documentation:
a. Documentation supporting EMPLOYER'S good faith effort to comply;
b. Referrals provided by DOES and other referral sources; and
c. Advertisement ofj ob openings listed with DOES and other referral sources.
B. DOES may waive or partially waive the hiring or hours worked percentage requirements for
jobs created by the Project, and/or the required hours of DC residents for each trade
classifications, if DOES finds that the Beneficiary or EMPLOYER, including its contractors
or subcontractors:
1. DOES certified that Beneficiary or Employer demonstrated a good faith effort to
comply, as set forth in Section VIII.C.; or
Page 8 ofll Finl Sowu Emplay,tlffll A.plffllDII, Rmud F�bnuuy I 5, 2 OJI

2. Is located outside the Washington Metropolitan Statistical Area. and none of the
contract work is performed inside the Washington Metropolitan StatisticalArea;
3. The beneficiary published each job opening or part-time work needed for 7 calendar
days in a District newspaper of city-wide circulation; and
4. The DOES certified that there are insufficient eligible applicants from the First Source
Register that possess the skills required by the positions, or the eligible applicants are not
available for part-time work or do not have a means to travel to the onsite jobs; or
5. Benefici /Employer entered into a special workforce development training or
ary
placement arrangement with DOES or with the District of Columbia Workforce
Intermediary.
C. DOES shall consider documentation of the following when making a determination of a
good-faith effort to comply:
l. DOES has certified that there are insufficient number of District residents in the Jabor
market possessing the skills required by the EMPLOYER for the positions created as
a result of the Project.
2. Whether the EMPLOYER posted the jobs on the DOES job website for a minimwn
of 10 calendar days;
3. Whether the EMPLOYER advertised each job opening in a District newspaper with
city-wide circulation for a minimum of 7 calendar days;
4. Whether the EMPLOYER advertised each job opening in special interest publications
and on special interest media for a minimum of 7 calendar days;
S. Whether the EMPLOYER hosted informational/recruiting or hiring fairs;
6. Whether the EMPLOYER contacted churches, unions, and/or additional Workforce
Development Organizations;
7. Whether the EMPLOYER interviewed employable candidates;
8. Whether the EMPLOYER created or participated in a workforce development
program approved by DOES;
9. Whether the EMPLOYER created or partici ted in a workforce development
pa
program approved by the District of Columbia Workforce Intermedi ;
ary
10. Whether the EMPLOYER substantially complied with the relevant monthly reporting
requirements set forth in this section;
11. Whether the EMPLOYER has submitted and substantially complied with its most
recent employment plan that has been approved by DOES; and
12. Any additional documented efforts.
Page9 ofll Flm Sov,ce Elllploy,t,fflt Agrume,,t. Revis,,,/ FdNuary 15, 1 0/8

IX. MONITORING
A. DOES is the District agency authorized to monitor and enforce the requirements of the
Workforce Intennediaiy Establishment and Reform of the First Source Amendment Act
of 2011 (D.C. Official Code §§ 2 219.01 - 2.219.05), and relevant provisions of the
Apprenticeship Requirements Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Official Code § 2-219.03
and § 32�1431). As a part of monitoring and enforcement, DOES may require and
EMPLOYER shall grant access to Project sites, employees, and documents.
B. EMPLOYER'S noncompliance with the provisions of this Agreement may result in the
imposition of penalties.
C. All EMPLOYER information reviewed or gathered, including social security numbers, as a
result of DOES' monitoring and enforcement activities will be held confidential in
accordance with all District and federal confidentiality and privacy laws and used only for the
purposes that it was reviewed or gathered.
D. DOES shaU monitor all Projects as authorized by law. DOES will:
1. Review all contract controls to determine if the Beneficiary or EMPLOYER,
including any Contractors or Subcontractors, are subject to the Workforce
Intermediary Establishment and Reform of the First Source Amendment Act of 20 I I.
2. Notify stakeholders and company officials and establish meetings to provide
technical assistance involving the First Source Process.
3. Make regular construction site visits to determine if the Prime or Subcontractors'
workforce is in concurrence with the submitted Agreement and Monthly Compliance
Reports.
4. Inspect and copy certified payroll, personnel records and any other records or
information necessary to ensure the required workforce utilization is in compliance
with the First Source Law.
S. Conduct desk reviews of Monthly Compliance Reports.
6. Educate EMPLOYERS about additional services offered by DOES, such as On-the­
Job training programs and tax incentives for EMPLOYERS who hire from certain
categories.
7. Monitor and complete statistical reports that identify the overall project, contractor,
and subcontractors' hiring or hours worked percentages.
8. Provide formal notification of non-compliance with the required hiring or hours
worked percentages, or any alleged breach of the First Source Law to all contracting
agencies, and stakeholders. (Please note: EMPLOYERS are granted 30 days to
correct any alleged deficiencies stated in the nodjication.)
X. PENALTIES
A. Willful Breach of the Agreement by the EMPLOYER, failure to submit the contract
compliance reports, deliberate submission of falsified data may result in DOES imposing a
fine of 5% of the total amount of the direct and indirect labor costs of the Project, in addition
to other penalties provided by law. Failure to meet the required hiring requirements or failure
to receive good faith waiver may result in the Department of Employment Services
Page lOofll

imposing apenaltyequalto 1/8 of 1%ofthe total amountofthe directandindirect labor
costs ofthe Projectfor each percentageby which thebeneficiaryfails tomeetthehiring
requieruents.
B, EMPLOYERS who have beenfound inviolation2 tines ormoreovera 10 yearperiodmay
bedebarredand/ordeemedineligiblefor considerationforPrajectsfor aperiodofSyears,
C. Within 90 days ofaDetermination ofa Penalty, the Beneficiary orEmployer may appeal the
violations o fines by filing acomplaint withthe Contract Appeals Board in accordance with
D.C. Code §2-360.03and§2-360.04.
Uherebycertifythat Ihave theauthotroibitnyd the EMPLOYEtoR this Agreementfromthe stoaf wrortk
ontheProject,throughotuhte durationoftheProject, andagreetoalltermsandconditionsherein,
By:
‘SimoneGoringBoveney
07/23/2026
EMPLOYERSeniorOfficial (Print) Date
AnTey
EMPLOYER Senior Official (Signature)
ReevesCMCVentureLLC
‘NameofCompany
{28FinAvorn, SocaFloor
‘Washington,DC20009
Address
202-278-7005
T elephone
poring@esgurbon.com
Email
Yf2qfron
ByAdo for JDawneeelHas
Signature DepartmenotfEmployment Servi
Pa11gofe11 FieSearceEmplaymesAgreement.avisudFebery15.2013,

* + * * * :
‘GOVERNMENTOFTHE DISTRICTOFCOLUMBIA l
i
REVISED EMPLOYMENTPLAN
L REVISEDFIRSTSOURCEEMPLOYMPELNATN
GOVERNMENT-ASSISTEDPROJECT/CONTRACTINFORMATION
DISTRICT CONTRACTING AGENCY; OtteotteOsosMaori amingmdEo Devaonntr
CONTRACTING OFFICER: KetanGud ——
OSOSCS~—“SCSCSCSCS
TELEPHONE NUMBER;202-727-695
‘TOTAL CONTRACTAMOUNT: $262,223.350
EMPLOYERCONTRACTAMOUNT: $262.223
PROJECT NAME: ReevesCenter Redvelopm
PROJECT ADDRESS: 200014hSte
CITY:Washington,DC STAI 20008
PROJECTDESCRIPTIONOFWORK:"wosteve isedanecnet 33ot97 ade)
rialatesnanan00Spopare
PROJECT STARTDATE:<#.«veo09 __PROEJNDEDACTET:staves
EMPLOYER STARTDATE: 2szize EMPLOYERENDDATE: savas
EMPLO YERINFORMATION
EMPLOYER NAME: ReovosCAGVentureLLC
COMPANY NAME: ReevesGNGVentureLLC
EMPLOYER ADDRES!
COTY Wesningion STATE:DC ZAPCODE: 20008
‘TELEPHONE NUMBER; 2027767005 FEDERAL IDENTIFICATION NO.:_
CONTACT PERSON: SianeGoringBovey es =
TOLLE:Auber Pery
E-MAILsgecinoBosgurban.com = ‘TELEPHONENUMBER; 202-276-7008
EMPLOYERDESCRIPTIONOFWORK:DesaoteRowsCortemodzepitt ldo Oo,ete
roawdodwexrdcnaus,adpublpanama
A REYOUASUBCONTRACTOR YES[] NO fd
IFYES,NAMEOFPRIMECONTRACTOR:__
PRIMECONTRACTORWILLMEETHOURSWORKED PERCENTAGES REQUIREMENTS
FORENTIRE PROJECT (| ORPEREACH SUBCONTRACTOR[7]
u. EMPLOYMENTHOURSTO BEWORKEDPROJECTIONS
FirstSoureelaw requiresEMPLOYERS (winningbidders)tosubmitarevisedEmploymentPlan.
A. For construction projects receiving $5 million or more im government
assistance, Employers to provideprojectionofthe total numberofhours
to beworkedon theprojbyetrcadte.
JOURNEYWORKER
Providea projectionofthe total numberofjourneyworkerhours,by trade, to beworked on the
project or contractand the total number ofjourney worker hours, bytrade, to be worked by
Districtresidents.
‘ThispagetobecompletedbyEmployer sa_SdH)
EmployerInitials

* * *
= ‘GOVERNMENTOFTHEDISTRICTOFCOLUMBIA =
REVISEDEMPLOYMENTPLAN
ProjectionofTotalNumberof Trade ProjectionofTotalNumberofJourney
Journey WorkerHours Worker HoursbyDCResidents
(FirstSource Lawrequires20%)
APPRENTICE
Providea projectionofthetotalnumbero fapprenticehours,bytrade,tobeworkedonthe
projectorcontract andthetotalnumofabppreentirce hours,bytrade,tobeworkedbyDistrict
residents.
Projection ofTotalNumberof 0} ‘ofTotalNumberof
Apprentice Hours ApprenticeHours byDCResidents
(FirstSourceLawrequires60%)
: I — ee
SKILLEDWORKER
Providea projectionofthetotalnumobfskeillred laborerhours,bytrade,tobeworkedonthe
projector contractandthetotalnumobfskeillred laborerhours,by trade,tobeworkedby
Districtresidents.
Projectionof TotalNumberof Trade ProjectionofTotalNumberof
SkilledLabor Hours SkilledLabor HoursbyDC
Residents
(FirstSourceLawrequires51%)
COMMONLABORER
Providea projectionofthetotalnumber ofcommonlab orerhourstobeworkedontheproject
orcontractand thetotalnumberofcommonlaborerhourstobeworkedbyDistrictresidents.
Projection ofTotalNumberof ‘Trade ProjecotfTiootanlNumberofCommon
Common LaborerHours Laborer HoursbyDCResidents
_ (FirstSourceLaw requires70%) j
I Z = al
ThispagetobecompletedbyEmployer se0_ 4-0
EmployerInitials

xk
_ GOVERNMENTOFTHE DISTRICTOFCOLUMBIA
REVISED EMPLOYMENTPLAN
B.EMPLHOIRIYNGPMROJEECTNIONTS.
ALLEMPLOYERS:
* *
Please indicateALLnewposition(s)youwillcreate asaresultoftheproject. IfyouWILLNOT
becreatinganynewemploymentopportunities,pleasecompletetheattachedjustification
sheetwithanexplanation. Attachadditionalsheetsasneeded.
*
‘UNIONMEMBERSHIP ‘PROJECTE
REQUIREDNAMELOCAL# DHIRE
—|
SoD
‘ThispagetobecomplbyeEmtpleoyder
EmployerInitials

:*
|
+ :I * *
ESS GOVERNMENTOFTHE DISTRICTOFCOLUMBIA
REVISED EMPLOYMENTPLAN
C. JUSTIFICATIONSHEET:PleaseprovideadetailedexplanationofwhytheEmployerwillnot
have anynewhires ontheproject.
‘Theemployer, ReevesCMCVentureLLC, isasingle-purposedevelopmententityformed solelytodevelop
the Reeves CenterRedevelopment and willnothave anyemployeesordirectconstructionhires. The First
‘Sourceemployment planwillbeimplementedbythe general contractoranditssub-contractorsonce
‘constructioncommences. Constructionemploymentwill be generatedby thegeneralcontractorand their
‘subcontractors.Thegeneral contractorhasnotyetbeen selectedorcontracted. Uponcontractexecution,the
Developerwillrequiretheselectedgeneralcontracttorosubmitthetrade-by-tradehours, hiringprojections,
certifications,benefits, andseniorcomplianceofficialinformation requiredbythisRevised EmploymentPlan
andwillupdate theplanwithDOES.
ThispagetobecompletedbyEmployer

*:ll * + *
GOVERNMENTOFTHE DISTRICTOF COLUMBIA
REVISED EMPLOYMENT PLAN
D. EMPLOYMENTPROJECTIONS.
Provideatimetable outliningthe totalhoursworkedbytradeoverthelifeofthe project or
contractandanassociatedhiringschedule.
The First Sourceemploymentplan will be implemented bythe general contractorand its sub-
contractors onceconstruction commences. Thegeneral contractorhas not yet been selected and
is notundercontractatthis time. Upon contract execution, theselected general contractorwill
submita timetable outliningthetotal hoursworked by trade overthe life ofthe projectand an
‘associated hiring schedule. The developerwill require thatthe selected general contractoruse
goodfaith efforts toensure atleast 30%ofnew jobs performed by Ward 1 DC r es idents.
Provide descriptionsoftheskill requirementsbyjob titleorposition, including industry-
recognizedcertificationsrequiredforthedifferentpositions,
The general contractor hasnotyetbeen selectedand is not undercontractatthistime.
Upon contractexecution, the selected generalcontractorwill submitdescriptionsofthe
skill requirements byjob title or position.
Provide a strategy to fill the hours required to be worked by District residents, including a
component on communicating these requirements to contractors and subcontractors and a
component on potential community outreach partnerships with the Universityofthe District
ofColumbia, the University ofthe District ofColumbia Community College, the Department
of Employment Services, Jointly Funded Apprenticeship Programs, the District ofColumbia
Workforce Intermediary, or other government-approved, community-based job training
providers.
The general contractorhas notyet been selected and is notunder contractatthistime. First Source
District residentsworkrequirementswill be included in all bid and subcontractdocuments. Upon
contractexecution, the strategy tofill hours required by Districtresidentswill be provided.
‘Thispageto becompletedby Employer SGD
EmployerInitials

+ :ll * * +
GOVERNMENTOFTHEDISTRICTOFCOLUMBIA
REVISED EMPLOYMENTPLAN
D.EMPLOYMENTPROJECTIONS(Continued)
‘A remediation strategy to ameliorate any problems associated with meeting these worked
hours percentage requirements, including any problems encountered with contractors and
subcontractors.
‘Thegeneralcontractorhas notyetbeen selectedandisnotundercontract atthistime.Aremediation
strategytoameliorateanyproblemsassociatedwithmeetingworkedhourspercentagerequirements
will beprovided uponexecutionofthecontract.
‘The designation ofa senior official from the general contractor who will be responsible for
implementingthehoursworkedpercentagesandreportingrequirements.
‘Thegeneralcontractorisnotyetundercontract.Thegeneralcontractorwill designateaseniorFirst
‘Sourcecomplianceofficialuponexecutionoftheconract.
ve Provide descriptionsofthe health and retirement benefits that will be provided to District
residentsworkingon theproojrceontcractt.
‘The general contractorhasnotyatbeenselectedand isnotundercontract. Uponexecutionofthe
contractthe requestedinformationwillbeprovided.
Provide a strategy to ensure that District residents who work on the project or contract
vu.
receive ongoing employmentandtrainingopportunities afterthey completeworkon thejob
for which they were initially hired anda reviewofpast practices in continuing to employ
Districtresidentsfromoneprojectorconttorthaecnextt.
‘Thegeneral contractorhasnotyetbeen selectedandisnotundercontract. Uponexecution ofthe
contracttherequested informationwillbeprovided.
‘S60
‘This page to be compblyeEmtploeyedr
EmployerInitials

. + | r a
— GOVERNMENTOFTHE DISTRICTOFCOLUMBIA
REVISED EMPLOYMENT PLAN
Vill, Providea strategy to hire graduates of District of Columbia Public Schools, District of
Columbia Public Charter Schools, community-based job training providers, and hard-to-
employresidents.
‘Thegeneralcontractorhasnotyetbeenselectedandisnotundercontract.Thedeveloperwillensurethatthe
selectedgeneralcontractorwillpartnerwithworkforcedevelopmentorganizationsandfocusonunemployed
and underemployedDCresidentsincluding,goodfaitheffortstoprovide initiativessuch as
=Paid summerinternshipsfor12-15areayouthandyoungadults18andolder
~Apprenticeshipsfor50low-incomeresidentswithin 1 mileofReevesCenter; 100apprenticeshipswithin5miles
-Non-traditionalcareersinconstructionfor25homelesswomen
-Tradecraftsmanshiptrainingandemploymentfor50-75returningcitizens
IX. Please disclose pastcompliance with the First Source EmploymentAgreementAct of1984 or
the Workforce Intermediary Establishment and Reform of First Source Amendment Act of
2011 and the Davis-Bacon Act, whereapplicable, and the bidder or offeror's general District-
residenthiringpracticesonprojectsorcontractscompletedwithinthelasttwo (2) years.
Reeves CMC Venture LLC is a project-specificentity with no employees and no construction projects completed in
thelasttwo years. The general contractorisnotyet selected and is notundercontract atthistime. Upon execution
ofthecontract, therequested informationwill beprovided bythegeneralcontractor.
X. Please note that EMPLOYERS onconstruction projects mustsubmit weekly certified payrolls
from all subcontractors at any tier working on the project or contract, as well as make such
payroll and personnel records available upon request atjob sites to thecontracting District of
Columbiaagency.
The developeracknowiedgesthatthe generalcontractorand all subcontractors mustsubmitweeklycertified
payrollsas wellas make such payroll and personnel recordsavailable uponrequestatjobsites.
‘This page tobe completedby Employer SGD
Employer Initia

— GOVERNMOFETNHTE DISTRICTOFCOLUMBIA ed
REVISED EMPLOYMENTPLAN
Once approved,thisrevised employmentplanshallnot beamendedexceptwiththe approvalof Department
ofEmploymentServices.
"ZoneGongDeveney
7/23/2026
EMPLOYERSeniorOfficial(Print) Date
S42 my Oe Be TDAy
EMPLOYERSeniorOfficial(Signature)
ReCaMCvVenteuresLLC
NameofCompany
1528FerdaAvenue,NW,SecondFlor
4 fo Donel fi ‘faq|toab
SignatureDepartmentofEmployment Services Date

EXHIBIT H-1
DEVELOPMENT PLAN
Overall Project Development Plan
The Project will consist of separate development on Office Parcel and separate
development on Residential Parcel. Residential Parcel may be developed pursuant to either
option A or option B.
The Project in total (under option A) will consist of approximately 322 Residential Units
(including 97 Affordable Units), approximately 150-key hotel, approximately 100,000 square
feet of office space, approximately 30,000 square feet of leasable arts and cultural space,
approximately 40,000 square feet of leasable retail space, approximately 362 parking
spaces and approximately18,653 square feet of outdoor plaza space.
The Project in total (under option B) will consist of approximately 285 Residential Units
(including 86 Affordable Units), approximately 150-key hotel, approximately 100,000 square
feet of office space, approximately 30,000 square feet of leasable arts and cultural space,
approximately 40,000 square feet of leasable retail space, approximately 362 parking
spaces and approximately 18,653 square feet of outdoor plaza space.
Office Parcel Development Plan
Office Parcel will consist of one mixed-use commercial building with approximately 150-key
hotel, approximately 100,000 square feet of office space, approximately 30,000 square feet
of leasable arts and cultural space, approximately 108 parking spaces and approximately
8,477 square feet of outdoor plaza space. Office Component will be anchored by the
NAACP, which will own and occupy approximately 50,000 square feet of office space as its
national headquarters. In addition, the Office Component will include approximately 50,000
square feet of office space to be leased by the District for municipal purposes or lease or
purchased by a quasi-government District agency.
OPTION A - Residential Parcel Development Plan
(PUD option with Air Rights Lot 7000)
Option A will consist of one mixed-use residential building with approximately 322
Residential Units (including 97 Affordable Units), approximately 40,000 square feet of
leasable retail space, approximately 254 parking spaces and approximately 10,176 square
feet of outdoor plaza space on the Residential Parcel. Option A development envisions that
Developer will acquire the leasehold interest in the Air Rights Parcel (Geno Baroni
Apartments). Upon acquisition, Air Rights Lot 7000 density will be included as part of the
proposed development plan and PUD application.
1

OPTION B - Residential Parcel Development Plan
(PUD option without Air Rights Lot 7000)
Option B will consist of one mixed-use residential building with approximately 285
Residential Units (including 86 Affordable Units), approximately 40,000 square feet of
leasable retail space, approximately 254 parking spaces and approximately 10,176 square
feet of outdoor plaza space on the Residential Parcel. Option B envisions that Developer will
not acquire the leasehold interest in the Air Rights Parcel (Geno Baroni Apartments). Air
Rights Lot 7000 density will not be included as part of the proposed development plan and
PUD application.
2

EXHIBIT J
Form Letter of Credit
ISSUER: Date of Issue: [Month, day, and year of issue]
[Name of bank]
[Bank address]
IRREVOCABLE STANDBY LETTER OF CREDIT
NO. [Letter of Credit number] Beneficiary Applicant
District of Columbia, by and through [Name of developer]
The Office of Deputy Mayor for [Address of developer]
Planning and Economic Development
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW. Suite 317
Washington D.C. 20004
Attention: Deputy Mayor for Planning
and Economic Development
AMOUNT: $[Letter of Credit amount]
EXPIRY DATE: [Letter of Credit month, day, and year of expiration] subject to renewal provisions
herein
PROJECT: Reeves
Ladies and Gentlemen:
We hereby establish our Irrevocable Standby Letter of Credit [Letter of Credit number] (“Letter of
Credit”) in favor of Beneficiary for the account of Applicant up to an aggregate amount of U.S.
DOLLARS (U.S. $ [Letter of Credit amount]) available for payment when accompanied by the
following three items:
1. A draft at sight drawn on [Name of bank] duly endorsed on its reverse thereof by a duly
authorized representative of the Beneficiary, specifically referencing this Letter of Credit [Letter
of Credit number];
2. The original of this Letter of Credit; and
3. A dated statement issued on the letterhead of Beneficiary, stating: “The amount of this drawing
is $________________ ,
drawn under Letter of Credit [Letter of Credit Number] and represents funds due and owing to
the District of Columbia.” Such statement shall be conclusive as to such matters and Issuer will
accept such statement as binding and correct. Issuer shall have no right, duty, obligation, or
responsibility to evaluate the performance or nonperformance of any underlying agreement
between Applicant and Beneficiary before performing under the terms of this Letter of Credit.
This Letter of Credit shall automatically renew for consecutive one (1) year terms upon the anniversary
of the expiry date (The “Anniversary Date”) until a date that is five (5) years after the Date of Issue set
forth above unless (i) earlier released by Beneficiary in writing or (ii) Issuer delivers written notice to

both Applicant and Beneficiary that this Letter of Credit will not be renewed on the Anniversary Date
upon which this Letter of Credit will no longer be renewed.
If a drawing made by Beneficiary under this Letter of Credit reaches the address provided on this Letter
of Credit via courier (FEDEX or DHL) on or prior to 1:00 PM (Eastern Time) on a Business Day (as
defined below) and, provided that such drawing and the statement presented in connection therewith
conform to the terms and conditions hereof, payments shall be made to Beneficiary in the amount specified,
in immediately available funds, on the same Business Day. If a drawing is made by Beneficiary under
this Letter of Credit after 1:00 PM (Eastern Time) on a Business Day and, provided that such drawing
and the statement presented in connection therewith conform to the terms and conditions hereof,
payments shall be made to Beneficiary in the amount specified, in immediately available funds on the
next Business Day. If requested by Beneficiary, payment under this Letter of Credit may be a deposit of
immediately available funds into an account designated by Beneficiary. As used herein, the term
“Business Day” shall mean any day other than a Saturday, Sunday, or a day on which banking
institutions in the District of Columbia are authorized or required by law to close.
Drafts drawn under and in compliance with the terms of this Letter of Credit will be duly honored if
presented by the Mayor, City Administrator, Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development,
or one of their duly authorized representatives, on or before the Expiry Date to Issuer’s office at the
address of Issuer set forth above.
This undertaking is issued subject to the International Standby Practices 1998 (“ISP98’). As to matters
not expressly governed by ISP98, this Letter of Credit is governed by and shall be construed in
accordance with the laws of the District of Columbia.
This Letter of Credit set forth in full terms of our undertaking. This undertaking shall not in any way be
modified, amended, amplified, or incorporated by reference to any document, contract, or other
agreement, without the express written authorization of Issuer, Beneficiary, and Applicant.
Should you have occasion to communicate with us regarding the Letter of Credit, kindly direct your
communication to the attention of Letters of Credit Dept. to the address aforementioned stating as
reference our Standby Letter of Credit No. [Insert Letter of Credit Number].
Truly Yours,
_______________________________ ________________________________
Authorized Signature Name (printed)

Exhibit K- Schedule of Performance
Office Parcel
Milestone Target Dates Outside Date
Office Parcel Office Parcel Office Parcel
Submission of Schematic Drawings for District
5/31/2027 8/31/2027
approval
Developer to execute LOI or PSA with the Air Right
9/30/2027 12/31/2027
Parcel Lessee
Developer to elect between Option A and Option B on
9/30/2027 12/31/2027
the Residential Parcel
Submission of Design Development Plans for District
10/31/2027 1/31/2028
approval
Submission of application to Zoning Commission for
N/A N/A
design review
Zoning Order issued N/A N/A
Submission of Permit Set Drawings for District
1/31/2028 4/30/2028
approval
Submission of Construction Drawings for District
6/30/2028 9/30/2028
approval
Submission of Final Project Budget and Final Project
9/30/2028 12/31/2028
Funding Plan for District approval
Issuance of Demolition Permit 11/30/2028 2/28/2029
Issuance of Building Permit 11/30/2028 2/28/2029
Closing 12/31/2028 3/31/2029
Expiration of Council
Outside Closing Date N/A
Disposition Authority
Commencement of Reeves Center Bldg. demolition 1/31/2029 4/30/2029
Completion of Reeves Center Bldg. demolition 5/31/2029 8/31/2029
Commencement of Construction 6/30/2029 9/30/2029
Topping Out 9/30/2030 12/31/2030
Substantial Completion 9/30/2031 12/31/2031

Final Completion 12/31/2031 3/31/2032

Residential Parcel
Option A
Milestone Target Dates Outside Date
Residential Parcel – Option A Residential Parcel Residential Parcel
Developer to execute LOI or PSA with the
Air Right Parcel Lessee 9/30/2027 12/31/2027
Developer to elect between Option A and
Option B on the Residential Parcel 9/30/2027 12/31/2027
Submission of Schematic Drawings for
District approval 10/31/2027 1/31/2028
Submission of Design Development
Plans for District approval 11/30/2027 2/29/2028
Submission of application to Zoning
Commission for design review 11/30/2027 2/29/2028
Zoning Order issued 5/31/2029 8/31/2029
Submission of Permit Set Drawings for
District Approval 6/30/2029 9/30/2029
Submission of Construction Drawings
for District approval 7/31/2029 10/31/2029
Submission of Final Project Budget and
Final Project Funding Plan for District
approval 7/31/2029 10/31/2029
Issuance of Demolition Permit 8/31/2029 11/30/2029
Issuance of Building Permit 8/31/2029 11/30/2029
Closing 9/30/2029 12/31/2029
N/A
Expiration of Council
Outside Closing Date
Disposition Authority
Commencement of Geno Baroni Bldg.
demolition 10/31/2029 1/31/2030
Completion of Geno Baroni Bldg.
demolition 2/28/2030 5/31/2030
Commencement of Construction 3/31/2030 6/30/2030

Topping Out 6/30/2031 9/30/2031
Substantial Completion 6/30/2032 9/30/2032
Final Completion 9/30/2032 12/31/2032

Residential Parcel
Option B
Milestone Target Dates Outside Date
Residential Parcel – Option B Residential Parcel Residential Parcel
Developer to execute LOI or PSA with the
9/30/2027 12/31/2027
Air Right Parcel Lessee
Developer to elect between Option A and
9/30/2027 12/31/2027
Option B on the Residential Parcel
Submission of Schematic Drawings for
10/31/2027 1/31/2028
District approval
Submission of Design Development
11/30/2027 2/29/2028
Plans for District approval
Submission of application to Zoning
11/30/2027 2/29/2028
Commission for design review
Zoning Order issued 5/31/2029 8/31/2029
Submission of Permit Set Drawings for
6/30/2029 9/30/2029
District Approval
Submission of Construction Drawings for
7/31/2029 10/31/2029
District approval
Submission of Final Project Budget and
Final Project Funding Plan for District 7/31/2029 10/31/2029
approval
Issuance of Demolition Permit N/A N/A
Issuance of Building Permit
8/31/2029 11/30/2029
Closing
9/30/2029 12/31/2029
Expiration of Council
Outside Closing Date N/A
Disposition Authority
Commencement of Geno Baroni Bldg.
N/A N/A
demolition
Completion of Geno Baroni Bldg.
N/A N/A
demolition
Commencement of Construction
10/31/2029 1/31/2030
Topping Out 1/31/2031 4/30/2031
Substantial Completion
1/31/2032 4/30/2032
Final Completion
4/30/2032 7/31/2032

EXHIBIT N
PROJECT FUNDING PLAN
Office Parcel Project Funding Plan
NOTE: Project Budget and Project Funding Plan subject to review and approval by the applicable District of
Columbia agencies or instrumentalities for any costs associated with this Project that anticipate District sources of
funding, including without limitation, any grants, tax increment financing or subsidies for construction and operation
of affordable housing, Federal tax credits, or a tax exemption pursuant to D.C. Official Code § 47-1005.02.
Notwithstanding the fact that District has approved the Project Budget and the Project Funding Plan, the District is
not obligated to provide funds from a District of Columbia government source proposed by Developer which are
subject to availability and approval of the funding by the applicable District of Columbia agency.
Developer is seeking $27.5M in net tax increment financing to assist with gap funding for the Project.
1

OPTION A - Residential Parcel Project Budget
(PUD option with Air Rights Lot 7000)
NOTE: Project Budget and Project Funding Plan subject to review and approval by the applicable District of
Columbia agencies or instrumentalities for any costs associated with this Project that anticipate District sources of
funding, including without limitation, any grants, tax increment financing or subsidies for construction and operation
of affordable housing, Federal tax credits, or a tax exemption pursuant to D.C. Official Code § 47-1005.02.
Notwithstanding the fact that District has approved the Project Budget and the Project Funding Plan, the District is
not obligated to provide funds from a District of Columbia government source proposed by Developer which are
subject to availability and approval of the funding by the applicable District of Columbia agency.
Developer acknowledge and agree that the Option A – Residential Parcel Project Funding Plan attached hereto for
the Residential Component are speculative and based on 2026 market conditions. Developer acknowledges and agrees
that for any costs associated with the Residential Component that anticipates District sources of funding or subsidy,
does not create an obligation or commitment by District to approve or provide such funding or subsidy.
Developer is seeking $36M in net tax increment financing, $26.59M in low-income housing tax credit (Federal and
DC allocations), $10M in tax exempt bonds from DCHFA and $12.6M in housing production trust fund (HPTF) to
assist with gap funding for the Project.
2

OPTION B - Residential Parcel Project Budget
(PUD option without Air Rights Lot 7000)
NOTE: Project Budget and Project Funding Plan subject to review and approval by the applicable District of
Columbia agencies or instrumentalities for any costs associated with this Project that anticipate District sources of
funding, including without limitation, any grants, tax increment financing or subsidies for construction and operation
of affordable housing, Federal tax credits, or a tax exemption pursuant to D.C. Official Code § 47-1005.02.
Notwithstanding the fact that District has approved the Project Budget and the Project Funding Plan, the District is
not obligated to provide funds from a District of Columbia government source proposed by Developer which are
subject to availability and approval of the funding by the applicable District of Columbia agency.
Developer acknowledge and agree that the Option B – Residential Parcel Project Funding Plan attached hereto for
the Residential Component are speculative and based on 2026 market conditions. Developer acknowledges and agrees
that for any costs associated with the Residential Component that anticipates District sources of funding or subsidy,
does not create an obligation or commitment by District to approve or provide such funding or subsidy.
Developer is seeking $25.5M in net tax increment financing, $22.22M in low-income housing tax credit (Federal and
DC allocations), $10M in tax exempt bonds from DCHFA and $12.6M in housing production trust fund (HPTF) to
assist with gap funding for the Project.
3

EXHIBIT O - PROJECT BUDGET
Office Parcel Project Budget
Itemized Costs Total $/gsf $/FAR $/rsf
Transaction Costs
Geno Baroni Purchase Price $ - $ - $ - $ -
Acquisition Fees $ - $ - $ - $ -
Equity placement Fee $ - $ - $ - $ -
Title Expenses $ 504,781 $ 1.72 $ 2.38 $ 2.00
Recordation Tax $ 1,304,423 $ 4.45 $ 6.15 $ 5.17
Lot Subdivision Costs $ 190,795 $ 0.65 $ 0.90 $ 0.76
Total Transaction Costs $ 2,000,000 $ 6.83 $ 9.43 $ 7.93
Hard Costs
Hard Construction Costs
Demolition $ - $ - $ - $ -
Substructure $ 3,999,680 $ 13.66 $ 18.87 $ 15.85
Shell & Core $ 36,019,980 $ 1 23.00 $ 1 69.91 $ 1 42.73
Fit Out $ 28,000,000 $ 95.61 $ 1 32.08 $ 1 10.95
Services $ 15,075,606 $ 51.48 $ 71.11 $ 59.74
Equipment & Furnishings $ 1,474,840 $ 5.04 $ 6.96 $ 5.84
Special Construction $ - $ - $ - $ -
Building Sitework $ - $ - $ - $ -
Design & Estimating Contingency $ 8,457,011 $ 28.88 $ 39.89 $ 33.51
Construction Management Costs $ 18,605,423 $ 63.53 $ 87.76 $ 73.73
Audiovisual $ 656,000 $ 2.24 $ 3.09 $ 2.60
Security $ 458,000 $ 1.56 $ 2.16 $ 1.81
FF&E $ 3,280,000 $ 11.20 $ 15.47 $ 13.00
Branding & Signage $ 681,080 $ 2.33 $ 3.21 $ 2.70
Total Construction Costs $ 1 16,707,620 $ 3 98.53 $ 5 50.51 $ 4 62.47
Other Hard Costs
LEED Premium $ - $ - $ - $ -
Environmental/Soil $ - $ - $ - $ -
Builder's Risk $ - $ - $ - $ -
Payment & Performance Bonds $ - $ - $ - $ -
FF&E & Owner Items $ - $ - $ - $ -
Contingency - Insurance, Bond & Fees $ - $ - $ - $ -
Developer Hard Cost Contingency $ - $ - $ - $ -
HC Escalations $ 18,396,039 $ 62.82 $ 86.77 $ 72.90
Total Other Hard Costs $ 18,396,039 $ 62.82 $ 86.77 $ 72.90
Total Hard Costs $ 1 35,103,659 $ 4 61.35 $ 6 37.28 $ 5 35.37
Soft Costs
Professional Fees (A&E)
Architects $ 1,867,322 $ 6.38 $ 8.81 $ 7.40
Structural Engineers $ 1,867,322 $ 6.38 $ 8.81 $ 7.40
MEP Engineers $ 1,120,393 $ 3.83 $ 5.28 $ 4.44
Façade Engineers $ 933,661 $ 3.19 $ 4.40 $ 3.70
Project & Cost Management $ 1,120,393 $ 3.83 $ 5.28 $ 4.44
Other & Owner Consultants $ 466,830 $ 1.59 $ 2.20 $ 1.85
Zoning Consultant $ 186,732 $ 0.64 $ 0.88 $ 0.74
Civil & Geotechnical Consultant $ 466,830 $ 1.59 $ 2.20 $ 1.85
AV/IT Consultant $ 9 3,366 $ 0.32 $ 0.44 $ 0.37
Surveyor $ 9 3,366 $ 0.32 $ 0.44 $ 0.37
Lighting Consultant $ 9 3,366 $ 0.32 $ 0.44 $ 0.37
Special Inspector $ 9 3,366 $ 0.32 $ 0.44 $ 0.37
Landscape Architect $ 653,563 $ 2.23 $ 3.08 $ 2.59
Expeditor $ 9 3,366 $ 0.32 $ 0.44 $ 0.37
Lobbysit $ 186,732 $ 0.64 $ 0.88 $ 0.74
Total Professional Fees $ 9,336,610 $ 31.88 $ 44.04 $ 37.00
Other Soft Costs
Final Clean $ - $ - $ - $ -
Landlord Charges $ - $ - $ - $ -
Move Costs $ - $ - $ - $ -
Filing Fees $ 1,400,491 $ 4.78 $ 6.61 $ 5.55
Planning, Permitting, Testing, Inspection$ 2,334,152 $ 7.97 $ 11.01 $ 9.25
Design Team Expenses $ - $ - $ - $ -
Other Owner Costs $ - $ - $ - $ -
Soft Cost Contingency $ - $ - $ - $ -
SC Escalations $ 1,471,683 $ 5.03 $ 6.94 $ 5.83
Total Other Soft Costs $ 5,206,327 $ 17.78 $ 24.56 $ 20.63

Itemized Costs Total $/gsf $/FAR $/rsf
Commercial TI & Leasing
Retail Tenant Improvements $ - $ - $ - $ -
Retail Leasing Commissions $ - $ - $ - $ -
Arts Tenant Improvemetns $ 2,900,000 $ 9.90 $ 13.68 $ 11.49
Arts Leasing Commissions $ - $ - $ - $ -
Office Tenant Improvements $ 12,615,000 $ 43.08 $ 59.50 $ 49.99
Office Brokerage Commissions $ 2,610,000 $ 8.91 $ 12.31 $ 10.34
Retail Consultant $ - $ - $ - $ -
Retail Leasing Legal $ - $ - $ - $ -
Arts Consultant $ 100,000 $ 0.34 $ 0.47 $ 0.40
Arts Leasing Legal $ - $ - $ - $ -
Office Leasing Legal $ 7 8,300 $ 0.27 $ 0.37 $ 0.31
Total TI and Leasing $ 18,303,300 $ 62.50 $ 86.34 $ 72.53
Fees, Bonds & Permits
Total Fees, Bonds & Permits $ - $ - $ - $ -
Utilities
Total Utilities $ - $ - $ - $ -
Inspections & Testing
Total Inspections & Testing $ - $ - $ - $ -
Marketing
Total Marketing $ - $ - $ - $ -
Expenses During Construction
Resi Real Estate Tax Allocation $ - $ - $ - $ -
Hotel Real Estate Tax Allocation $ 1,386,661 $ 4.74 $ 6.54 $ 5.49
Office Real Estate Tax Allocation $ 1,518,775 $ 5.19 $ 7.16 $ 6.02
Retail Real Estate Tax Allocation $ - $ - $ - $ -
Arts Real Estate Tax Allocation $ 306,618 $ 1.05 $ 1.45 $ 1.22
Condo Expenses $ - $ - $ - $ -
Predevelopemnt Loan Interest $ - $ - $ - $ -
Finance Consultant $ - $ - $ - $ -
Equity Placement Fee $ 563,091 $ 1.92 $ 2.66 $ 2.23
Zoning Legal $ 146,421 $ 0.50 $ 0.69 $ 0.58
Legal $ 219,631 $ 0.75 $ 1.04 $ 0.87
Owner Construction Management $ 2,026,555 $ 6.92 $ 9.56 $ 8.03
Construction Auditing $ 5 8,568 $ 0.20 $ 0.28 $ 0.23
Project Accounting $ 146,421 $ 0.50 $ 0.69 $ 0.58
General Liability $ 7 9,067 $ 0.27 $ 0.37 $ 0.31
Environmental Insurance $ 117,137 $ 0.40 $ 0.55 $ 0.46
Transfer Costs (CONDO Sale) $ - $ - $ - $ -
Lender Admin Fee $ 5 8,568 $ 0.20 $ 0.28 $ 0.23
Miscellaneous $ 7 3,210 $ 0.25 $ 0.35 $ 0.29
Total Expenses During Construction $ 6,700,724 $ 22.88 $ 31.61 $ 26.55
Development Fee
Development Fee $ 7,029,687 $ 24.01 $ 33.16 $ 27.86
Pre-Development Fee $ - $ - $ - $ -
Soft Cost Contingency $ - $ - $ - $ -
Office TI Construction Management Fee$ - $ - $ - $ -
Retail TI Construciton Management Fee $ - $ - $ - $ -
Arts TI Construciton Management Fee $ - $ - $ - $ -
Total Development Fees $ 7,029,687 $ 24.01 $ 33.16 $ 27.86
Total Soft Costs $ 46,576,647 $ 159 $ 220 $ 1 84.57
20.93%
Carry Costs
Finacing Fees
Lender Financing Fee $ 1,108,091 $ 3.78 $ 5.23 $ 4.39
Mortgage Recordation Costs $ 2,216,182 $ 7.57 $ 10.45 $ 8.78
Broker Origination Fee $ 664,855 $ 2.27 $ 3.14 $ 2.63
Title Expenses $ 221,618 $ 1 $ 1 $ 0.88
Guaranty Fee $ 563,091 $ 1.92 $ 2.66 $ 2.23
Lender Expenses $ 358,541 $ 1.22 $ 1.69 $ 1.42
Financing Legal $ 409,762 $ 1.40 $ 1.93 $ 1.62
Total Contruction loan Financing Fees $ 5,542,141 $ 18.93 $ 26.14 $ 21.96
Other Carry Costs
Operating Losses During Lease Up $ - $ - $ - $ -
Capitalized Interest $ 12,395,790 $ 42 $ 58 $ 49.12
Total Other Carry Costs $ 12,395,790 $ 42 $ 58 $ 49.12
Total Development Costs $ 2 01,618,237 $ 688 $ 951 $ 799
NOTE: Project Budget and Project Funding Plan subject to review and approval by the applicable District of Columbia agencies or instrumentalities for any
costs associated with this Project that anticipate District sources of funding, including without limitation, any grants, tax increment financing or subsidies for
construction and operation of affordable housing, Federal tax credits, or a tax exemption pursuant to D.C. Official Code § 47-1005.02. Notwithstanding the
fact that District has approved the Project Budget and the Project Funding Plan, the District is not obligated to provide funds from a District of Columbia
government source proposed by Developer which are subject to availability and approval of the funding by the applicable District of Columbia agency.
Fees, Bonds & Permits, Utilities, Inspections & Testing, and Marketing are shown as discrete line items in the master budget, but these costs are captured
within the Soft Costs and Other Soft Costs line items.

OPTION A - Residential Parcel Project Budget
(PUD option with Air Rights Lot 7000)
Itemized Costs Total $/gsf $/FAR $/rsf
Acquisition Costs
Geno Baroni Purchase Price $ 1 0,000,000 $ 24.53 $ 29.41 $ 36.23
Transfer and Recordation Costs $ - $ - $ - $ -
Equity placement Fee $ - $ - $ - $ -
Title Expenses $ - $ - $ - $ -
Acquisition Related Contingency $ 3,000,000 $ 7.36 $ 8.82 $ 10.87
Transaction Costs $ - $ - $ - $ -
Total Acquisition Costs $ 13,000,000 $ 31.89 $ 38.24 $ 47.10
Hard Costs
Construction
Demolition $ - $ - $ - $ -
Substructure $ 1 8,000,000 $ 44.15 $ 52.94 $ 65.22
Shell & Core $ 4 6,900,000 $ 1 15.03 $ 1 37.94 $ 1 69.93
Fit Out $ 3 7,600,000 $ 92.22 $ 1 10.59 $ 1 36.23
Services $ 2 1,200,000 $ 52.00 $ 62.35 $ 76.81
Equipment & Furnishings $ - $ - $ - $ -
Special Construction $ 999,000 $ 2.45 $ 2.94 $ 3.62
Building Sitework $ - $ - $ - $ -
Design & Estimating Contingency $ 1 2,469,900 $ 30.59 $ 36.68 $ 45.18
Construction Management Costs $ 2 7,433,780 $ 67.29 $ 80.69 $ 99.40
Audiovisual $ 99,000 $ 0.24 $ 0.29 $ 0.36
Security $ 300,000 $ 0.74 $ 0.88 $ 1.09
FF&E $ 201,000 $ 0.49 $ 0.59 $ 0.73
Branding & Signage $ 1,240,000 $ 3.04 $ 3.65 $ 4.49
Total Construction Costs $ 166,442,680 $ 408.24 $ 489.54 $ 603.05
Other Hard Costs
Total Other Hard Costs $ - $ - $ - $ -
Total Hard Costs $ 166,442,680 $ 408.24 $ 489.54 $ 603.05
Soft Costs
Professional Fees (A&E)
Architects $ 2,663,083 $ 6.53 $ 7.83 $ 9.65
Structural Engineers $ 2,663,083 $ 6.53 $ 7.83 $ 9.65
MEP Engineers $ 1,597,850 $ 3.92 $ 4.70 $ 5.79
Façade Engineers $ 1,331,541 $ 3.27 $ 3.92 $ 4.82
Project & Cost Management $ 1,597,850 $ 3.92 $ 4.70 $ 5.79
Other & Owner Consultants $ 665,771 $ 1.63 $ 1.96 $ 2.41
Zoning Consultant $ 266,308 $ 0.65 $ 0.78 $ 0.96
Civil & Geotechnical Consultant $ 665,771 $ 1.63 $ 1.96 $ 2.41
AV/IT Consultant $ 133,154 $ 0.33 $ 0.39 $ 0.48
Surveyor $ 133,154 $ 0.33 $ 0.39 $ 0.48
Lighting Consultant $ 133,154 $ 0.33 $ 0.39 $ 0.48
Special Inspector $ 133,154 $ 0.33 $ 0.39 $ 0.48
Landscape Architect $ 932,079 $ 2.29 $ 2.74 $ 3.38
Expeditor $ 133,154 $ 0.33 $ 0.39 $ 0.48
Lobbysit $ 266,308 $ 0.65 $ 0.78 $ 0.96
Total Professional Fees $ 13,315,414 $ 32.66 $ 39.16 $ 48.24
Other Soft Costs
Final Clean $ - $ - $ - $ -
Landlord Charges $ - $ - $ - $ -
Move Costs $ - $ - $ - $ -
Filing Fees $ 1,997,312 $ 4.90 $ 5.87 $ 7.24
Planning, Permitting, Testing, Inspection $ 3,328,854 $ 8.16 $ 9.79 $ 12.06
Design Team Expenses $ - $ - $ - $ -
Other Owner Costs $ - $ - $ - $ -
Soft Cost Contingency $ - $ - $ - $ -
SC Escalations $ - $ - $ - $ -
Total Other Soft Costs $ 5,326,166 $ 13.06 $ 15.67 $ 19.30

Itemized Costs Total $/gsf $/FAR $/rsf
Commercial TI & Leasing
Retail Tenant Improvements $ 3,900,000 $ 9 .57 $ 11.47 $ 14.13
Retail Leasing Commissions $ - $ - $ - $ -
Arts Tenant Improvemetns $ - $ - $ - $ -
Arts Leasing Commissions $ - $ - $ - $ -
Office Tenant Improvements $ - $ - $ - $ -
Office Brokerage Commissions $ - $ - $ - $ -
Retail Consultant $ - $ - $ - $ -
Retail Leasing Legal $ 100,000 $ 0 .25 $ 0 .29 $ 0 .36
Arts Consultant $ - $ - $ - $ -
Arts Leasing Legal $ - $ - $ - $ -
Office Leasing Legal $ - $ - $ - $ -
Total TI and Leasing $ 4,000,000 $ 9 .81 $ 11.76 $ 14.49
Fees, Bonds & Permits
Total Fees, Bonds & Permits $ - $ - $ - $ -
Utilities
Total Utilities $ - $ - $ - $ -
Inpections & Testing
Total Inspections & Testing $ - $ - $ - $ -
Marketing
Total Marketing $ - $ - $ - $ -
Expenses During Construction
Resi Real Estate Tax Allocation $ 1,545,572 $ 3 .79 $ 4 .55 $ 5 .60
Hotel Real Estate Tax Allocation $ - $ - $ - $ -
Office Real Estate Tax Allocation $ - $ - $ - $ -
Retail Real Estate Tax Allocation $ 382,768 $ 0 .94 $ 1 .13 $ 1 .39
Arts Real Estate Tax Allocation $ - $ - $ - $ -
Condo Expenses $ 300,000 $ 0 .74 $ 0 .88 $ 1 .09
Predevelopemnt Loan Interest $ - $ - $ - $ -
Finance Consultant $ - $ - $ - $ -
Equity Placement Fee $ 563,091 $ 1 .38 $ 1 .66 $ 2 .04
Zoning Legal $ 203,855 $ 0 .50 $ 0 .60 $ 0 .74
Legal $ 305,783 $ 0 .75 $ 0 .90 $ 1 .11
Owner Construction Management $ 2,496,640 $ 6 .12 $ 7 .34 $ 9 .05
Construction Auditing $ 8 1,542 $ 0 .20 $ 0 .24 $ 0 .30
Project Accounitng $ 203,855 $ 0 .50 $ 0 .60 $ 0 .74
General Liability $ 110,082 $ 0 .27 $ 0 .32 $ 0 .40
Environmental Insurance $ 163,084 $ 0 .40 $ 0 .48 $ 0 .59
Transfer Costs (CONDO Sale) $ 750,000 $ 1 .84 $ 2 .21 $ 2 .72
Lender Admin Fee $ 8 1,542 $ 0 .20 $ 0 .24 $ 0 .30
Miscellaneous $ 101,928 $ 0 .25 $ 0 .30 $ 0 .37
Total Expenses During Construction $ 7,289,742 $ 17.88 $ 21.44 $ 26.41
Development Fee
Development Fee $ 7,904,054 $ 19.39 $ 23.25 $ 28.64
Pre-Development Fee $ - $ - $ - $ -
Soft Cost Contingency $ - $ - $ - $ -
Office TI Construction Management Fee $ - $ - $ - $ -
Retail TI Construciton Management Fee $ - $ - $ - $ -
Arts TI Construciton Management Fee $ - $ - $ - $ -
Total Development Fee $ 7,904,054 $ 19.39 $ 23.25 $ 28.64
Total Soft Costs $ 37,835,375 $ 9 3 $ 111 $ 137.08
Carry Costs
Financing Fees
Lender Financing Fee $ 912,501 $ 2 .24 $ 2 .68 $ 3 .31
Mortgage Recordation Costs $ 2,677,003 $ 6 .57 $ 7 .87 $ 9 .70
Broker Origination Fee $ 803,101 $ 1 .97 $ 2 .36 $ 2 .91
Title Expenses $ 267,700 $ 1 $ 1 $ 0 .97
Guaranty Fee $ 375,615 $ 0 .92 $ 1 .10 $ 1 .36
Lender Expenses $ 499,181 $ 1 .22 $ 1 .47 $ 1 .81
Financing Legal $ 570,492 $ 1 .40 $ 1 .68 $ 2 .07
Total Contruction Loan Financing Fees $ 6,105,592 $ 14.98 $ 17.96 $ 22.12
Other Carry Costs
Operating Losses During Lease Up $ 629,910 $ 2 $ 2 $ 2 .28
Capitalized Interest $ 2 2,994,536 $ 5 6 $ 6 8 $ 83.31
Total Other Carry Costs $ 23,624,446 $ 5 8 $ 6 9 $ 85.60
Total Development Costs $ 247,008,093 $ 606 $ 726 $ 894.96
NOTE: Project Budget and Project Funding Plan subject to review and approval by the applicable District of Columbia agencies or instrumentalities for any
costs associated with this Project that anticipate District sources of funding, including without limitation, any grants, tax increment financing or subsidies for
construction and operation of affordable housing, Federal tax credits, or a tax exemption pursuant to D.C. Official Code § 47-1005.02. Notwithstanding the
fact that District has approved the Project Budget and the Project Funding Plan, the District is not obligated to provide funds from a District of Columbia
government source proposed by Developer which are subject to availability and approval of the funding by the applicable District of Columbia agency.
Developer acknowledge and agree that the Option A – Residential Parcel Project Budget attached hereto for the Residential Component are speculative and
based on 2026 market conditions. Developer acknowledges and agrees that for any costs associated with the Residential Component that anticipates District
sources of funding or subsidy, does not create an obligation or commitment by District to approve or provide such funding or subsidy.
Fees, Bonds & Permits, Utilities, Inspections & Testing, and Marketing are shown as discrete line items in the master budget, but these costs are captured
within the Soft Costs and Other Soft Costs line items.

OPTION B - Residential Parcel Project Budget
(PUD option without Air Rights Lot 7000)
Itemized Costs Total $/gsf $/FAR $/rsf
Acquisition Costs
Geno Baroni Purchase Price $ - $ - $ - $ -
Transfer and Recordation Costs $ - $ - $ - $ -
Equity placement Fee $ - $ - $ - $ -
Title Expenses $ - $ - $ - $ -
Acquisition Fee $ - $ - $ - $ -
Transaction Costs $ - $ - $ - $ -
Total Acquisition Costs $ - $ - $ - $ -
Hard Costs
Construction
Demolition $ - $ - $ - $ -
Substructure $ 1 6,285,000 $ 43.61 $ 53.27 $ 65.52
Shell & Core $ 4 2,132,300 $ 1 12.83 $ 1 37.82 $ 1 69.51
Fit Out $ 3 3,484,000 $ 89.67 $ 1 09.53 $ 1 34.71
Services $ 1 8,799,000 $ 50.34 $ 61.49 $ 75.63
Equipment & Furnishings $ - $ - $ - $ -
Special Construction $ 884,781 $ 2.37 $ 2.89 $ 3.56
Building Sitework $ - $ - $ - $ -
Design & Estimating Contingency $ 1 1,158,508 $ 29.88 $ 36.50 $ 44.89
Construction Management Costs $ 2 4,548,718 $ 65.74 $ 80.30 $ 98.76
Audiovisual $ 87,681 $ 0.23 $ 0.29 $ 0.35
Security $ 265,700 $ 0.71 $ 0.87 $ 1.07
FF&E $ 178,019 $ 0.48 $ 0.58 $ 0.72
Branding & Signage $ 1,102,800 $ 2.95 $ 3.61 $ 4.44
Total Construction Costs $ 148,926,507 $ 398.83 $ 487.17 $ 599.16
Other Hard Costs
Total Other Hard Costs $ - $ - $ - $ -
Total Hard Costs $ 148,926,507 $ 398.83 $ 487.17 $ 599.16
Soft Costs
Professional Fees (A&E)
Architects $ 2,382,824 $ 6.38 $ 7.79 $ 9.59
Structural Engineers $ 2,382,824 $ 6.38 $ 7.79 $ 9.59
MEP Engineers $ 1,429,694 $ 3.83 $ 4.68 $ 5.75
Façade Engineers $ 1,191,412 $ 3.19 $ 3.90 $ 4.79
Project & Cost Management $ 1,429,694 $ 3.83 $ 4.68 $ 5.75
Other & Owner Consultants $ 595,706 $ 1.60 $ 1.95 $ 2.40
Zoning Consultant $ 238,282 $ 0.64 $ 0.78 $ 0.96
Civil & Geotechnical Consultant $ 595,706 $ 1.60 $ 1.95 $ 2.40
AV/IT Consultant $ 119,141 $ 0.32 $ 0.39 $ 0.48
Surveyor $ 119,141 $ 0.32 $ 0.39 $ 0.48
Lighting Consultant $ 119,141 $ 0.32 $ 0.39 $ 0.48
Special Inspector $ 119,141 $ 0.32 $ 0.39 $ 0.48
Landscape Architect $ 833,988 $ 2.23 $ 2.73 $ 3.36
Expeditor $ 119,141 $ 0.32 $ 0.39 $ 0.48
Lobbysit $ 238,282 $ 0.64 $ 0.78 $ 0.96
Total Professional Fees $ 11,914,121 $ 31.91 $ 38.97 $ 47.93
Other Soft Costs
Final Clean $ - $ - $ - $ -
Landlord Charges $ - $ - $ - $ -
Move Costs $ - $ - $ - $ -
Filing Fees $ 1,787,118 $ 4.79 $ 5.85 $ 7.19
Planning, Permitting, Testing, Inspection $ 2,978,530 $ 7.98 $ 9.74 $ 11.98
Design Team Expenses $ - $ - $ - $ -
Other Owner Costs $ - $ - $ - $ -
Soft Cost Contingency $ - $ - $ - $ -
SC Escalations $ - $ - $ - $ -
Total Other Soft Costs $ 4,765,648 $ 12.76 $ 15.59 $ 19.17

Itemized Costs Total $/gsf $/FAR $/rsf
Commercial TI & Leasing
Retail Tenant Improvements $ 3,900,000 $ 10.44 $ 12.76 $ 15.69
Retail Leasing Commissions $ - $ - $ - $ -
Arts Tenant Improvemetns $ - $ - $ - $ -
Arts Leasing Commissions $ - $ - $ - $ -
Office Tenant Improvements $ - $ - $ - $ -
Office Brokerage Commissions $ - $ - $ - $ -
Retail Consultant $ - $ - $ - $ -
Retail Leasing Legal $ 100,000 $ 0.27 $ 0.33 $ 0.40
Arts Consultant $ - $ - $ - $ -
Arts Leasing Legal $ - $ - $ - $ -
Office Leasing Legal $ - $ - $ - $ -
Total TI and Leasing $ 4,000,000 $ 10.71 $ 13.08 $ 16.09
Fees, Bonds & Permits
Total Fees, Bonds & Permits $ - $ - $ - $ -
Utilities
Total Utilities $ - $ - $ - $ -
Inpections & Testing
Total Inspections & Testing $ - $ - $ - $ -
Marketing
Total Marketing $ - $ - $ - $ -
Expenses During Construction
Resi Real Estate Tax Allocation $ 1,282,509 $ 3.43 $ 4.20 $ 5.16
Hotel Real Estate Tax Allocation $ - $ - $ - $ -
Office Real Estate Tax Allocation $ - $ - $ - $ -
Retail Real Estate Tax Allocation $ 353,862 $ 0.95 $ 1.16 $ 1.42
Arts Real Estate Tax Allocation $ - $ - $ - $ -
Condo Expenses $ 300,000 $ 0.80 $ 0.98 $ 1.21
Predevelopemnt Loan Interest $ - $ - $ - $ -
Finance Consultant $ - $ - $ - $ -
Equity Placement Fee $ 563,091 $ 1.51 $ 1.84 $ 2.27
Zoning Legal $ 186,705 $ 0.50 $ 0.61 $ 0.75
Legal $ 280,058 $ 0.75 $ 0.92 $ 1.13
Owner Construction Management $ 2,233,898 $ 5.98 $ 7.31 $ 8.99
Construction Auditing $ 74,682 $ 0.20 $ 0.24 $ 0.30
Project Accounitng $ 186,705 $ 0.50 $ 0.61 $ 0.75
General Liability $ 100,821 $ 0.27 $ 0.33 $ 0.41
Environmental Insurance $ 149,364 $ 0.40 $ 0.49 $ 0.60
Transfer Costs (CONDO Sale) $ 750,000 $ 2.01 $ 2.45 $ 3.02
Lender Admin Fee $ 74,682 $ 0.20 $ 0.24 $ 0.30
Miscellaneous $ 93,353 $ 0.25 $ 0.31 $ 0.38
Total Expenses During Construction $ 6,629,729 $ 17.75 $ 21.69 $ 26.67
Development Fee
Development Fee $ 7,093,499 $ 19.00 $ 23.20 $ 28.54
Pre-Development Fee $ - $ - $ - $ -
Soft Cost Contingency $ - $ - $ - $ -
Office TI Construction Management Fee $ - $ - $ - $ -
Retail TI Construciton Management Fee $ - $ - $ - $ -
Arts TI Construciton Management Fee $ - $ - $ - $ -
Total Development Fee $ 7,093,499 $ 19.00 $ 23.20 $ 28.54
Total Soft Costs $ 34,402,997 $ 9 2 $ 113 $ 138.41
Carry Costs
Financing Fees
Lender Financing Fee $ 769,607 $ 2.06 $ 2.52 $ 3.10
Mortgage Recordation Costs $ 2,391,213 $ 6.40 $ 7.82 $ 9.62
Broker Origination Fee $ 717,364 $ 1.92 $ 2.35 $ 2.89
Title Expenses $ 239,121 $ 1 $ 1 $ 0.96
Guaranty Fee $ 280,439 $ 0.75 $ 0.92 $ 1.13
Lender Expenses $ 457,185 $ 1.22 $ 1.50 $ 1.84
Financing Legal $ 522,497 $ 1.40 $ 1.71 $ 2.10
Total Contruction Loan Financing Fees $ 5,377,427 $ 14.40 $ 17.59 $ 21.63
Other Carry Costs
Operating Losses During Lease Up $ 555,522 $ 1 $ 2 $ 2.23
Capitalized Interest $ 1 9,064,996 $ 5 1 $ 6 2 $ 76.70
Total Other Carry Costs $ 19,620,518 $ 5 3 $ 6 4 $ 78.94
Total Development Costs $ 208,327,449 $ 558 $ 681 $ 838.14
NOTE: Project Budget and Project Funding Plan subject to review and approval by the applicable District of Columbia agencies or instrumentalities for any
costs associated with this Project that anticipate District sources of funding, including without limitation, any grants, tax increment financing or subsidies for
construction and operation of affordable housing, Federal tax credits, or a tax exemption pursuant to D.C. Official Code § 47-1005.02. Notwithstanding the
fact that District has approved the Project Budget and the Project Funding Plan, the District is not obligated to provide funds from a District of Columbia
government source proposed by Developer which are subject to availability and approval of the funding by the applicable District of Columbia agency.
Developer acknowledge and agree that the Option B – Residential Parcel Project Budget attached hereto for the Residential Component are speculative and
based on 2026 market conditions. Developer acknowledges and agrees that for any costs associated with the Residential Component that anticipates District
sources of funding or subsidy, does not create an obligation or commitment by District to approve or provide such funding or subsidy.
Fees, Bonds & Permits, Utilities, Inspections & Testing, and Marketing are shown as discrete line items in the master budget, but these costs are captured
within the Soft Costs and Other Soft Costs line items.

Exhibit Q
Developer's Organizational Chart
Quinitn E. Primo III Primo 2012 Descendants Gift Trust Primo 2012 Family Gift Trust
Managing Member (51%) Member (39.2%) Member (9.8%)
Primo Investor, LLC Dawil R. Sully Abaris Capital Advisors, LLC Charles King Simone Goring Devaney
Member (78%) Member (20%) Member (2%) Member (50%) Member (50%)
Capri Investor, LLC CSG Urban Partners, LLC* NAACP - 501(c)(4)
Sole Member (100%) Sole Member (100%) Sole Member (100%)
Capri Reeves SPE, LLC CSG Reeves SPE, LLC NAACP 14th St Investments, LLC
Managing Member (60%) Member (30%) Member (10%)
Reeves U Street Historic ("RUSH") Partners, LLC
Sole Member (100%)
Reeves CMC Venture, LLC
(Master developer and LDDA signatory with the District of Columbia)
*CBE Entity

EQUITABLE INCLUSION PRIORITY FORM
Section 1. 1. DMPED Project Name _F_ra_n_k _D_. _R_ee_v_e_s _C_en_t_er_ R_e_d_e_ve_lo_p_m_e_n_t ________________
General 2. Name of the Respondent _R_e_e_ve_s_ C__M_C_ V_e_n_t_ur_e_, _LL_C________________________
Information 3. Does your partnership include one or more entities that meet the requirements for Equitable Inclusion Priority?
✔ YES  NO
Complete Section 2 and the table on page 2 only if the answer to Section 1, #3 is YES.
Section 2. 4. Total Equity Participation Percentage to meet the Equitable Inclusion Priority (the sum of equity participation in
Equitable the table on page 2):
Inclusion _9_0_%____________
Priority Entity
5. I certify the entity or entities listed in the table are designated as Disadvantaged Business Enterprise (DBE) and
Residence Owned Business (ROB) by the DC Department of Small and Local Business Development (DSLBD) or led
by or majority controlled by individuals designated as socially disadvantaged in accordance with the requirements
found under 13 C.F.R. §124.103.
✔ YES  NO
Section 3. I declare, certify, verify, attest, and state that this form and any supporting documents are true and correct to the best of
Declaration my knowledge and belief. Pursuant to D.C. Official Code § 22-2405, any person convicted of making false statements shall
be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned for not more than 180 days, or both.
Signature: _________________________________ Date: _J_u_ly_ 2_7_, _2_0_2_6__
Print Name:
_Q_u_in_t_in_ E__. P__rim__o_ I_II___________________
Title:
_M_a_n_a_g_in_g_ M__e_m_b_e_r_______
Page 1 of 2

Table Instructions:
• If the partnership is comprised of one or more entities that meet the requirements for the Equitable Inclusion Priority, the
development team should complete this table to identify each such entity.
• Answer “Yes” or “No” to all designations that apply to each entity
A. Black Americans
B. Hispanic Americans
C. Individuals who are members of other groups for which a rebuttable presumption exists that the individuals are socially
disadvantaged (13 C.F.R. §124.103(b)(1))
D. Individuals who establish social disadvantage by a preponderance of the evidence (13 C.F.R. §124.103(c))
• Equity Percentage = The percentage of equity participation in this project for each entity listed
Equity
Entity Name Street Address Zip Code A.(Y or N?) B.(Y or N?) C.(Y or N?) D.(Y or N?)
Percentage (%)
Capri Investor, LLC 208 S. LaSalle St., Ste. 1610, Chicago, IL 60604 Y N N N 60%
CSG Urban Partners, LLC 1328 Florida Ave. NW, Washington, DC 20009 Y N N N 30%
Page 2 of 2